CHAPTER I.
Vos del forzoso pero
De tan grande republica opprimide
Better be
Where the extinguished Spartans still are free,
In the proud charnel of Thermopyle
Byron
.
The
first night after the junction, I passed in the tent
of my classmate, of whom I have spoken. He gave me
a succinct, but most interesting narrative of his fortunes
since we had separated from each other in the halls of
our
alma mater
. As the materials, the character, and the
fate of that interesting body of young men, who were now
united with the Mexican patriots, and many of whom at
this moment fill the first offices in Louisiana, have never
yet been given to the public, and as they are
henceforward
identified in the same cause with myself, I shall take
leave to digress from the thread of my narrative, to give
you a very brief outline of the rise and progress of this
expedition on Texas, as my classmate gave it to me.
Among the first adherents of Hidalgo, whose fate has
been mentioned, was Don Jose Bernardo Guttierez,
whom we shall designate by his customary appellation,
Bernardo. He was a native of a small town on the banks
of the Rio Grande, in the province of New Santander.
He was originally a silversmith by trade, and by
unusual
elegance in his art, he had amassed a handsome
fortune. After the execution of Hidalgo, he was obliged
to fly. He made his way to the United States by land,
and his property was confiscated. His first object, after
his arrival there, was to resuscitate an interest in his cause
in that country. His plan was to obtain the countenance
of the government, enlist volunteers, whose thoughts he
could contrive to turn towards this El Dorado, this region
of gold, and penetrate with them by the way of the
Sabine
,
into the
provincias internas
. But the wise and
calculating
government of the United States, had not yet
seen the efforts of the Mexicans sufficiently consentaneous
and matured, to give him any public countenance. Mr.
Clay had not yet been heard, alternately in song, and in
thunder, upon this subject. Bernardo returned to
Natchitoches
,
on the Spanish frontier, without pecuniary means
and without any public demonstrations in his favor. He was
himself still full of hopes, and fired with zeal. Like many
other men, self-denominated patriots, it was difficult to
ascertain which element preponderated in him, revenge,
or a love of liberty, cupidity and ambition, or a desire to
liberate his country. He was destitute alike of genuine
moral, and physical courage, was of limited understanding,
savage in his temperament, and coarse and repulsive in
his manners. But he had great practical adroitness at
intrigue, and that undoubting confidence in his cause,
which is so indispensable in a partizan. This unshrinking
confidence led him still to hope, when others despaired,
and to persevere, when others forsook the cause. Had
1*
I time to trace him in detail, he was, all in all, singular in
character, and as singular in fortune. I can only find time
here to record the last singular incident in his life, by
which he acquired a certain kind of notoriety. It was this
same man, who, after a great diversity of fortunes, was
commander in the province, where the ex-emperor
Iturbide
landed from Great Britain, and he presided over
his execution.
A party of gentlemen at Natchitoches, many of whom
now fill the most responsible stations in the country, were
at this time disposed to aid Bernardo in his plans, or at
least to lend their assistance to the fermenting principle of
republicanism in the adjacent Spanish provinces. They
could not expect to succeed to any extent, in an
expedition
into that country, unless they could carry with them
the efficacy of a name of some distinguished native of the
country. Such a character was offered in Bernardo.
They selected him, therefore, as the covering of their
battery. He marched at the head of the expedition, just
as the Roman eagles were carried before their legions.
Many gallant and high-minded men, to whom no career
was open in the United States, who disdained oppression,
and under that generous feeling, probably concealed from
themselves dawning ambition, and a cupidity fired with
the prospect of the Mexican mines, united west of the
Sabine. Their avowed object was to aid the Patriot
natives
in communicating to this oppressed and beautiful
country, the entire freedom of their own. They chose a
highly respectable young man of their number, and then a
captain in the United States army, their colonel. Their
number was small, but of a character to attach importance
and confidence to their enterprise. As they advanced into
the country, their numbers were increased rapidly by
adventurers
from the United States. There were many
Americans
already settled in the country, and they generally
ranged themselves under the standard of the American
volunteers. Many respectable Mexicans joined them.
They formally declared the independence of the Spanish
province of Texas, instituted a temporary government,
and pushed on to the first settlement without opposition.
Nacogdoches is the first town in the province, in passing
from the Sabine towards the interior, and is about seventy
miles from that river. I shall always remember the place,
for it has the aspect, though delightfully situated, of being
as lonely, as an isle in the South Sea. Clear and
beautiful
streams flow from the hills near the town, uniting in a
small river just below it. At that time, a small body of
royal provincial troops was stationed there, and the place
contained the usual and necessary accompaniments of a
Spanish town, a church, a
calabozo
, a commandant's
house, and about five hundred inhabitants. The
American
volunteers were received by the inhabitants of this
place and vicinity, with open arms. The small
detachment
of royal troops joined them, and a large company
of Creoles was organized, under the command of Captain
Samuel Davenport. Immense herds of cattle filled the
vallies of this paradise of shepherds; and supplies of
provisions
,
especially of meat, were easy and abundant.
The body of troops was now swollen, to something like
the dimensions of an army. They organized a junta for
the provisional government of the province, and moved on
without opposition, and took possession of Labahia del
Espiritu Santo, commonly called by the Americans, La
Baddie. This town stands on the western bank of the
river San Antonio, an elevated site, which commands the
surrounding prairies. It contained a fort of stone, with
bastions of considerable regularity. A large and massive
stone church made one side of the bastion. Its small
garrison surrendered to us without opposition, and
immediately
joined itself to us, and contributed to swell the
forces of the Patriots. The effective force at this time
was considerably numerous, and it was the intention of
Bernardo, or rather of the American commander, to
march immediately to the attack of San Antonio, the
capital
of the province.
Before this could be effected, the royal army moved
down in force from San Antonio, for the attack of
Labahia
.
It was commanded by Don Simon Hererra, and
Salcedo, and was estimated to at fifteen hundred men,
chiefly mounted Creoles of the province. They had
a number of pieces of artillery, which, however, were so
badly managed as to be of little utility to them. Our
troops took post in a large and uncommonly massive
building
,
which had been erected for the seat of a mission, and
was inhabited by some of the converted Indians. It was
quite surprising, that such a place should have been so
long defended, against such an imposing force, in
possession
of a sufficient artillery. But the royal commanders
seem to have been paralyzed. They did not at all want
for courage. But they seemed to have been panic-struck
with the novel aspect of men, that they had seen tame,
subdued, and submissive, and as timid as grasshoppers, all
at once, by this new spirit of republicanism, transformed
into fierce, if not formidable foes. They were evidently
suspicious, too, of the fidelity of the provincials, that were
under them. They were aware, that these men would
naturally participate the same spirit with the rest. The
siege continued, during the whole winter, and was
signaized
by many sorties and skirmishes, in which the garrison
displayed incredible acts of daring and hardihood. The
royal commanders attempted to get rid of the garrison, by
proposing to let them depart in safety. They even
offered
them a supply of provisions, if they would march
away to the frontier. But this handful of brave and
determined
men, set all the efforts of the besieging army at
defiance.
At length, either alarmed, or tired out, the Royal troops
drew off from the siege, without striking a blow. The
Americans, without military science, and with no other
resource, than their native gallantry, and the internal
consciousness
of the dignity of freemen, had learned heartily
to despise the Royal forces, and in many instances had
shown themselves brave and determined soldiers Soon
after the retreat of the Royal army, the Patriots were
reinforced
by a party of Conehatty Indians, and in their turn
moved as assailants against the Royalists. These Indians
are a principal branch of the Creeks, and are settled low
down the Trinity river, towards the gulf, and are
considered
an uncommonly brave, manly, and noble race of
Indians
.
At the distance of eight miles from San Antonio,
the Patriots fell in with the Royal army, which moved out
of town to meet them, having been reinforced with the
regular garrison of the town. They entrenched
themselves
on a rising ground, and in an advantageous position,
behind the river Salado. The Patriots, not half their
number
,
formed, and rushed to the attack, with the most
determined
fury, and with terrible effect. They charged
upon the royal battery, carried it, and turned the pieces
against the foe. The Spanish royal officers, too, acted
with great gallantry, but their troops were completely
routed. Major Reuben Ross, of the Patriots, and Colonel
Montero of the royal troops, both of them mounted on
fine horses, had a personal rencontre, single handed in
the midst of the battle. Montero was severely wounded,
and the life of Ross was only saved by the intervention of
one of his soldiers, by the name of Owen, who was killed
by the blow, that saved his commander. Immediately on
this defeat, the Royalists took shelter again in San
Antonio
.
Such had been the state of things, before I arrived at
this place. I arrived here in company with Bernardo, and
a considerable number of adventurous spirits, French,
Spanish, Yankees, and people of all nations. I had
become
acquainted with this extraordinary man in
Philadelphia
.
I imbibed, in common with the rest of my
compatriots
,
something of his confident spirit. The mines glittered
in prospective. The hope of emancipating an oppressed
people operated as an excitement to more noble feelings.
There was a press already in operation, and it was to pour
the light of liberty upon that vast and beautiful country. I
was fresh from college, and the visions of Plato's republic,
and felt all the sauguine anticipations of a youthful legislator
and emancipator. Many adventurers, seduced by various
motives, joined us from time to time. Bernardo, loaned five
thousand dollars, and I as many hundred, to be repaid on
the day, in which we should possess ourselves of the
mines and the mint of Mexico. We moved to the
southwest
,
on the course of the Ohio. Here we endured all
that human nature can endure, hunger, want, disaffection
among ourselves, and what was to me the most
overwhelming
consideration of all, the discovery, that some of our
party were arrant scoundrels, who knew nothing about
Plato, and cared nothing about freedom; who would steal,
if they should have a chance, from the mint, but who
would never have the courage to seek for its contents in any
other way. Our boat was twice frozen up in the river,
and we were, alternately, a spectacle of ridicule and terror
to the people, among whom we were compelled to
sojourn
,
and near whose habitations we were bound in the
ice. Every language was spoken on board our floating
Babel, and while we talked of subduing and emancipating
empires, most of our rogues would have fled from the
sight of a sheriff. While we were preparing to legislate
for the empire of Montezuma, we were daily quarrelling
among ourselves. Talking flippantly about the mines of
Mexico, we wanted shirts and bread. You can easily
make a fancy sketch of the events, the anecdotes, and the
comforts of the communion of such an assortment of the
apostles of liberty. For my own part, when I laughed at
myself, to find myself with such associates, I said to myself,
`The cause cannot be contaminated by the character and
motives of those, who are with me, nor can my motives
be rendered impure, by co-operating with the impure
motives
of others.' In due process of time, and with such
comfort, as we might find, in such company, we arrived,
where you now find us. Such was the outline of the
narrative of my friend.
With the society of these new and pleasant associates,
our time flew rapidly, and we were again so pleasantly
situated, as to hear the sentiment of Mount Mixtpal
reiterated
,
`that it was good for us to be here,' and the wish
that no change might alter the present aspect of things.
There was one material difference between this position
and that. Here we were on an open plain, which
admitted
of no other defences than intrenchments, and could
be forced to a battle at the choice of the assailants. The
faces of the Misses Benvelt were again pale with terror,
for we determined, in a council of war, to make an
assault upon St. Antonio. Flushed by the augmented
spirit and numbers of our united forces, we sanguinely
calculated upon a successful attack. The royal troops
were commanded by the Conde, Salcedo, and Hererra.
In a week from the time of our junction, we moved up in
view of St. Antonio.
The royal army came out to meet us, and the issue was
a pitched battle. Any one can have a surfeit of
descriptions
of scenes of carnage and blood in any page of history.
I do not wish to go into the horrible details of this. It
was a severe and fiercely contested struggle, which lasted
almost through the day. The Royalists had intrenched
themselves, and were defended by a deep ravine. They
had also greatly the advantage of us in horse and artillery.
Twice we rushed upon their front, and twice we were
repelled with great loss. No ways disheartened, the
gallant
leaders of the Patriots rushed upon them again, and
in this third attack, we succeeded in pushing them from
the ravine, and in crossing it with our whole force. The
fight was now renewed upon more equal terms, and as it
was the charge that would determine the fortune of the
day, it was the struggle of despair. It was the contest of
man with man, and horse with horse. I had, finally, the
gratification of the first wish of my heart. I met Colonel
Pedro, and I was as well mounted as he was, and he
could not escape me. Not having learned the sword
exercise
,
I felt that with the sabre I should not meet him on
equal terms. He fired his pistol upon me without effect,
and I discharged mine as his horse's breast. The horse
reared, and in plunging, dismounted his rider. I instantly
dismounted too. I was fortunate enough to turn aside the
blow of his sabre, and to close with him. I threw him to
the ground, put my foot on his breast, and in the fury of
the contest, and in the exasperation of revenge, my first
impulse was to cleave his head from his body. Perhaps,
it was the second thought of a more bitter revenge, but it
presented itself to me as the more noble one, to spare him.
I wrenched his sabre from him, as he held up his
powerless
arm in the attitude of intreaty. I struck it deep in
the ground, and by a twist broke it, as if it had been
straw, and threw the pieces from me. Spare me, said
he, in Spanish, and I will resign all pretensions to
Martha. She loves you yet. Poltron! answered I,
we are well met at last. I ought to wash away the
remembrance
of your pitiful and malicious persecutions in
your blood. But I would show you the difference between
a man, and a wretch whose blood is too base to stain my
sabre. I have saved you once from motives of humanity.
I now spare you from contempt. I will not owe the favor
of Martha to the circumstance of your resigning it.
Saying
these words, I turned my back upon him. I had
turned from him but a few paces, before I received from
him a carabine shot, which passed through my clothes.
An aim truer by a couple of inches would have rendered it
mortal. He had found the undischarged carabine of a
fallen soldier, and fired upon me in his retreat. I turned
to pursue him, determined now to sacrifice him, but he
was already mixed with the solid columns of the foe, and
pursuit was in vain. It was a long, weary, and bloody
day, but in the end the Royalists retreated, and left us an
undisputed victory.
Nothing now interposed between us and the town, and
we commenced the siege of it with great vigor. On the
third day of the siege, the town surrendered at discretion,
and the royal forces were made prisoners of war. We had
now a scene before us, of which I had read in history, and
VOL. II. 2
which I had seen portrayed by the pencil, or the colourings
of the poet. It was here before me on a small scale. But
all representations were faint, compared with the horrible
reality, of the entrance of an undisciplined soldiery into a
captured city. In an army, composed of such discordant
materials as ours, with so little subordination, and so
exasperated
by the very nature of this kind of warfare, it was only
by the greatest exertions, and by making some terrible
examples
of our own men, that we saved this town from the
utmost extremes of merciless and wanton cruelty, lust,
cupidity
,
murder, and burning, that are generally consequent
upon such an event. Our Spanish allies were too much
inclined to cruelty, and to the exercise of all the dreadful
rights of conquest. I felt proud to see how different a
spirit was manifested by my own countrymen. The noble
young men, to whom nature on such occasions assigns the
tone and authority of command, were, as it seemed, almost
endowed with the attribute of omnipresence. Wherever
I went, I saw them sheltering the aged, protecting the
women and children, and performing the noblest offices of
humanity. Wherever an American went, the Spanish
women flew to him, as to an asylum from their own
countrymen.
By the influence of De Benvelt with Morelos and
Bernardo
,
to my regiment was assigned the guarding of the
palace. Of course the Conde with his household fell
under my control, as prisoners of war; while Salcedo, the
two Hererras, and the other chiefs, were in the keeping
of the other American officers. I had never yet been
called to a task so extremely irksome and awkward,
I might even say, so distressing, as that of my introducing
myself to the Conde, who had taken shelter in the midst
of his household. The carnage had hardly, and with
much difficulty been arrested in the streets, when my
regiment entered the court-yard of the palace. The
servants
,
many of whom knew me, crowded about me, called
me by name, fell on their knees before me, and begged
me, crossing themselves
por el amor de Dios
, to spare
them. At the same time they were eloquent in their
attempts
to flatter me, thanking Our Lady of Guadaloupe,
and all the saints, that they had fallen into the hands of
such a good man, who they knew would spare the family for
the sake of their dear young mistress. I sent them away
comforted and assured, and asked one of them to lead me
to the Conde. His clothes were stained with the blood
of the conflict, and the grim sternness of battle was still
on his features. Knowing that he was my prisoner, he
felt himself safe, and his manner was determined, and his
bearing indignantly proud. And is it even to you, young
man, said he, that I am to give up my good sword?
This is a fall indeed! At the same time he handed me
his sword. Yours, he continued, at this moment is
not exactly the function of a schoolmaster. You have,
indeed, come all this distance to confer freedom upon this
ignorant people. As yet, I think you have gained little
gold, except the proper reward of your lessons, or the
gift of my lady.
I answered him, Your Excellency can rail at me now,
as you choose, with impunity. You must be aware of my
character, and that being as you are in my power, you
are safe. You forget that I once refused gold. For the
rest, Sir, so situated, I should have thought you too much
of a soldier, to play off this harmless war of abuse. I
cannot accept your sword, and shall only avail myself of
the present sport of fortune, by using her capricious power
for the protection and comfort of your family. This I
would do, even against your will. It would please me
much more, if, submitting to the chances of fortune as a
philosopher, you would let me know how I can be of
service
to you? I bowed slightly to the father confessor,
and with a particular expression of indignation and
contempt
to Don Pedro. Two or three other officers, who
had accompanied the Conde to battle as aids, I dismissed,
as belonging to the guard of another portion of our force,
and pointed out some arrangements by which the family
was to be governed, in order to avail themselves of my
protection. The Condesa and her daughter, with
countenances
pale, but firm and composed, sat in a recess.
I advanced towards them, and bowed, waiting for them to
address me. Though Doa Martha affected to be calm,
I discovered, by the heaving of her bosom, the painful
efforts which this assumed calmness cost her. The
Condesa
returned my bow, observing, that since the cruel
result of this unnatural rebellion had cast them into the
power of the rebels, she was thankful that it was into my
command; that this secured them, she was aware, as far
as my protection could extend, from outrage and insult.
Doa Martha added, that she too could go so far in
thankfulness, that my memory, short as it appeared to
have been, could not but recur to the past; that while she
seemed to be the condescending party, I could not but
have known, how she had suffered from her father, Colonel
Pedro, the father confessor, and others, on the charge of
an ill judged partiality for me. These, if mistakes, were the
mistakes of gratitude, and a desire to discover and
countenance
merit under a cloud. The case was now reversed.
The humble are exalted, and the proud brought low.
But I hope, she continued, that my father hereafter
will more readily believe, that the spirit of my forefathers
has descended to me. Let him know, and let all know,
that I feel very differently towards the triumphant rebel
Colonel, although at this moment we are in his power.
The man in arms against my king, my father, and my
church, though fortune has granted him a momentary
triumph
,
is to me a very different, and a far less estimable
personage, than the learned, modest, and intrepid youthful
instructor. Alas! so young, and yet so unfortunate! You
have seen me twice a captive. To Menko first, I
replied
,
and now to another, and a different kind of savage,
is it, Doa Martha? She paused a moment for an
answer
.
The first burst of indignant pride had past. Another
current of feeling succeeded. Oh, no! she answered.
We are not so unjust. Let me not forget what I owe to
the blessed Virgin, and to you. How thankful I am to God
and the saints, that my dear father and mother have fallen
into your hands, and not into the power of those miscreants
that are associated with you! I am not less thankful,
added her mother. I can easily imagine how differently
this catastrophe would have terminated, had we fallen into
other hands. At least we are all safe in your keeping;
sure of decorous and courteous treatment, and of every
indulgence which our case will admit.
I moved, as if to retire. The Condesa requested me
to tarry a moment, and, in presence of her honoured
husband
and Colonel Pedro, hear a new charge that had
been brought against me. It may seem, said she,
mal  propos
for prisoners, to bring a youthful conqueror
to trial before them. But I am confident, that when I
have heard your reply to the charge, it will receive another
and a more favourable construction for you. Don Pedro
charges you with having disgracefully beaten him, after
he was fallen, and then with having fired upon him, after
2*
you had had the affected magnanimity to allow him to
retire. You may judge his inference, that a man, capable
of such a base use of power, could not be trusted as our
keeper. And have you, Sir, cried I, turning to Don
Pedro, made this courteous report of me? And is it
possible that this family could have believed it? I would
hardly undertake to vindicate myself in the opinion of any
one, that would listen to such a story. I can hardly bring
myself so far to trample on the fallen, as to refute so base
a falsehood. Were the slanderer in any other place and
condition, I would apply to him the epithets he deserves.
This falsehood has not even the poor merit of ingenuity
and invention. He has only charged upon me the
treacherous
and cowardly conduct, which he practised himself.
Hear the case as it was. All laws, human and divine,
would have justified me in putting him to death, when the
issue of a mortal struggle had placed him in my power.
Words passed between him and me, which are improper
to be repeated here. But I sent him away with his life,
and I turned my back on him, in confidence, that for this
time at least, I was secure from his assault. Scarcely
had I turned, before I received a shot from him, and
here, added I, showing the passage of the ball through
my clothes, is the evidence of his marksmanship.
Even the effrontery of Don Pedro seemed to shrink,
under this refutation. He had always seemed to sustain
in the family a character for truth and honor. The father
confessor, who had heard him bring the charge against
me, when they were rejoicing together, that they were my
prisoners, called upon him boldly to vindicate himself from
this falsehood, or forever forfeit all claims to honor and
and regard. He evidently suffered the tortures of a fiend.
He answered, in a faltering voice, We are all in his
power
.
He can say what he chooses. I have too much regard
for the safety of the family to exasperate such a man, and
bring his persecution and vengeance upon them on my
account. In truth, said I, Colonel Pedro, you are
well aware on what grounds this family would be sure of
kindness from me, say or do your worst. For you, Sir,
before this, I at least gave you credit for the virtues of
courage and truth. You are below all notice, below
contempt
,
and if I bore any resentment towards you, the
torture and the guilty confessions of your countenance,
would now evidence all that the deepest revenge could
desire. My dear father, said Martha, do you not
see all the truth? You heard the charge, and you see
the manner, with which he receives the refutation. Can
it now be, that you could wish to unite my fate with that
of such a man? Holy Virgin! What have I not escaped?
Let me be sacrificed, if such a consummation be
necessary
;
but I implore you, never to think again of uniting
me with dishonor. Daughter, said the Conde,
sternly
,
desist! I am wretched enough already. You will
not drive me mad, I trust, by espousing the cause of
rebellion
in my presence. This is neither the time nor the
place, for either the trial or justification of Colonel Pedro.
He has at least fought bravely for his king and country.
You cannot wish to dishonor the gray hairs of your father
by recurring again to the defence and eulogy of our
conqueror in his presence. I perceive, said I, slightly
bowing to the Conde, that my presence is disagreeable,
and I relieve you of it. You shall find me watching to be
of service to you, and of this course of things you can
say and think as you choose. My business shall be to act
for the preservation of you all, and yours shall be to put
your own construction upon that conduct. I stationed
Bryan as a sentinel in the court-yard, who, by his
acquaintance
with the family, and his native shrewdness,
would be able to anticipate their wants, and ward off their
dangers.
I selected my head quarters in a house, opposite to that,
where dwelt my prisoner. In the adjoining one were the
head quarters of Morelos and Bernardo. De Benvelt's
family were under the same roof with me. After the first
tumults of the occupation of the town were over, the
Americans put themselves seriously to the work, of
attempting
to procure the concurrence of their allies in the
effort, to institute an efficient police, and to adopt measures,
which should restore the march of law and order, and
assure
protection to all. It was a painful discovery, to find
that our allies were destitute, to a most humiliating degree,
of all subordination and genuine tenderness, and that they
indulged their cruelty, cupidity, and lust too often without
restraint. The town was frequently a scene of riot, and
brutal excess. All discipline was relaxed, and all fear of
the reaction of public feeling, and of the resuscitation of
the royal cause, was thrown to the winds. Complaints of
outrage and violence came to us continually, for the
wretched
people soon learned, that they had little redress to
expect
from their own countrymen. Morelos would gladly
have joined his full influence to ours, in redressing these
evils. But he found in Bernardo a miserable intriguer,
against whose wiles he was obliged to exert all his
circumspection
,
to retain his own command. Bernardo had
already
begun to raise a Spanish party, hostile to the
American
influence, and to denounce Morelos in secret whispers,
as the friend of the Americans. While our common
danger
was imminent, we had no jars, and made common cause.
But the moment the surrender of San Antonio had
concealed
present danger from our view, innumerable heart
burnings began to spring up from this source. The
unfortunate
Royalists were only anxious to get under the
protection
of the Americans. Parties soon ran high, and we
were in danger of coming to blows with our new friends,
the Creole Patriots. These disputes quickly gave rise to
a definite and specific cause of contention, which division
of the allied troops should have charge of the prisoners?
The Spaniards assumed, that as the Americans pretended
only to act as auxiliaries, the ransom of the prisoners, their
safe keeping, and their ultimate disposal belonged only to
them. In the surrender, the prisoners had made it a term,
that they surrendered to the Americans, and we insisted
that our honor was concerned, that they should not be
placed out of the reach of our protection. This dispute
ran so high, that at a fandango, at which the American and
Spanish officers in general were present, it came to blows.
By the aid of their father, two of the American officers,
and Bryan, I was enabled to bring off the Misses Benvelt
safe. Fortunately none of the Conde's family were there.
It was a battle royal. The ladies' mantillas were
demolished
,
and the gentlemen's heads broken, and the dirk was
liberally used, though, by good fortune, no one was slain.
The Misses Benvelt were excessively alarmed and
disgusted
,
and promised their father that they would follow
the example of Doa Martha, who had not been seen
abroad since the capitulation.
The next day the Spaniards insisted upon having
possession
of the prisoners, and assured us, that they would
gladly
obtain this possession with our consent, but that
otherwise
they would have charge of them by force. They
were more than quadruple our numbers and were well
able to execute their threat. As things were turning, we
were but too well assured, that in their jealousy of us, they
would not hesitate, on an emergency to join with the
Royalists
,
and bring their united force upon us. It was obvious,
that their jealousy of the Americans preponderated over
their attachment to the common cause. In a conclave
of the Americans, we agreed to meet the next day in a
council of war, and fix upon some final and definitive
arrangement with respect to the disposal of our
prisoners
.
At my return from this meeting, I was both pleased and
surprised to receive by Bryan a verbal message from the
Conde, requesting me, when my leisure would admit, to
call upon him, for that he wished some particular
conversation
with me. Bother them all, said he, they are
like the weathercock, all round the compass. The other
day, there was nothing like the great Colonel Pedro,
and I could see, that they treated your Honor shabbily.
Now, the thing is all top down. The Conde is blue. Doa
Martha is at the head, and your Honor is in demand. What
they want of your Honor I know not, but they spoke your
name as soft as silk. When I waited on the Conde, I
found, as Bryan had said, that the wind set in another
quarter
.
The Conde received me with complacency, almost
with deference. You are too generous, said he, and
too well versed in human nature, not to find an excuse for
the roughness of my manner to you the other day.
Consider
only what I have been, how much I have been chafed
by treachery and rebellion on every quarter, and I am
confident
,
all will be forgiven and forgotten. You kindly
directed
us to let you know in what manner you could aid
us. Now, let me tell you. They propose to place us in
the hands of the Spanish chiefs of your party, and if you
consent to resign our keeping, we are perfectly assured,
that we pass into their hands only to be massacred. For
my own personal interest, I should be perfectly content it
were so. But in these dangerous and terrible times, I
earnestly wish to live a little longer for the sake of my lady
and daughter. You will insist upon retaining your
command
here, with a pertinacity exactly proportioned to the
value you affix to our lives. I entreat you, said the
Condesa, to be pertinacious in retaining your command
We are informed that you alone, of the rebels, pardon me
the word, for I know of no one in its place, that you alone
have a sufficient influence to prevent the adoption of that
atrocious resolution. Oh! these dreadful people! You
can have no idea of the savageness of their natures. I
would rather a thousand times be in the hands of the
Commanches
.
If you knew these people as we do, you would
see how little worthy they are of freedom.
Notwithstanding
all that may have appeared to the contrary, we have
all along done ample justice to your character, and have
felt perfectly tranquil and confident in your keeping.
Yours is indeed a proud destiny, said Martha. At
the fandango you carry away in your arms the trembling
ladies from the bacchanalian riots, and from the dirks of
these innocent and amiable Patriots. Here you are called
to the family of the chief of the government, and they
implore
you not to hand them over to the dominion of these
merciful deliverers of an oppressed people. How much
things are changed within a few weeks! How proud must
be your feelings in having so many people clinging to you
for protection. I cannot flatter myself, that my entreaties
can add any interest to such a mass of supplication. If it
would, I have, with my parents, a sufficient horror at the
canaille of this country. I would beg you, on my bended
knee, to strike off our heads with your sabre, rather than
pass us over into their hands. I answered, You are not
aware, Doa Martha, of the cruelty of this bitter irony,
or you would not employ it. I can only say, that no part
of my deportment to you or your family has merited it. I
have neither time nor inclination to take up the apology of
my cause, or the people with whom I am associated.
They are ignorant and harbarous, I grant you. But what
has made them so? Enlighten their ignorance;break
their chains;remove the threefold veil of darkness with
which your priesthood have hoodwinked them. My heart
tells me that nothing can be more amiable than the Spanish
character. To your Excellency and the family I can only
say, that I fear you have entirely miscalculated my
influence
.
But, that such as it is, it shall all be exerted for
your welfare. I hope and believe, that your alarm is
without
cause. Should it be otherwise, I will retain my
command
while I can. Whenever you shall be in danger, you
may calculate to see me at hand. Nothing will debar
me from the duty of watching for your safety, but what, at
the same time, deprives me of life. As I was taking my
leave, the Conde informed me, that Don Pedro and the
father confessor, also, begged to be included under my
command, and subjected to the same disposal with
himself
.
This too, I replied, shall be granted, not for their
own sakes, but for your family's, and I took my leave.
In the council of war, convened the next morning,
the session was stormy, and party feeling, as usual,
ran high. It appeared, however, that the Spaniards had
managed to overreach us, and not break with us. They
meditated the consummation of their horrid purpose by
treachery. They affected to regret, that any cause of
jealousy should have existed between the troops of the two
nations. They proposed an arrangement for the disposal
of the chiefs, which, they hoped, would be mutually
satisfactory
,
and would effectually remove all grounds of
jealousy for the future. They represented the immense
wealth and influence of these chiefs, and they developed
intrigues and agencies, which they affirmed, were going on,
to bring about a counter-revolution, and that, to those who
knew anything of the fickleness of the people, this must
be to us ground of distrust and apprehension. They
produced
a dispatch, implicating the honor of the Conde, as
regarded the terms of his parole, which forbade his holding
any communications with his government, until he should
be regularly exchanged. This letter, which we
ascertained
afterwards, was a forged one, was addressed to Colonel
Arredondo, informing him of the capture of St. Antonio
by the rebels, and imputing the mistakes, by which it was
brought about to others, informing him, that the rebels
were but a miserable disorderly rabble, and that if he
would come to his aid with his single regiment, he might
recapture the town, rescue him, and destroy the rebellion
root and branch at a blow.
They represented, that there could be no safety for us,
while men of such power and influence, and so regardless of
their obligations, were among us. They informed us, that
an American vessel had arrived at Matagorda from New
Orleans; and that they proposed to march the prisoners to
that place, and there embark them for that city; that here
they would be effectually removed beyond the power of
present annoyance, and would be safe, under the
protection
of the government. Finally, they averred, that the
prisoners themselves were desirous of this arrangement.
The project seemed so feasible, and this mode of disposing
of the prisoners so little objectionable, and the prospect of
its restoring amity and a good understanding among us so
VOL. II. 3
delightful, that very little opposition was made to it. The
vessel, we knew, had arrived, as stated, and there was no
doubt of their good faith. The proposition was adopted,
almost unanimously. The next question to be disposed of,
was, which should escort them, an American, or a Spanish
guard? To this the Spanish observed, that the Americans,
with their usual cautious policy, would certainly refuse to
admit prisoners conducted thither by armed Americans, lest
they should stand committed with the government. They
asserted, too, that it would assume the appearance of our
being principals, instead of being auxiliaries, as we professed
to be. In short, won by such arguments, they easily brought
over the Americans to consent to this arrangement also.
The council dissolved in great apparent concord, and the
articles were carried into immediate execution. The
American guard, which had hitherto had the keeping of
the chiefs, was relieved, and a Spanish one substituted in its
place. I immediately notified to the Conde, by Bryan, this
arrangement, and of the necessity which overruled me to
consent to it; and requesting him to let me know, in what
manner he could find any further use for my services
I promised still, to keep an unobserved eye upon all the
movements of their new guard.
Preparations were made for marching the prisoners for
Matagorda, in the afternoon of the same day. Rumors
began to be whispered among the Americans, that foul
practices were meditated in relation to these chiefs. I
imparted my apprehensions for the safety of the Conde's
family, to a few of my youthful associates, whom I knew
I could trust. Four of them agreed to concur in any
plan, which I would propose, to follow the family
unobserved
,
and aid them to the uttermost if need required.
It was a time of leisure and holiday in the camp,
and hunting parties were projected every day. We
made up a party, as if for hunting the buffalo. We
assumed the costume, and painted ourselves after the
fashion
of the Conehatty Indians, as was the fashion for the
Americans to do, to make a frolic of the affair. Bryan
drove before us a sumpter cart, and we followed on
horseback
,
completely armed and equipped as for the chase.
The sub-governor, Salcedo, the elder and the younger
Herrera, and four more of the principal Royal officers,
were started off on horseback, and as there was a ford
across the river, below the town, they took the direction
of the ford; while the carriage of the Conde, which
contained
the usual members of his family, followed by six
servants, all, of course, unarmed, took the direction of
a bridge over the river, which would lead them two miles
from the route, which the other party took. A numerous,
and strong escort, commanded by a full-blooded
Wachenango
chief, surrounded the prisoners on horseback, and
enclosed them in a hollow square. A lieutenant, and six
privates followed the coach of the Conde, and the
pretence
was, that beyond the bridge the two parties should
unite. The moment before we started, to get in advance
of these parties, Bryan slipped a billet into my hands,
containing but these words. We have it from a sure
source, that we are all to be assassinated. Save us. I
recognized, and I carried to my lips, the beautiful, and
firmly formed handwriting, that I knew so well; and I
vowed within myself, to save her or perish. My associates
were young, and high-spirited men, to whom such an
adventure
wore the highest charm, and on whom, I knew
I might count even to death. The odds in number would
make success only the more glorious, and the necessity of
making the dash upon the escort more desperate. We
cleared ourselves of the town, and placed ourselves on
horseback, in a deep ravine, fifty paces from the great
road to the bridge, where, we knew the carriage and the
escort would pass.
We had scarcely reached our station, before the escort
came in sight, riding at the usual speed of carriage-horses
on a journey. As the carriage neared us, we distinctly
heard the guard talking in voices, loud and undisguised,
that they were far enough from town, to execute their
purpose, and that the ravine was a convenient place, in
which to dispose of their bodies. Just before the carriage
came abreast of us, the lieutenant ordered a halt, and
dismounted. He opened the door of the carriage, and
ordered the Conde to come out, and prepare himself to
die. At the same time, a private seized the arm of the
Condesa, and dragged her out. The servants approached
the carriage, pale with consternation. Two or three
pistols
were discharged among them, and they put spurs to
their horses, and fled in the direction of the town. At the
same moment, we rushed from the ravine with a shout,
calling upon the servants to stop and aid us. The
pistols
that had not been fired upon the servants, were
discharged
upon us, and one of our party was wounded. I
brought down the lieutenant with my yager, and we made
a push upon them with our hunting-spears. They were
so much surprised by this unexpected attack, and alarmed
with the fall of their leader, that they sustained the strife
but a moment, leaving one of their number dead, and
another mortally wounded by a thrust of the spear. The
servants, seeing the turn of affairs, rallied, and returned,
and we remained undisputed masters of the field. We
examined the issue of the battle. One of the servants
was wounded slightly, one of my associates severely
though not dangerously, and a ball had passed through my
dress; and grazed my body, just so as to draw blood.
We made ourselves known to the trembling family, for
seeing us in the costume of Indians, they were scarcely
assured that they were not delivered from one danger,
only to fall into another. Blessed Virgin! exclaimed the
mother and daughter together; here is our deliverer
again, and the Condesa embraced me, shedding tears of
joy. We told them, that this was no time for
exclamations
or acknowledgements, that if they wished to avoid
another escort from St. Antonio, sent after them on the
return of the party that we had defeated, they must
make all diligence, to fly in the direction of Chihuahua.
We requested a place for our wounded associate, in the
carriage, and were compelled to leave the miserable
groaning assassin to his fate. The wounded servant
was able to mount on horseback, and we were ready for
moving. We requested the Conde not to lose a moment,
but to put his horses at their utmost speed, across the
prairie, in a direction for the great road, leading to
Chihuahua. The coachman, who had fled and concealed
himself in the ravine, returned, now that the skirmish was
over, and was on his box, ready to smack his whip. We
proposed, that in their flight, they should leave our
wounded
companion at a
meson
, which they would pass, and
that we would make arrangements, for having him
conveyed
in a litter, to St. Antonio. The family cried with
one voice, that it was better for them to return with me
to St. Antonio, and take their fate, than set off
unprotected
and unarmed, on such a journey, in which, they felt
confident, they should be overtaked and massacred. We
implore you, said the Condesa and her daughter, in an
agony of terror, not to leave us here, as the night is
3*
coming on. I consulted with my associates a moment
apart, and we unanimously consented to accompany them
that night on their way. We immediately proffered our
services, as a guard for the night, and even the father
confessor
,
raised his solemn voice in thankful
acknowledgements
.
The colonel was still seated in the carriage, pale
and yellow, grim and silent. We put an end to all
questions
,
exclamations, and debates, by assuring them, that
there was not a moment to be lost. For the sake of
expedition
,
we somewhat peremptorily ordered the father
confessor to mount the horse of our wounded associate in
the carriage, and bade the coachman drive away at his
swiftest. We started away furiously, our horses at full
gallop, over the naked plains, towards the Chihuahua
road.
My reflections, as we sped away, may be imagined.
This was the third time, that a wonderful combination
of events had connected me with the preservation of
Doa Martha. Destiny seemed to have taken the
management of bringing us together into her own
hands. Even during her interview with me, after the
capture of the town, amidst the seeming haughtiness and
irony of her manner, I flattered myself, that I saw
sufficient
indications, that I had my former measure of interest
in her thoughts. I was very sure, that the present
occurrence
would not lessen it. There could be no mistake in
the grateful countenance and glistening eyes, with which
she had just made her acknowledgements to me. My
associates
were delighted with the success of our exploit
and were enthusiastic in their admiration of the expressive
beauty of Doa Martha. They spoke in a language, which
neither the father confessor, nor any of the servants but
Bryan understood, and amused themselves in imagining
ways, in which they could become acquainted with her,
and in
badinage
, which of the two should relinquish his
claims to the other. When they appealed to me, whose
intimacy with her, apparently, they did not know, I
informed
them, that according to my calculations of the
latitude
and longitude of the female heart, the wounded
knight, who sat with her in the carriage, would be most
likely to carry off her favor, that in fact, I felt a strong
inclination for a share for myself. But, I informed them,
that the favored gentleman, reserved by the family for
that high distinction, was the Spanish cavalier, who was
also with her in the carriage. The circumstance, which
we all remarked, that he had not exerted himself at all in
the late rencontre, or even left his seat in the carriage,
called forth a burst of indignation, that such a swarthy,
ill-looking poltroon, should carry off such a prize. It was
merrily proposed, to tumble him out of the carriage, and
start him with a kick or two, towards St. Antonio, and
that the rest of us should decide by single combat, whose
claims should yield to the other. We all agreed, that
while we retained our Indian costume, and our cheeks
were so highly painted with black and vermilion, we should
hardly stand higher on the score of personal appearance,
than the ugly young Spaniard. This remark first
reminded
us, what a horrid, and assassin-like figure we made.
For in the excitement of the recent strife, we had not been
aware, that the young lady in question, had not seen, in
our case, faces exactly like that, ascribed to Adonis. At
the first stream, we dismounted, and washed away our
paint, and threw off our savage costume, which we had
put on over our common uniform; and we came out, like
neas in his
dbut
before queen Dido, blooming and
likely fellows.
The father Josephus could not have been much
delighted
with the society of a man, who had twice saved his
life, and had received nothing in return, but constant
enmity
and ill offices. Natural reflections of this sort,
occasionally
expressed by him in Spanish, the interjections
of shame and guilty consciousness, came over his mind,
and audibly expressed themselves. In a deep voice, he
ejaculated snatches of prayer and thanksgiving to his
patron
saints. He admitted to me, that it astonished him,
that Providence was calling him, once and again, to
receive
deliverance from a heretic;that I ought to consider
the influence, which, he was aware, I knew he had made
against me, with the family of the Conde, simply as a holy
and conscientious sacrifice, which he made of his gratitude
and his feelings, to the paramount claims of religion, and
he hoped that my enlargement of mind, as he was pleased
to say, would find that favorable solution of his conduct.
It gratified my pride, however, that heretic as he
appeared
to regard me, and of course out of the protection of
his saints, he seemed to depend at least as much upon
my aid, as theirs. Even if I turned my horse from one
side of the road to the other, he immediately turned his to
follow me. He clung still more closely to me than even
Bryan. All the rest he eyed with distrust and diffidence.
He enquired anxiously of me, when I thought of leaving
him; and suggested more than once, that if I would
continue
on to Chihuahua, he could and would secure for me,
a reception worthy of the preserver of the Conde; that I
should stay as long as I pleased, and be at liberty to
return
to St. Antonio, when I would. When he was
informed
,
that I calculated to leave them the next
morning
,
and still a day's journey from their destination, he
intimated
,
in order to secure my attendance, and a safe conduct
thither, which seemed to be things connected in his mind,
that if we would escort them he would henceforward
throw any influence he might possess in that family, into
the scale in my favor.
Towards evening, and on the banks of a little stream,
we were compelled by the condition of our horses, to stop,
and give them time to breathe, drink, and feed. We
judged, that we had already left St. Antonio thirty miles
behind us. The family had not yet recovered from the
terrors of their situation, or the apprehensions of pursuit,
and still cast looks of fear over the prairie, to see if
there were no horsemen dashing over the plain, from
that quarter, in pursuit of them. We assisted the mother
and the daughter from the carriage, and prepared sod
seats for them, on the cool margin of the stream. The
family were now formally introduced to their deliverers,
and we had more leisure and security to receive their
grateful compliments upon our behaviour in the recent
affair. We were instructed by what means they became
acquainted with the fate, that was intended for them, and
which, they doubted not, had actually befallen the other
chiefs. To us it was owing, that they were not now
inhabitants
of the unknown country, and their bodies
mangled
,
and cast into the ravine, the prey of the vultures.
The Conde expressed his thankfulness, and his
acknowledgements
in the frank and laconic style of a soldier; the
Condesa and her daughter with that dignity and grace,
which were peculiar to them. Colonel Pedro,
notwithstanding
all his propping of birth, fortune, and favor,
evidently
had a very unpleasant remembrance of recent
events, and showed in various ways, that he felt himself at
this time in
mauvais odeur
with the whole party. His
countenance exhibited a compound of instinctive
self-importance
,
malignity, conscious meanness, and present
degradation
,
which rendered it a study for a physiognomist.
He offered his hand to assist Doa Martha from the
carriage. She denied it to him and gave it to one of my
companions. She expressed commiseration for our
young wounded friend, while her mother was dressing his
wound; and he asserted, with great gallantry, that in the
place which he had occupied, and in the sympathy which
he had experienced, he was so happy, that he had scarcely
felt his wound, and that he would cheerfully purchase the
same pleasure again, with ten such wounds in succession.
Here we were, Patriots and Royalists, all perfect friends,
interchanging courtesies, and assuming that air of
confidence
and mutual good will, which belongs to old
acquaintances
.
A cold repast was prepared from provisions,
laid in by the Conde's steward. The fragrant
Parso
was
poured out, and we remarked among ourselves, how easily
and rapidly, the human mind passes from the extremes of
terror, grief, and gloom, to cheerfulness and joy. Our
American friends, though they could speak neither
French nor Spanish, were fine young men, and put in
requisition
all their courtesy. The traces of terror and tears,
were still visible in the countenance of the Condesa, but I
had never seen the same delightful expression in the face
of Doa Martha, but once before. I remarked, that I had
never before made so delightful a supper in my life, and
the reply of the Condesa was a cordial pressure of the
hand and a starting tear, which intimated, that she felt
the contrast of what was, with what would have been, but
for us. I remarked, too, that Doa Martha exerted
herself
,
to appear to the greatest advantage, before these my
young friends. Vanity whispered, that she was anxious,
that they should report favorably of her to me, and in
fact, I saw with great satisfaction, that her impression
upon them, was as it had been originally on me. They
manifested the romantic and extravagant admiration,
natural
to their years, and were delighted beyond measure.
Even the Conde seemed to relax something from his
settled
recklessness and gloom, as he looked upon the fair
and fresh faces of these fine young men, glowing with
health, benevolence, and hope. He uttered in broken
English, a wish that such gallant young men belonged to
his cause. Before the supper was closed, the Condesa
had made the same remark of them, that St. Augustine
had made so many centuries before of the pagan youths
brought from Britain to Rome, and which had been
afterwards
so handsomely applied in the same place to Milgon,
haud Angli, sed angeli
. I interpreted the compliment to
them, and the unaffected and heightened glow of
modesty
rendered the compliment more strikingly just.
We tarried not a moment beyond what was necessary,
for the repose of the horses, although I told them, I
reluctantly
brought myself to disturb so happy a supper. A
look passed between the Conde and his lady, and it was
intimated to Don Pedro, that he had better relieve my
fatigue, by taking my place on horseback, and give me
his seat in the carriage. A grim look intimated his
feelings
on the subject. But he had no alternative. The
arrangement was so much the more pleasant to me, as I
was really fatigued, and as it was a pleasure wholly
unexpected
.
Behold me then, just as the last ruddy
tinges
of the setting sun were fading from the plain, seated
quietly on the same seat with Doa Martha, and in the
indistinct light, which veiled the expression of inward
feelings from ordinary inspection, and yet allowed the heart
through the eyes to say unutterable things. The Conde
relapsed into his wonted silence, apparently giving up his
mind to gloomy cogitations. His lady sympathized in his
silence. My wounded companion spoke nothing but
English
,
and Martha, though she now and then made kind
enquiries of him, if his wound were painful, in that
language
,
did not avail herself of it for any thing beyond.
Short sentences, which said much in a few words, uttered
in a low and deep tone of feeling, passed between her and
me, in Spanish. It is wholly unnecessary, to give any of
the details of this conversation. We two, I will answer,
were abundantly satisfied, and it was of that sort, which
neither bears translation, nor telling, for the benefit of
others
.
The evening closed over us in profound darkness,
and it was well for us, that our road lay over a vast plain,
so smooth and unbroken, that the coachman drove on
with the same confidence by night, as by day. Had the
road even been difficult, such was our anxiety for our
charge, that we should have urged the hastening on by
night, as the less danger of the two. The Condesa fixed
herself in a reclining posture on the cushion, intending, if
possible, to sleep. She advised her daughter to do the
same. The difficulty for the latter, was to find a place
on which to recline. The pannels of the coach were
hard, and the position subjected the person to continual
jostling. My shoulder was somewhat softer and steadier,
and the thick epaulette not unlike a pillow. But it was a
couch not to be thought of. We had been, from our first
acquaintance, pitifully trammelled in our intercourse. I
leave you to imagine, how we availed ourselves of this
opportunity. Those, who were on horseback without,
were wearied beyond conversation. All within the
carriage
slept, or seemed to sleep. The fatigued horses
gradually declined to the pace of a snail. Martha too was
still, and seemed to sleep for half an hour. She then
started and raised her head. I asked her in a whisper,
if she had alarming dreams. And she answered, by
asking
in her turn, if I had a fever, for that the palpitations of
my heart, were so quick and audible, as to arouse her
from her drowsiness. I have no doubt, that her medical
science, enabled her to discriminate these palpitations
from those of incipient fever, or the throbbings of
patriotism
.
Joy has its term, as well as sorrow. I believe poets
have represented Night as slow and limping in her
progress
.
However that may be, the hours of this night, the
most charming in the year, flew. I looked with terror at
my watch, as it began to be light enough to discern the
position of the hands, to see if it were indeed
morning
.
We admitted that we had neither of us slept a
moment. We had fairly talked the nigh through, as we
ascertained that the drudging sun had not forgotten his
daily business. As if to atone in some measure, for
interrupting
such a delightful tte--tte, he made a
glorious
rise, rolling an atmosphere of mist from his path, and
presenting us a most impressive view of the grand summits
of the mountains before us, and at the distance of half a
league, the village on the banks of the river, with its
hundred
smokes beginning to undulate, and find their zig-zag
courses aloft. It was fortified, and belonged to the
Royalists
,
and the Conde admitted, that in that place he should
feel himself in safety. He begged us to enter the place
with him, for that, though we were nominally Patriots,
such intrepid and generous young men, as he was pleased
to call us, could have nothing in common with the
assassins
,
from whom we had rescued them, and to whom
circumstances had attached us. He assured us of the best
VOL. II. 4
reception that he could procure for us, and promised to
send us back with a Royal detachment, as a flag of truce,
to accompany us to St. Antonio. We thanked him, and
declined entering the town. We pointed out that it was
best for us, as well as him, that there should be no such
palpable demonstrations of our understanding one another,
as such a circumstance would evidence. This argument
was conclusive with him, but not so with his lady and
daughter. The countenance of the latter expressed the
very sentiment of the patriarch, when he wrestled, and
would not let the venerable stranger go. The carriage
stopped at my request. I begged Don Pedro to come up
with my horse. The Condesa grasped my hand, and for
a moment was unable to articulate from emotion. It
cannot be, she said, dear young man, that we part here
for the last time. I have always said of you, what this
last exploit must have proved to the conviction of
incredulity
itself. Our stars have placed us in the utmost peril
again and again, only to prove your intrepidity and
forgetfulness
of self. The same Providence, that has thus
mysteriously brought you to our aid, will bring us, in its
own way, together again, and under happier auspices. At
least, I will hope it. I will never forget you. The Conde
gave me his hand, and for the first time he evidenced the
impulse of kindly and grateful feelings. Would to God!
said he, noble young man, that you belonged to our king
and church! But that is impossible.
A Dios
. May I
some time have a chance to show you, that I remember
what you have done. The
padre
grasped my hand, and
uttered
A Dios
, in his peculiar deep tone of voice. Thanks
were offered to my associates with the greatest energy.
The wounded young man had a satisfactory share of
sympathy
and gratitude. He mounted his horse with agility.
and expressed himself quite well; and as we turned our
horses' heads, I heard something from Don Pedro,
mattered
in a voice scarcely audible. It was between a curse
and a parting salutation, and we gallopped away.
CHAPTER II.
Estas lagrimas tristes, una a una,
Bien Ias debo al valor extraordinario.
How sleep the brave, who sink to rest,
By all their country's wishes blest!
Collins
We
had a safe return to St. Antonio. Extreme
fatigue
,
want of sleep, and encountering the jests of my
companions, who had contrived to make out how things
stood between me and Dona Martha, were the only
unpleasant circumstances of our journey. Every lover
has felt, how harassing, under such circumstances, is the
repetition of such jests, until they are stale. As soon
as we entered the town, we had plenty of matter for
discussion, of a more serious cast. We had had the most
incontestible evidence, that the chiefs of our party could
practise the basest treachery, and the most cold-blooded
assassination. It is true, we acquitted Morelos of any
participation in this abominable plan. But it was not to
be disguised, that he was carried along by the current of
opinion, and compelled to give the sanction of his name to
acts, which ought to have been equally revolting to his
understanding and his heart. We had discovered, even in
him, a recent leaning towards counsels, to retaliate on the
Royalist chiefs, the cruelties which they had practised
in the case of Hidalgo, and the other Patriot chiefs, that had
fallen into their hands. We regretted bitterly to
remember
,
that all revolutions, in the nature of things, mingle
much of this horrible spirit of revenge, blood, and murder,
with them. We vindicated our own self-respect, on
finding
ourselves associated in the same cause with men
capable
of such fiend-like projects, by charging them upon
the character of human nature, and the natural reaction of
things, when men, who have been reared in ignorance,
oppression, and cruelty, gain the ascendancy, and become
treacherous and bloody tyrants in their turn. We had
occasion to take other, than abstract views upon the
subject
.
We were not only associated with men, capable of
weaving such plans into their cause, but we had
counter-acted
a most important part of their plan. We had
rescued from their bloody hands the chief of the
Royalists
and his family, and had slain an officer of their
party, in effecting the rescue. It is true, we were
disguised
as savages. But we had little reason to suppose,
that these adroit and practised villains would not
understand
the true state of the case. Inquiry would be made,
and we should be found to have been absent. Then
again, we concluded, that if they had succeeded in the
assassination of the other chiefs, as we had no doubt they
had, they would be sufficiently occupied in defending
themselves against the sensation and inquiry it must
naturally create, to guaranty us from suffering a very
severe scrutiny for what we had done. It was my opinion,
that such a wanton and unnecessary outrage, would not
have been perpetrated, against the known feelings, and
most pointed remonstrances of the Americans, until they
had settled the principle, to set us at defiance. It was
my judgment, on our return to the camp, instead of
allowing
them to inquire into our conduct, the Americans ought
to unite, to a man, and with arms in their hands, insist
upon instituting an inquiry into the conduct of our chiefs
in this affair. They had practised upon us the grossest
deception, and we had a right to inquire, why they had
not fulfilled their engagement of honor with us, to escort
the chiefs of the Royalists safely to Matagorda, as they
promised us they would. I insisted, that if we allowed
this most detestable act to pass without remonstrance or
investigation, history would justly represent us as having
aided and abetted the act. With myself, I determined
that if this outrage was generally approved by the
Spaniards
,
and even winked at by the Americans, I would wash
my hands of any farther participation of the cause.
When we arrived in camp, we found every thing in
greater uproar than ever. Our worst suspicions were
confirmed
.
The infamous villains, who had volunteered as
the agents of the Patriot chiefs, on purpose to massacre
the Royal commandes, had perpetrated their purpose with
every trait of cold-blooded cruelty. They shot governor
Salcedo, who resisted them. The six other chiefs they
bound, and cut their throats, and threw their bodies into a
ravine. They had the unblushing effrontery to return to
the camp, clothed in the dress, and wearing the watches,
ornaments, and insignia of these unfortunate, but naturally
excellent men, whose only crime was, that they had been
born and bred the adherents of the Spanish despotism.
Our conjectures, that we should be recognised as the
authors of the escape of the Conde, were changed to
conviction. The Spaniards, with lowering countenances,
pronounced the name of the lieutenant whom we had
killed, and pointed us out as we passed through their
camp, applying to us, in connexion with that name, the
4*
epithets,
Americanos diablos
. The Americans, in their
quarters, were conversing together in groups, with the
deepest apprehension and alarm on their countenances;
and the most rancorous mutual suspicions existed between
the partisans of the two nations.
Many of the Americans, in the utmost disgust and
horror
,
left the camp, and returned to their own country,
quite relieved in their minds, as to their sympathy with
the oppressed Spaniards. The ease with which we had
beaten the Royalists in every fair encounter, fostered the
hopes of others, that they should yet come at their
reversion
in the mines. Others flattered themselves, that better
counsels would ultimately prevail, and that these horrid
deeds were only the natural effervescence of slavery, in
passing into a state of anarchy and licentiousness.
Morelos
and Bernardo were each struggling for the
ascendancy
.
De Benvelt, shocked beyond measure by the late
transaction, resigned his command as soon as the news
arrived in the camp, and shut himself up with his
daughters
.
No words could paint their disgust and terror, when
I returned to them. Bryan seized me by one arm, and
they by the other, begging me for the love of God, to fly
this herrid country forever, and follow the footsteps of
those whose faces were already set towards the United
States. But for one circumstance, I should have
consented
at once. One of the strongest impulses of our
nature still detained me here, and gave me patience to
watch the signs of the times, and wait the issue of events.
With this cherished family, and one or two like-minded
friends, among whom was my classmate, I spent the
evenings and the days, almost confined to the house. We
made a mutual compact, that if our affairs continued to
have the same unpromising aspect, after ten days we
would withdraw, and make our way as fast as possible to
the United States, and De Benvelt consented to wait
patiently till the end of those days.
Eight of them had elapsed with us in the most
profound retirement, when a crisis occurred, which once
more united us all by a feeling of common danger. The
late massacre had not only disgusted and disheartened
the Americans, and palsied every noble patriot arm among
the Mexicans, but it operated in rousing the slumbering
spirit of the Royalists to the utmost pitch, not only of
exasperation and fury, but of daring and courage. They
were determined that neutral and half-way measures should
be renounced. The Patriots had set the example of
extermination
,
to which a very considerable party of the
Royalists had always been inclined. At the head of that
party was Colonel Arredondo, a warrior of great
experience
,
trained in European contests, and uniting strong
sense, great cunning, and calm and calculating selfishness,
to
the discipline, intrepidity, and unshrinking character of
a soldier, inured to scenes of violence and blood. Age,
circumstances, and perhaps natural character, had
rendered
the Conde timid and vacillating in his plans.
Sometimes
he inclined to strong, and sometimes to moderate
measures. Sometimes he was inclined to be merciful,
and sometimes cruel; and these feelings rose or fell with
the elevation or depression of his spirits, or with the
preponderancy
or inefficacy of the counsels of Don Pedro, or
the father confessor. He sometimes wilfully acted out his
own conceptions, and at other times gave himself up entirely
to the leading of these counsellors. Under the excitement
created by the late deed of horror, the party of Colonel
Arredondo came into complete ascendancy. The Conde's
name was still affixed to acts, but the real and efficient
command was in him. Strong measures were immediately
taken. The interior of Mexico was in the same kind of
calm with a volcano, after a terrible and recent eruption.
Royal troops were drawn from all the cities in the internal
provinces. The regiment of Cadiz was united with that
of Vera Cruz. No officers were commissioned for the king
among the provincials, but such as had given a pledge to
their future course by acts of violence and outrage against
the Patriots.
In ten days from the late massacre, we heard that a
large body of Royal troops, no longer commanded by the
Conde, but by Colonel Arredondo, was rapidly advancing
upon St. Antonio, and had already passed the Rio del
Norte. The Patriot chiefs were panic-struck with the
intelligence. So long as the Conde was in command,
they felt that they could play a double game between us
and the Royalists. They felt a confidence, that if a
treacherous policy called upon them to sacrifice us, they
could at any time make their peace with him, by going
over to his standard. Not so with Colonel Arredondo.
With him they could hope but one of two alternatives,
the spear, or the rope. They came to us, one after the
other, exculpating themselves from participation in the
late massacre. They proposed a court of investigation,
and professed themselves willing to subject to military
execution the persons who should be found to have
originated
tha project. They implored us to resume our
several commands, offering even to give that one of our
number, whom we should elect, the supreme command.
We again held a conclave consultation, and we disagreed
among ourselves. But our young men possessed an
eagerness to make themselves known in exploit and
action
,
and an adventurous spirit of enterprise, that courted
such an occasion for display, and nerved them to
perseverance
.
I was undecided what course to pursue.
The good nature of De Benvelt, won by the seeming
repentance of the Patriot chiefs, and by seeing the
manifestation
of this spirit of reconciliation, inclined him to
resume his command. I followed his example. De
Benvelt
,
my classmate, who was appointed aid of Bernardo,
myself, and the Americans generally, were received by
the Spaniards with loud acclamations. Bernardo had
manuvred to obtain the supreme command; and Morelos
had left the army in disgust, retiring to the city of Mexico
in disguise.
Our measures were soon taken. We moved out of town,
where there were such temptations to riot, and relaxation
of all discipline, as rendered it a place utterly unfit for a
camp, in such an emergency as ours. We took post at a
considerable distance from town, in the large stone buildings
belonging to the Mission establishment. They afforded
us an admirable military position. They would yield only
to a regular siege, and were sufficiently massive, to resist
any thing but heavy battering cannon, which the foe had not.
Wood and water in abundance were near, and it was a
fine position to command forage and provisions. I gave
my opinion, when it was called for, and it was, decidedly,
to intrench our camp here, and wait for the enemy. But
other counsels prevailed. We had express upon express,
that Arredondo was coming upon us. The Americans
exulted in this intelligence, for they flattered themselves
that they should now see real fighting. All former
victories
had been won, as they said, with too much ease.
We had come to despise our enemy, and the confidence
consequent upon this contempt, proved our ruin.
Eight miles in advance of the Mission establishment,
there is a considerable stream, which in winter runs with a
full current up to the banks, and in summer becomes almost
a
Rio Seco
, or dry branch. It was now midsummer, and
the weather excessively hot. We crossed this branch,
which, contrary to the ordinary course of things in the
summer, afforded an abundance of pure water. The
banks were, as is common to such streams in the summer,
high, rugged, and utterly impassable for cavalry, except
directly by the ford. Immediately beyond this river, the
road forks, one branch leading to Labahia and the coast,
and the other to the Parso and Mexico. There was a fine
green alluvion on the opposite bank, and it was completely
sheltered from inspection by a precipitous and wooded
hill. Here we took post, and were determined to await
the foe, whom we knew to be near. We were sure that
we had intercepted all communication of intelligence, and
that the Royal troops would begin to descend the hill, in
full reach of our muskets, before they would discover
us. We calculated to attack them encumbered, as their
troops always are, by a vast quantity of baggage, and
a multitude of useless camp-followers, and in the
confusion
of such an unexpected attack, put them to rout
and flight. But their experienced commander was not
so to be caught. He had his policy too, and, to our
ruin, it proved to be the better of the two. Our scouts
reported his troops to be at two miles distance, and
then at one, and in fact we could now clearly hear the
blowing of their bugles, and the rolling of their drums.
Soon after we saw an officer on horseback, in a splendid
uniform, come dashing up to the summit of the hill, not
fifty yards from us. He rose upon his stirrups, and took
a glance of our camp, in the twinkling of an eye. Fifty
rifles were discharged upon him, but he turned his horse,
and fled so swiftly, that he escaped, and carried
intelligence
of our proximity. Our impetuosity was the cause
of our first mistake, in inducing us to leave our fine
position
by shade and water, on such a burning summer's
morning. But an impulse of consentaneous movement
operated upon us. Horse and foot mounted the hill. We
met a considerable force, chiefly provincials, attacked
them, and in less than fifteen minutes routed them, so that
they fled, and left a few dead behind them. We
commenced
a hot pursuit, in which we were fatigued,
inflamed
with the heat, and suffering from thirst at the same
time.
In about two miles from the first attack, we met a
second
and larger detachment, which the inexperienced
Spaniards
felt assured was the main army. The Americans
comprehended in a moment, that both these attacks were
feints, intended only to draw us from wood and water, to
fatigue and harass us down, and render us an easy
conquest
to their fresh and untired troops. Nevertheless, we
rushed upon the second detachment, and they resisted us
for nearly half an hour. Considerable blood was shed,
and the resistance seemed to be obstinate. They in their
turn retreated. Mere fatigne, and exposure to the heat,
compelled a short halt, and arrested our pursuit. We
were ready to expire for want of shade and water, and
the Americans wished to wait for the enemy here. My
classmate, aid of general Bernardo, was sent to the
provincial
troops on the left, intimating the command of
Bernardo
,
that we should fall back to our morning position,
and there await the main body of the enemy, which had
just been ascertained to be entrenched four miles in
advance
of us. This command was perfectly in accordance
with the wishes of the Americans. But the provincial
commander of the horse, equally ignorant, obstinate, and
impetuous, sent word back to Bernardo, who had but
recently
arrived from the United States, and whom he
affected
to consider as an American, that the Americans might
retreat, if they chose, but that his Spaniards were not used
to leaving their business half done, and that they would
advance upon the Royalists, either to beat them, or join
their standard, just as the Americans chose. We saw in
a moment, the nature of our condition. If we undertook
to retreat to our camp, the great body of provincials,
would immediately desert to the Royalists, and in all
probability, we should be attacked by their united force.
We were well informed, that the road between us and
Arredondo, was a burning sand, in which, even the men,
in marching, would sink up to their ancles. We had a
small, but a fine park of brass artillery. We were aware,
that the carriages would plough and sink into the sand. We
were perishing with thirst, and it was burning noon.
Under
all these disadvantages, we might possibly beat the
enemy, and on the whole, it seemed the lesser danger, to
attempt to do it. We made another unavailing effort, to
bring the provincial commander to listen to reason, and
then marched to the attack. Words would be wanting to
describe the fatigue of this march. One horse after
another gave out, and one cannon after another was left,
bedded in the sand. Even the horses we rode, could
hardly wade along. A little past the middle of the day,
we descended a small eminence, and saw fifty paces in
advance of us, a wide barricade of green felled trees.
We had time to observe nothing more, and had scarcely
caught a glimpse of this, before we were saluted by a
park of artillery, concealed behind the trees, and a
regular
,
and murderous discharge of musquetry by platoous.
Our ranks were literally mowed down, and I was for a
moment left alone. The Spaniards recoiled from the
first fire; but the Americans rushed upon the foe, and
clambered over the trees, and formed upon their right.
We brought up the only two field pieces that had not been
left in the sand, and sustained the fight on somewhat
more nearly equal terms, than at the commencment. But
we were unable to make any impression upon the Royal
troops, behind their breast-works. They continued to
pour their fire upon us in platoons, with so much
precision
,
that it seemed a single discharge, and they
swept away the advance of our force with their artillery.
With such terrible odds against us, we kept up the fight,
for more than two hours, and had once succeeded in
completely
silencing the fire of their battery. In fact, they
commenced a retreat, and a company of the Royal
provincials
actually did retreat, as fast as possible, quite to the
Rio del Norte, and there reported, that the Royalists were
completely routed. At the same moment, that the
Royalists
were retreating from us, we, worn down with fatigue,
sinking with heat and thirst, and more than the half of us
slain, we commenced a retreat too, and this was the
second
time, that I had seen two armies retreating from
each other. At this critical moment, when a single
firm charge upon them would have gained us the victory,
our provincial commander, wheeled with his horse and
joined the standard of the enemy. The affair was
decided
in a moment. The Royalists faced about. Their
horse wheeled upon our wings, and we were in danger of
being completely surrounded. At once, every thing was
rout and confusion. The weary and spent, the wounded
and the foot soldiers, were speared on the field, or trampled
VOL. II. 5
under foot by the horse. De Benvelt and myself saved
ourselves by the fleetness of our horses. My classmate
was afflicted with fever and ague, when he came into the
field. His horse had been tired down; he had fastened
him to a tree, and had fought on foot. On his retreat, he
found his horse had broken away. The enemy was
advancing
,
and he was too much exhausted to fly, except on
horseback. He would have been speared, but for the
assistance of a compassionate Spaniard. He spoke
Spanish
with great fluency, and he begged the Spaniard,
por
el amor de Dios
, to catch his horse for him. The
Spaniard
advanced, coiled the rope, always hung about his
horse's neck, cast the noose, caught his horse, and
assisted
him to mount. I saw him mounted, and fleeing,
and I made the best of my way, with De Benvelt and
Bryan by my side, after him. We should have been glad
of the wings of the wind, for we still had the Royal horse
in view, advancing upon us. It was a sickening sight, to
see many of our poor fellows fall from their horses,
literally
unable any longer to keep their seat in the saddle,
and resign themselves up to their fate. De Benvelt was
corpulent, and somewhat unwieldy from age. He was
obliged to stop from fatigue. The brave and honest man
requested me with tears in his eyes to fly. Be you a
father, said he, and brother, and all, to my tear girls,
and tell them, where I saw the end of the tamned
liberties
.
He had scarcely given me this charge, before we
were assailed by three or four provincials on horseback.
This occurrence called back his courage. The faithful
Bryan, who had fled in advance, wheeled and came back
to our aid. Bryan fought like a giant, and we drove
them back upon the main body, killing one of their
number
;
but not until De Benvelt had been severely wounded
by a pistol shot. The wound and the bleeding seemed
to furnish him with new vigor. We fled again, and met
with no more annoyance, until we reached San Antonio.
Exaggerated reports of our defeat and ruin had
preceded
us, with the natural addition, that De Benvelt was
mortally wounded, and that I was slain. I leave you
to imagine the scene of our reception by his daughters.
The reality, sad as it was, was so much more tolerable
than their expectations, that they were well prepared to
receive their wounded father; and when I assured them
there was no doubt but he would do well, and that all
that they had to do, was to prepare to fly, the idea of
escaping
from the country was so pleasant to them, that
they instantly set themselves to preparing for flight. A
counter revolution commenced in San Antonio, with
the first news of our reverse of fortune, and there was
almost as much danger in delay, from the inhabitants,
as from the enemy. We were not more than an hour in
advance even of them. All my American compatriots,
that were neither wounded, sick, nor exhausted, escaped,
and among them, as I afterwards ascertained with high
satisfaction, my classmate, who arrived safe in Louisiana,
sick of fever and ague, and destitute of every thing, and in
a most wretched plight, but content, and happy to have
escaped the spear. I obtained by dint of money,
friendship
,
and entreaties, for we were obliged to put every
engine
in operation, horses and a waggon. They were
harnessed
,
and a mattress thrown into it, and my wounded
associate thrown on the mattress in half an hour. The
daughters fled with me on horseback. The travelling
and the jolting inflamed De Benvelt's wound, and pained
him to agony. He was earnest and eloquent again with
me and his daughters, to fly and leave him to his fate.
They felt with me on this point, and I assured him, that
to leave him, was a thing not to be thought of, and that
we should all share his fate, be it what it might. That fate
was, that we should be all arrested and taken. Twenty
horsemen pursued and overtook us, within a few miles
from the town. Resistance being out of the question, we
surrendered ourselves, and were carried back to the town.
We were thrown into the same
calabozo
, where all the
prisoners, that had not been speared, were secured
together
.
It was a kind of Calcutta Black Hole, and we were
tortured with heat, thirst, and vermin. It was, indeed, a
rude receptacle for ladies like the Misses Benvelt. But
in this terrible community of misery, where groans,
exclamations
,
and calls for the deliverance of death, rung
around us on every side, the very excess of our
wretchedness
,
inspired these sufferers with the tranquil and
tearless
indifference of despair. I made an effort to influence
the keepers, to allow another place for these young ladies.
But I either spoke to the deaf, or incurred only contempt
and ridicule. They entreated me to make no further
exertions of this sort, assuring me, that nothing should
separate them from their father.
In the blindness of their exasperation, the Royalists
found no place for the exercise of mercy or discrimination.
Old or young, guilty or innocent, male or female, the
beggar swarming with vermin, or these young ladies
clad in the richest dresses, so that they were known to
have adhered to the Royal cause, or even to be connected
with those who had, were all placed in one predicament.
The blood even now chills in my veins, as I remember,
how the women fell on their knees before me, as I was
retreating on St. Antonio, entreating me with clasped
hands, and with the usual
por el amor de Dios
, not to
leave them to the vengeance of the Royalists. In the
calabozo
, we learned the fate of the remnant of the
retreating
Patriots, that escaped the fatal field of Palos
Blancos, and the first fury of pursuit. A party of the
Royal horse took a nearer route to the town, anticipated
the fugitives, and placing themselves on the banks of the
river, where three different roads from the battle field met
they here spread a net, which caught in its meshes every
individual. Most of them were spread on the spot.
Fifty of them were reserved for more enduring sufferings,
and were now in prison with us. I was aware, that if the
Conde had been here, with his usual ascendency in the
councils, De Benvelt's family and myself should have
been spared. As it was, there was scarcely a hope, that
our fate would be delayed, until the Conde could intimate
his will in respect to our case. It was even doubtful, if
he now retained influence enough to arrest our fate, if he
wished to do it. We only knew, that the Royal chiefs
were deliberating upon our fate, during this first dreadful
night in this place. The fate itself was in the awful
suspense
of conjecture. We could think of but a single
friend, who would be disposed to make an effort for us,
and that was Bryan; who took a different street in
entering
the town, and had not been heard from since. The
groans, the ejaculations, the agonizing prayers to the
Virgin
and to the saints, the ridiculous vows of silver shrines,
and images to their patron saints, if they would interpose
for their escape, the curses of despair, in this stifling place
of utter darkness, during this dreadful night, can never be
erased from my memory. I considered it a kind of
representation
of the case of the spirits in the final prison of
darkness. I am not now able to analyze my own
reflections
.
I certainly was not above the instinctive love of
5 *
life, and fear of death. But the cause, it seemed, was
irretrievably
ruined. Doa Martha could not henceforward
come within the scope of the wildest hopes. Here were
beautiful girls, reared like the lily of the valley, who
awaited their destiny in tranquillity. All about me was
the frantic agony of cowardly despair. I am afraid I
shall never be again so resigned to die, as I was then.
Nothing struck me more, this sad night, than the
deportment
of the daughters of De Benvelt. At first, I
mistook
their sedateness for the tranquillity of despair. It
was the exertion of the noblest fortitude. It was the
high-principled sensibility of strong minds, called into
exercise by the most tender and sacred motives that can
swell the human breast. It was filial love, manifesting
itself
in a holy effort, to smooth the passage of their father
to death. There was to me, in the same predicament with
the rest, a thrill of sublime feeling, as I witnessed these
beautiful girls, whose faces, in the day of their prosperity,
the winds of heaven had not been permitted to visit too
roughly, in the midst of darkness, shrieks, and despair,
with the prospect of military execution in the morning, for
their father, for me, and probably, for themselves,still
preserving an unalterable tranquillity. They must feel it a
privilege, if we might be permitted to die without torture.
They seemed to regard it all as nothing. It appeared, as
if they had shaken hands with life, and had relinquished all
its prospects without a tear or a regret for themselves.
All the sympathies of their hearts, were for their father
and me. Theirs was not the prosing exhortations to
patience
and courage, in heavy and set phrase which most
would have uttered, on a like occasion. They evinced
an elastic tranquillity, which is naturally infectious, and
which seemed to say in every word and action, The
bitterness
of death is past for us, and all that we think and
say, is for others. While occasional and uncontrollable
bursts of sorrow, stifled the voice of the father, they
tenderly
begged him to be calm, and expressed themselves
happy, that they were not torn one from another in
succession, imposing the penalty of a lingering death upon
the survivors, but that they were likely, now, all to depart
together.
The earliest impressions of religion, are those that
come to our aid in such emergencies. The daughters
remembered
the prayers and the rites of their infancy, in
Fader land
. They recited those prayers, and separating
ourselves, as much as we could, from the groaning and
frantic rabble about us, they knelt beside their father, and
went through the simple and affecting service of the Saxon
Lutheran church, for persons in the last extremity; and
they sung a hymn, so much the more impressive for its
quaint and ancient rhymes, and for their touching and
sweet voices, which I had never heard in song before.
These prayers and this hymn infused something of their
enthusiasm and fortitude into the heart of their father.
Indeed, my sweet girls, said he, I am right glad,
since it must be so, that we are like to make this journey
all together. My old heart could not stand a moment the
thought of leaving you alone, among this tamned
peoples
.
From their father, they turned to me. There was
always
something touching in their strong German accent,
and peculiarly at this time, when the condensed emotions
of their hearts, gave it a peculiar and thrilling intonation
of tenderness. You have been to us, said Wilhelmine,
father, and brother, and friend, all in one. The full
expression
of our feelings to you at another time, might be
mistaken. But, surely, at this time, we may be allowed
to say all that is in our hearts. We die, and we wish to
die, with our father. But it seems hard, almost mysterious,
that so young and so good a man, who has been
everything
to our father and to us, and who might have
escaped
,
should be brought here to die. It must be a hard
case to you, for you love, and are beloved, and yet you
alone, of all this frantic multitude, seem to be calm.
Can I, I asked, who am a man, and who wear the garb
of a soldier, and who knew when I embraced this
desperate
cause, that it did not promise to be a holiday business,
can I shrink from death, when I see women so young, and
so beautiful, manifest so much fortitude and resignation to
their fate? Sophy mournfully added, But we love none,
but our father and you. We leave not a being to mourn
for us. We are strangers in a strange land, and the name
will perish with us. Tell me, Is it selfish or not? There
is a kind of dreadful satisfaction to me, that we are all
alike involved, and that there will be no wretched
survivor
,
after we are laid in our last bed. I would die
rather than give pain to my dear father, to my sisters, or
to you. Can it be, that I am selfish in finding satisfaction
in the thought, that we are all going together?
My tear Wilhelmine, said the father, it makes me
almost feel in heaven, to hear you sing. Pray sing me
now that sweet song, that you sung one evening when I
was low-spirited on the mountain. She immediately
complied
,
and just murmured to a wild and plaintive air in
Spanish the words, of which the following is a very exact
translation.
Oh! let the soul its slumber break,
Arouse its senses, and awake,
To see how soon
Life, with its glories, glides away,
And the stern footsteps of decay,
Come stealing on.
And while we eye the rolling tide,
Down which our flowing minutes glide,
Always so fast;
Let us the present hour employ,
And deem each future dream, a joy
Already past.
Let no vain hope deceive the mind,
No happier let us hope to find
To morrow, than to day;
Our golden dreams of yore were bright,
Like them the present shall delight,
Like them decay.
Our lives like hasting streams must be,
That into one engulphing sea
Are doomed to fall;
The sea of death, whose waves roll on
O'er king and kingdom, crown and throne,
And swallow all.
Alike the river's lordly tide,
Alike the humble riv'let's glide
To that sad wave;
Death levels poverty and pride,
And rich and poor sleep side by side
Within the grave.
Our birth is but a starting-place,
Life is the running of the race,
And death the gaol;
There all those glittering toys are brought,
That path alone, of all unsought,
Is found of all.
Say, then, how poor, and little worth,
Are all those glitt'ring toys of earth,
That lure us here?
Dreams of a sleep, that death must break!
Alas! before it bids us wake,
Ye disappear.
Long ere the damp of death can blight,
The cheek's pure glow of red and white
Has pass'd away;
Youth smiled, and all was heavenly fair;
Age came, and laid his finger there,
And where are they?
Where is the strength that spurned decay,
The step that tripped so light and gay,
The heart's blithe tone?
The strength is gone, the step is slow,
And joy grows weariness and woe,
When age comes on.
While these excellent daughters were thus arming
themselves
,
and evincing that noble passive fortitude, which
seems the appropriate gift of the best women in such
circumstances, the wretched father passed from prayer
and tears, to gloomy silence. Sometimes all the father
would rise within him, and burst forth in irrepressible
grief. My sweet girls, said he, forgive your silly
father for undoing you. Oh! dat pad tay, when I took
up for this wicked people, and the tamned liberties. Let
the tay perish, when I left my good stone house, and
brought my daughters among this tamned peoples. They
are no more fit for de liberties than wolves. Mein Gott!
forgive me, for these follies. I have brought ruin on you
all, my tear girls, this good young man, and myself. In
this style of self-reproach he continued until he wrought
himself into paroxysms. But why go through with the
horrors of that dreadful night! The unabating heroism and
tenderness of these daughters did not remit, and the father
finally became settled in his tranquillity, and laid himself
down on his straw, and soon fell into a profound slumber.
The girls retired into a corner by themselves, undoubtedly
to hold communion with death and with God, before whom
they expected so soon to appear.
If I had been disposed to look on my fate with dismay,
I could not but have caught something of their tenderness
and elevation of heart. I retired too, and the prayers
that came spontaneously to my lips, were those which my
good mother used to say to me, when she put me in my
bed, in my infant days. Our Father, who art in Heaven,
said I, thy will be done! These sublime words were
repeated again and again, and I hoped that I should not
disgrace my manhood, when I should be be brought to the
last dread trial.
When the gleams of the morning began to pour light
enough through the fissures of our
calabozo
, to render
darkness visible, what ghastly faces, what agonized
countenances did this pale and unearthly light exhibit?
Here were nearly a hundred people, expecting this
morning
to exchange time for eternity. Few of them had
principle, rational pride, true courage, religion, or the
hope of immortality. They clung to life from instinct
and appetite, and had no hope beyond life, and no motives
to fortify them against the fears of death. The morning
light, by bringing the prospect of death immediately before
them, redoubled the shrieks, ejaculations, and groans,
until the very confusion and excess of the misery, took
away its distinctness and horror. A supply of the coarsest
food, and some water, were put into our dungeon, and we
were notified, that immediately after taking our food, we
should be ordered out to receive our sentence.
In half an hour the drums rolled at our door. The
keys rattled. The heavy door grated on its hinges, and
we were called out, one by one, by an officer, who recited
our names from a scroll. A regiment guarded us. De
Benvolt, enfeebled by fever, his wound, and the agony of
a broken heart, required the support of his daughters; and
it was a sight to go to any heart, to see these fair and
innocent looking daughters supporting their father amidst
the fierce and pitiless array of a regiment of soldiers, to
the place of execution. While the two elder daughters
each held an arm of their father, the trembling Annette
leaned upon mine. The one half of this group were women
and children, or persons too old or too young, to have been
committed by any overt act, and were here on account
of their affinity with those who had. The groans and the
sobbing were drowned by the rolling of the drum, the
shrill notes of the fife, and a dead march played by the
full band.
Half a mile from the town, in a hollow which descended
gently in the manner of an amphitheatre, was the place of
sentence and execution. In fact, in this case they were
the same thing. A priest, in his pontifical robes, stood by
with a crucifix in one hand, and a burning candle in the
other. The name of every person, save two or three,
was recited and the persons pronounced guilty of
treason
,
rebellion, and heresy, and they were sentenced to
immediate execution. They were then called out in the
order of their names on the paper. They were allowed
but two minutes for confession. A file of soldiers stood
ready, and a tall officer, whose swarthy face was almost
covered with his whiskers and mustachios, held up his
sword as the signal of discharge. A handkerchief was
loosely folded over the face of the prisoner. He was led
to a central point, ordered to kneel down, the sword was
raised. The victim was removed, and another took his
place.
I am as little disposed to relate, as you would be to
hear, the horrors of this execution in detail. It was
protracted
with the most tedious minuteness, apparently that
we might have a long and full taste of the misery of it.
The parties stood directly by me. I know not how it
happened, but although I expected in a few minutes to
take my turn, I felt a strange curiosity, to observe both
the feelings of the victims, the moment before they were
led away, and their spasms after they had received the
discharge. And never, since the days of the guillotine,
was there a more thrilling spectacle of the manner in which
different persons are affected with the immediate prospect
of death. Some uttered a cry and fell down, and were
lifted up and carried away to receive the shot. Others
with more physical and moral self-control, had made a
violent effort, and marched to the place in sullen
submission
.
Some were affected by a strong spasm, which
appeared
to commence in some part of the frame, and to diffuse
itself over the whole body. The countenances of some
wore the paleness of death. Of others the whole
circulation
seemed to have mounted to the head. The effect of
the discharges upon us who witnessed it, and who waited
for our turn, was equally various. Some gave a shriek.
Others a long, deep drawn, and quivering sigh.
Wilhelmine
gave a faint groan, grasped her father's arm more
closely, held in her breath until the discharge, and then
cried, Thank God! One more is delivered from his
burden. Upon De Benvelt every discharge operated
with a stimulant effect, and drew out an execration upon
the treachery and cowardice that had brought them there.
We observed that the females, and those too old and too
young to have borne arms, were excepted and reserved.
Remarking this, the daughters uttered an exclamation
of terror, lest their father should be called out, and they
left behind. Most of the Spanish prisoners had passed to
the priest, and had joined with him in some brief rites,
VOL. IL. 6
appertaining to confession. Our names were among the
last on the scroll, and we were reserved to witness the
manner in which all the rest received the consummation
of their fate, before we could know ours. I believe we
began to have a presentiment, from the very manner in
which the officers looked upon us, that we should be
remanded
to the prison.
Towards the close of the execution, they called out a
fine young man, the handsomest provincial I had seen.
I had noticed him frequently before. He had been
pointed
out to me at the fandangoes, as the finest young man
in New Spain. He had been an ensign in the Royal
army; but being in heart a republican, he had deserted,
and joined the Patriot standard. He was pointed out in
all circles, as gay, amiable, modest, and gallant, devoted
to his friends, and an universal favourite among the ladies.
His faults were free-thinking and gallantry. He was just
the kind of character to call forth the deepest sympathy in
his favour. They called on him to confess and prepare
for execution. Away, said he, with these miserable
mummeries! Reserve them for the wretched cowards
that in battle leave their standard, and go over to the
enemy. Thank God! my mind needs not that kind of
support. I am a young man; but I have known how to
enjoy myself, and I know how to die. He had a most
delightful voice, and he sung a stanza of a patriotic ode,
in fashion at the time, with thrilling and prodigious effect.
When they came for him, a general feeling of horror
passed
over the countenances of the survivors. Even the stern
faces of the soldiers, who performed the execution, relaxed
to pity, and many a tear rolled down to their mustachios.
He took up a little favourite dog, that clung to his steps,
and passed it to a friend, who was looking on, and as he
gave away the dog, we witnessed a slight faltering, as of
overpowering feeling. But he recovered in a moment,
and walked to his place with a countenance not only
undaunted
,
but gay, and with a firm and elastic step. They
were preparing the handkerchief as usual. But he calmly
waved them off. I wish, said he, to gain converts
to the Patriot cause, by showing these people how a
Patriot looks when he dies. Look you all at the face of
a Patriot soldier. At the same time he cast a calm and
imposing look round the multitude. He put his right
hand over his left breast, requesting them to aim at his
hand. He waved the other gracefully over his head,
shouting,
Viva la republica!
Two more were executed.
De Benvelt, his daughters, myself and five other
Americans
,
and the women, two or three old men, and the
children, were remanded to prison, to wait, as we were
told, further orders in our case. The bodies of those
that had been executed, were thrown into a gully,
promiscuously
,
and so slightly covered with earth, that the wolves
and the vultures, as I was afterwards informed, removed
the earth, and made them their prey.
When we returned to the
calabozo
, we were not
indeed
so crowded, and the parties were delivered from the
fears of immediate death. But even the absence of the
crowd of the preceding night had its horrors. What had
become of so many people, but a few hours before so
clamorous in their griefs, and sharing with us the sorrows
of existence? Mothers had lost their sons, wives their
husbands, and there was more than one young Spanish
mother, with her long and swarthy visage, and her
intensely
black eyes suffused with tears, nursing the babe at
her breast, whose father had just been shot down. Words
convey but a feeble idea of such a scene. Memory has
preserved it in my mind with a painful fidelity. The
daughters and the father were still more earnest in their
thanksgivings for deliverance, than they had been in their
prayers of preparation.
A number of weary days elapsed in this dreary place,
without bringing any change or any intelligence of what
was going on aboard. My fair companions continued the
same noble and affectionate deportment to their father
and to me, as before. They lay down on their mouldy
straw, and endured their evils, and swallowed their
miserable
fare with cheerfulness. When I felt it necessary
to recur to the uncertainty of our case, as yet unsettled,
they assured me that they were prepared for any form
either of joy or sorrow. A trial now presented itself to
them, which appeared to be too heavy for even their
fortitude
to sustain. The gay and honest-hearted Saxon had
been free, and rather epicurean in his habits, and had
been so long accustomed to the luxuries of the table, and
the cleanliness and comfort of an opulent mansion, that
his wound, confinement, miserable food, filth, and vermin,
together with the gloom of his prospects, and the agonizing
feelings of a father at beholding his daughters in such a
condition, strongly affected his general health. His
countenance
grew pale and bloated. His habit was feverish,
and he pined in remembrance of what had been, over the
coarse and unsavory provisions that they brought us. I
was prepared, said Wilhelmine, to see him fall by a
soldier's death, when I expected to share it with him. It
is too much to see him linger and die in this way, with
the sad prospect of surviving him in this horrible place.
The other daughters had their forebodings too, but neither
of them ever spoke on the subject in the presence of the
other. It was only when the father and the other
daughters
were beyond hearing in the dungeon, that the
remaining
one relieved the oppression of her heart in consulting
with me on this gloomy subject. My own anticipations,
it is true, were of the same kind. I saw that he could
not long survive this state of things, in this place. But I
spoke as cheerfully as I could, and bade them hope,
assuring them I was persuaded something would soon
happen to brighten our prospects.
My prediction was soon accomplished. I had all along
indulged the hope, that the affectionate Bryan would not
be idle, if he lived. I entertained a confident hope, that
he did live. He was well mounted, adroit, shrewd, and
one of those men, who have the character, and maintain
the standing, that render them acceptable to all parties. I
had, also, a faint impression, that I had seen him, on the
day of the execution, mixed with the spectators and the
Royal troops, and wearing the badge by which the
Royalists
distinguished themselves from the Patriots. I
had not a doubt of his fidelity, and was satisfied that
if, indeed, it was he, the badge was only assumed the
more effectually to serve me. When my hopes of aid
from that quarter, were almost extinct, and I had begun
to think, that he was dead, or had forgotten me, as I was
standing one evening by the small grated aperture, by
which the little air and light we had, was let in upon us,
and while I was attempting to catch the last glimpses of
the sun, sinking behind the hills, I heard a slight noise, as
the scratching of something on the logs, outside of the grate.
Bringing my face in contact with the grate, I saw a paper
on the end of one of those immensely long reeds, that
grow by the streams in this region. I put my fingers
through the grates and took it. To my surprize and joy,
it was from Bryan, and ran thus. God bless your
Honor
!
6*
I am here all the time, and would stay more, but I am
afraid they will guess, what I would be at, bother them!
I hope, your Honor don't think, I am an Orange man, for
all I wear the king's ribband. They'll always find Bryan
as true as steel. I thought, may be I could do something
for you at the Conde's So I turns king's man, and goes
there. The Conde is a gentleman after all, for he has
tried to get you and your friend's family off. But the
young Don, and the father, and the colonel, and all the
rest, the devil burn them, were for shooting you down,
like the rest. They are a little afraid of the Americans.
I can see that. The most the Conde could do, was to
have you brought to Durango, and tried over before him
and the rest, but the young Don swears that he will see
to the hanging of you there. `Two words,' says I, `my lad,
to that bargain.' So they mean to bring you and the
Dutchman
to Durango, and hang you there, Devil roast them, and
then put you up on the tower, like dead crows in a
cornfield
,
to scare the rest. Never you fear. There are
some in the Conde's palace, that love you better than
I. We will have you off yet, in spite of devil or dobbie.
And in truth, in the evening, we were directed to
prepare
ourselves the next morning, to be marched to
Durango
,
and be tried on the charge of rebellion. Accordingly,
at an early hour in the morning, the drums again rolled
at the door, and we were taken out, and put in a six-horse
waggon, and under the guard of a full company of Royal
regulars, we were started for Durango. Nothing marked
the monotonous sadness of this journey, but the accustomed
sweetness, patience, and sadness, of the young ladies, and
the declining health and spirits, and the low mournings of
the father, as the jostling tortured his wound. He and I
were pinioned fast, which rendered the journey more
intolerable
.
We had a couple of sub-officers in the waggon
with us, another circumstance, not at all to have been
desired
.
At night, we were removed from the waggon with
the most guarded caution, and were placed on straw in
the wretched
mesons
, to find what sleep we could,
devoured
by vermin, and surrounded by rabble of all sorts,
and guarded by soldiers, drunk with
agua ardiente
, or
vino mezcal
. After a number of weary days and nights,
so spent, I saw the young ladies reaching their heads from
under the canvass, and their eyes were filled with tears.
`Yonder, said Wilhelmine, clasping her hands, yonder
are the mountains of Durango. How often have I looked
at their blue heads, when I was free and happy. I, too,
aroused myself at this intelligence, and looked abroad. The
evening was drawing on. I observed a cloud of dust at
a distance, nearing us with great rapidity. Our escort
comprehended, that there was trouble in the wind, for
they immediately prepared themselves for an attack.
In five minutes from the first view of the dust, we
discovered
a body of horse, completely armed, and with the
Patriot badge. They shouted, a rescue, in a voice of
thunder, and in the next instant, the two parties were at
blows. Whatever amount of interest we felt in this
contest
,
we had nothing to do, but to be spectators, as patient
as we might, and await the issue. Among the hundred
contests of this sort, that took place unrecorded, during
the bloody struggles of the revolution in Mexico, this was
one of the fiercest and most hotly contested. The
matter
was decided by the sabre, and each party appeared to
be entirely in earnest. Wounds were mutually given, and
heads cloven without mercy. At one moment the ladies
shrieked, and the Royalists seemed to prevail. At the
next, a fortunate blow from a Patriot sabre, inclined the
scale of victory towards them. It was the first time I had
seen brightness return to De Benvelt's eye, since the fatal
field of
Palos Blancos
. Even his phlegm and
despondency
were thoroughly aroused, to see the issue of this
combat. Mein Gott, said he, as he saw a successful
Patriot cut with the sabre, dat was well done! Dunder
and blixum! give them another my poy of the same sort.
The Patriots were the more numerous party, and, as was
generally the case, fought the fiercest. But the Royalists
sustained the fight, until the small area of the battle-ground
was slippery with blood, and the greater number, on both
sides, were either killed or placed by wounds
hors de combat
.
The Royalists, completely surrounded, at length threw
down their arms, and called for quarter. The captain of
the Patriots, accompanied by Bryan, whom I saw from the
first, playing his part manfully in this business, came up to
us, all covered with blood, as they were, and shook us by
the hand, informing us that we were free. The captain
of the Royalists was slain. The Patriot chief informed
the next surviving officer, that his only object in this affair
was our rescue, that having achieved that purpose, he had
nothing further to do with him or with us. He ordered
the prisoners to clear themselves, and to let him see them
so far away, as to leave no fear of their annoying us, and
that he should then shift for himself. He, however, very
kindly offered us his services, and advised us, to fly in the
direction which should seem to promise us the fairest
chance of escape from the Royalists.
While the Patriot captain was attending to his own
wounded, and the Royalists gathering up theirs, Bryan
gave me the particulars of this plan for our rescue. The
Conde had so far evinced himself an honest man, that,
against every effort of his intended son-in-law, and the
father confessor, he had exerted himself to the utmost, to
obtain our acquittal, and permission for us to depart
unmolested
to the United States. He urged my character,
and my interposition for his rescue from the assassins, as
good ground for extending this favor to me and my friends.
He was overruled in both requests, and had the further
mortification to hear himself charged in the court, with a
guilty dereliction of principle, and a leaning towards the
Patriot cause. It was so obvious to himself, and every
one else, that he had no longer any officient influence in
the council, that he resigned his command in disgust. A
coolness existed between him and colonel Pedro and the
father confessor on the subject. He took Bryan home
with him, and they planned together the means of our
rescue
,
as we were coming to Durango, according to the
order of the council. It was no difficult thing, on an estate
like his, containing many thousands of tenants, all
personally
known to him, and generally devoted to him, to find
enough brave and trusty men, and Patriots in principle, to
form the company, that effected our release. But,
said Bryan, your Honor will see, that he never showed
a finger in the business. The business was all managed on
the back stairs. As soon as your Honor and your friends
here are off, he will seem as sorry for your escape, as the
rest. They will send out for you, and may be, put a
price on your heads, as they have done for others. He
will agree to it, all one as the rest, ay, and will join in the
hue and cry against you, just as though he were at a
buffalo
hunt.
Here then we were, on an open plain, forty miles from
Durango, free indeed, but one of the party wounded, and
weak, three ladies to encumber us, and surrounded with
pursuit, danger, and death, on every side. The Patriot
captain proposed our taking any number of the horses,
and any provisions, arms, and amunition, that we wished
for in our flight, assuring us, it would be but right, to levy
these articles from the Royalists. We consulted with
him, as an experienced and trusty adviser, respecting our
best course for flight. Between us and the United States,
on the only practicable rout, were three hundred leagues,
and the Royal army, with scouts and patrols, by whom we
could not fail to be intercepted. Besides, the sinking
strength of De Benvelt, was entirely unequal to any
distant
flight. In front of us was a city, strongly garrisoned
by Royal troops, and our only efficient friend obliged to
assume the appearance of enmity. The Patriot
commander
only waited, until we should elect the direction of our
flight, and was impatient to be gone. The sun was sinking
behind the blue summits of the mountains, and their shadows
already covered us and the scene of battle with a cooling
shade. Let us fly, said Wilhelmine, to these
mountains
.
Any direction is better, than to remain by this
scene of carnage. I have always loved mountains. They
lift their sheltering heads, in their unchangeable repose,
and remind me of the unfailing shelter over the friendless,
the unchangeable protection of that Omnipotent Being,
who formed them. Let us call on the rocks and the
mountains to shelter us. Let us dwell in dens and caves
of the earth, and escape forever from man, and these
sickening scenes of battle and blood. You shall be our
shepherd. We will be shepherdesses. We will find a
soft and mossy couch for my poor father. We will nurse
him, and cheer him, and sing to him; and we will live on
fruits and game, and water from the spring. All this
pastoral counsel was uttered in a tone, that partook partly
of dismay, and the terrors of the recent combat, and the
groans of the dying, that still rung in our ears, and partly
of a wild, half frantic, and assumed gaiety. But on
second thought, it struck the captain, and it struck us all,
as the most prudent plan, which, in present circumstances,
could be devised. We hailed Wilhemine's rhapsody, as
the result of inspiration. The younger sisters and the
father fell in with the proposal. Bryan declared, that he
was with us for life and for death, and that where we
went, if we would allow him, there he would go too. To
the caves of the mountains, was the general voice. The
captain gave us counsel and aid. The waggon that had
brought us, was unloaded of all unnecessary articles.
From the slain we were furnished with an ample supply
of every kind of arms and amunition. From the baggage
waggon of the Royalist troops, which they had left on the
field of battle, provisions, axes, implements, and whatever
articles a hasty consideration of our probable wants dictated,
as requisite, we took. We had six horses to our waggon,
and we selected two of the best, that were left on the
field, and fastened them by the bridle to our waggon.
We were most scrupulous on the score of provisions,
exhausting
the Patriots, as well as securing all that had
been left by the Royalists. Bryan mounted as driver of
our waggon. We disposed of our party, amidst sacks of
bread, and pikes, and muskets, somewhat more
comfortably
,
than we had come thus far. The Patriot captain
walked apart with me, and we held a private
communication
for a moment. The Royalists were already gone
with their wounded beyond sight. We tendered solemn
and grateful thanks to our intrepid deliverer. He wheeled
with his company in one direction. We waited until the
measured gallop of their horses, was no longer heard
over the plain. Then we took a direction at right
angles
to the road, and in the nearest direction to the
mountains
.
We arrived at their bases, just as the last twilight was
fading from the sky. As is usual, where the smooth
prairie
is continued to the foot of mountains, we were arrested
by a high perpendicular wall. We groped along upon its
side some little distance, until a narrow opening admitted
us under an immense projection, rising like an arehed roof,
and its summit reaching an hundred feet in advance of its
base, over the plain. Such shelters are common in such
situations, and the wild buffaloes, we saw, had found an
asylum here before us. It offered us a most welcome
shelter
for the weary De Benvelt and his daughters, from a
tempest that seemed to be approaching. It was
barricaded
on three sides by impassible heights of rock. At
the entrance, we placed our waggon, as a defence. We
unharnessed our horses, and took the usual precaution to
prevent their escape, and turned them out to their repast
on the prairie. Bryan and myself put ourselves
cheerfully
to the operation of wood-cutting. Our hoary cavern
was soon illumined with a blazing fire. We prepared a
couch for the weary and wounded Saxon, of the cushions
and buffalo robes of the waggon, and we placed him, as
he said, more at his ease, than he had been, since the
battle
.
We made a table of the planks of the waggon.
Barrels
of bread and provisions, furnished us with chairs.
We brought forth cold provisions, and excellent
Parso
,
which we had plundered from Ferdinand the VII.
Bryan
would even add chocolate to our preparations. With
blankets and cloaks we formed cushions for the ladies.
The gathering tempest of thunder and rain, would shield
us from pursuit, until another day should enable us to
hunt a deeper and securer retreat. We were at once
most comfortably sheltered from the storm and from
danger
,
and the open front of our shelter gave us a full and
sublime view of the objects below us, as they became
distinctly
visible for the moment by the gleams of lightning.
The whole surface of the boundless prairie below us, in
the intervals of the lightning, was lurid with the feebler
and darting radiance of millions of glow-worms. Cheered
by the domestic blaze of our fire, we sat down to our
repast
.
Nothing would persuade Bryan to lay aside his
observance
,
as a servant, and take his place at table with us,
as we requested him. But all his Irish vivacity was
visible
in his good nature and fresh countenance, as he
waited upon our table. The contrast of the tempest and
thunder abroad, compared with our late loathsome abode
in the
calabozo
, and our pinioned imprisonment in our
waggon, as we journeyed to Durango, thoughts of our
destiny
after we should arrive there, the bloody contest
which had effected our deliverance from these dangers,
the shelter, the comforts, the smoking chocolate, and the
fragrant
Parso
, received, under these circumstances, a
zest, which nothing else could have given. De Benvelt ate
with an appetite, which he had not known for a long time,
remarking, that he should be content to live here, during
the rest of his days, and never give the Royalists any
more trouble about the tamned liberties, if they would
only
let him alone, and leave him to the care of his son, and
his dear daughters. If we could only find him some safe
retreat like this, in the mountains, and never let him see a
tamned Creole more, he was sure, that he should recover
of his wound, and gain his flesh and his appetite again.
To hear their father talk in this way, brightened the faces
of the daughters. They began to chat with their wonted
reckless gaiety, and to find themes for conversation and
VOL. II. 7
amusement, in their late adventures, and to descant upon
the new character of shepherdesses, that they proposed to
assume. We began to compare our situation here, with
our condition upon mount Mixtpal, and the ladies, whom
recent events had inspired with new dislike of the Creole
character, considered it a circumstance in favor of our
present condition, that we had none of them here. We
even took it as a good omen for the future, that
Providence
,
on our first approach to the mountains, just as a
storm was impending, had furnished such a desirable
shelter
,
as we might, at other times, have sought whole days
without finding. The only circumstance to be regretted,
was that in the morning, we should be obliged, in regard
to our future safety, to renounce it, and seek in the
mountains
for one more remote from inspection, and more
easily
defended. To our present retreat we could be traced
even by the marks of the wheels, and the feet of the horses.
There was no danger at least for this night. Every thing
that could, would be sheltered, while such a storm raged
abroad. We jointly agreed, that in gratitude for such a
great and happy deliverance, we ought to wave all
apprehensions
,
cast our fears, as far as we could, to the winds,
and place a simple trust in Him, who had, thus far, so
graciously
and wonderfully delivered us, and who thus called
upon us, to trust Him for the future. To this strain of
conversation, De Benvelt said, Dat is right, my tear
girls. This chocolate tasted right good, and I feel the
wine warm at my stomach. Hear how the storm rages.
Mein Gott! what would have become of me, if we had
found no shelter? Mein Gott is good. Tear girls, say me
de prayers, in de pure old Tuch, and sing me that sweet
hymn, which talks about
fader land
. Without a second
request, the daughters began to chant together, the Saxon
Lutheran service, and having finished it, their sweet voices
chimed in concert, as they sung their father's favorite
hymn. As they sunk on their bended knees on the stone
pavement, the thunder roaring abroad, the light of our
fire casting its flickering shadows upon the grey vault of
stone above us, tears of thankfulness and sensibility
streaming
down their cheeks, and their flowing locks of auburn
shading their fair faces, as with a veil, our devotions
might have vied in interest with those of the Vatican.
Bryan, deeply affected, retired to a little distance, and
began
to chant the evening service to the Virgin. Taken
all together, it was an occasion to inspire the proper
feelings
of prayer and thanksgiving in any heart, that was not
incurably hardened against those feelings. I am sure,
that the best feelings of my heart went up in thankfulness
to the Divine throne. Our devotions finished, Bryan and
myself, with a little direction from the ladies, prepared
rustic, but entirely comfortable couches for the family.
As for him and myself, we scraped together an abundance
of fresh leaves, spread cloaks over them, and lay down
on a couch, sufficiently soft for wearied soldiers.
With the first gleams of morning light, Bryan and I
arose, and took a long ramble on the mountains. The
sun was bright in the sky, and the morning glittering with
the renovation, in the sultry days, derived from a copious
shower, when we returned to the family. They had
slept profoundly, and were refreshed, but had become
painfully anxious on account of our absence. We took
a breakfast as cheerful as our supper. The clouds were
all dispersed, and the mountains reeked with rolling
wreaths of mists, that look so beautiful upon their
summits
,
after a great rain. The perfect clearness of the day,
admonished us, that it was now we ought to be
apprehensive
of pursuit. I had found a practicable defile for our
horses, far into the mountains. However reluctantly, we
were compelled to leave our waggon here. De Benvelt
felt himself so much refreshed and better, that he thought
he was able to ride. We packed part of our baggage on
the three spare horses. We secured the provisions and
articles, that were reserved to be carried up at another
ascent, and, Bryan and myself occasionally on foot, we
began
slowly to wind round the spiral line of the defile.
De Benvelt soon complained of pain and fatigue, and
shortly after declared himself unable to endure his
situation
any longer. The daughters dismounted, and we
placed their father at his ease, under the shade of a tree,
and left them to fan him, and bestow upon him their filial
attentions, while Bryan and I went in search of a place,
which should afford the three requisites, that our case
called
for, shelter, secrecy, and defence.
At an elevation of perhaps twelve hundred feet, and at
the distance of a league and a half from the base of the
mountains, we found a limestone cavern, of narrow
entrance
,
which two persons might be able to defend against
a hundred and yet the opening admitted light and air,
sufficient for habitance and comfort. At the foot was a
small table plain, beautifully variegated with herbs and
flowers, sheltered by precipitous cliffs, and shaded with
fine sycamores, and still further accommodated with
a rivulet of pure and cool water, which gushed out in
different
springs at the foot of the rocks. A full mile of the
defile below us, in all its windings, was completely under
the eye, from the foot of the cavern, so that we could
discern the approach of assailants, a considerable time
before
they could reach us. Paroquets, red-birds,
mocking
birds, nightingale sparrows, and a variety of unknown
birds of beautiful song and plumage, flitted and carolled
among the branches of the sycamores. Alpine flowers
were associated on the margin of the stream, with the
splendid cups of the tropical flowering plants. A thousand
butterflies of great size, and of all the hues of the rainbow,
fluttered from flower to flower. On the
marjoram
and
thyme
, hummed the mountain bee. Multitudes of
humming
birds, of plumage indescribably splendid, and quick
as lightning in their motions, darted from flower to flower.
The capability of the place to supply our wants, for a long
concealment, was still increased by the circumstance, that
herds of wild cattle, deer, and buffaloes, must pass near
this cavern in winding their way up and down the mountains.
Bryan held up his hands in astonishment. Now,
said he, in the name of St. Patrick, this thing is a sure
sign that your Honor is under the care of the saints.
Where could we find another such a place upon the
earth? It seems just made to our hands. In truth,
taken all in all, it was a little paradise, hid in the
mountains
exactly for our case. The only difficulty was, to
get our family moved up to it. I left Bryan to cut down
the bushes at the entrance, and take the rude, but
necessary
preliminary steps, towards fitting the cave for
habitance
,
while I descended to assist the family to ascend to
it. We had left them at the midway distance between
this place and the plain. De Benvelt had been refreshed
by rest, and the cool of the shade. The family mounted
their horses again. We drove the baggage horses before
us, and we were tediously employed four hours in
mounting
up to the cavern. The family were as much delighted
with the place as we had been. In front of it was range
for our horses, and with the little fitting up, for which we
had ample means, we should have a commodious mansion,
7*
in perfect keeping with the sweet little plain in front of it.
Bryan had seen enough of the new countries, as he called
them, to have learned all the little fetches and contrivances
of a backwoodsman. And to a person who has been
bred in cities, where all the labors of the mechanic arts
are so divided, and carried to so high a finish, it is
incredible
how comfortable a backwoodsman will render his
cabin with only skins of the chase, and a few of the
simplest
tools and implements. We furnished our beds with
frames fixed on crotches. We had our permanent table.
The Spanish beard, or long moss, furnished soft and
elastic mattresses. The young ladies, with the
cheerfulness
and even gaiety of rustic brides, fitting up the cabins
of their bridegrooms, put their hands to the furnishing and
arranging the comforts of our new abode. We made
their father and them a comfortable place for sleeping,
before night, we projected a hundred improvements for
the morrow, and our thoughts were already expatiating
in the natural range from utility to ornament; for the
young ladies observed, that they intended to be
shepherdesses
of taste, and genuine Arcadians, and would have
matters within to correspond with so sweet a place without.
We had our prayers at the close of the day, and our
hymn of thankfulness from our fair chaplains. As his
daughters assisted De Benvelt to his clean and fresh moss
couch, Now, mein Gott, said he, be thanked. This
is the first place where I have stretched myself at ease,
since I have been hunting the tamned liberties.
CHAPTER III.
De una madre nacimos,
Los, que esta comun aura respiramos,
Todos muriendo en lagrymas vivimos;
Desde que en el nacer todos Iloramos.
The clay was moistened not with water, but with tears.
I have
seen and survived the horrors of the different
Mexican revolutions, changes almost as fruitful in
treachery
and unnatural crime, as the revolution in France.
I have acted my own part in these revolutions, the true
character of which has been so little known abroad.
My heart has sickened at the sight of guilt and crime,
and I had my share in the general suffering. A sadly
pleasing remembrance remains of the days and months
that I spent with this amiable family in this shelter of
mountains. The storm of nature sometimes raged below
us, and the more terrible storm of the human passions
was passing in its wrath over this devoted land. In
travelling
over this immense country, I have seen the ravages
of war, fields, districts, wide tracts of country desolated,
and swept with the horrid besom of war. I have seen
sacked towns, half-burnt houses, every fire extinct, the
streets filled with ruins, and the bones of men, children, and
domestic animals scattered in the court-yards. But this
mass of tragedy was too vast and indistinct for me to feel
and comprehend. I bitterly and minutely remember the
joys, sufferings, and sorrows of this narrow, secluded, and
amiable circle. But even these sorrows, while they have
left a mournful recollection, soothe me in the
remembrance
.
Our communion had a kind of holy serenity.
Even our gaiety was marked with an air of pensiveness.
Our solemn conversations sometimes turned upon the
grand and beautiful nature spread below us. But the
natural vivacity of the young ladies, changed by the late
fearful events, had undergone a complete revolution.
Even in the midst of their laughter, something marked
that the heart was sad. Most of these conversations,
which more often turned upon the vanity of earth, the
nothingness of all that which gives scope to the hopes and
fears of men on the earth, have passed away unrecorded,
and are remembered only by Him, who writeth down these
thoughts in a book, from which they cannot be erased.
If you are a lover, as you appear to be, of the simplicity
of nature, you will allow me a little more detail, while I
dwell upon the short and simple annals of a residence,
which includes, for that time, the history of people wholly
disconnected from the world. They record the sorrows
of people, who endured them in silence and without
repining
.
Three of them have passed away from the ills of
life. On my memory is pictured the sweet spot, where
they lingered and died. I see the parallel graves at the
foot of their favorite sycamore. I can fancy that I hear
the wind mustering in the hills above where they sleep,
and that I can see the shadows of the passing clouds flitting
over their solitary graves.
We had provisions sufficient for our subsistence for a
month, and we had plenty of powder and lead. It pained
me, that we were obliged sometimes to select one from
the droves of buffaloes and deer that we saw almost daily
winding their way up and down the mountains. Bryan
had removed to our cave all the remainder of our baggage
from the foot of the mountains. We had every article of
the first necessity. And we had made more arrangements
in the way of comfort, than you can imagine, with such a
limited stock of materials, could be brought about. Still
there were some luxuries, that use had rendered to them
as to others, indispensable. How the want of these things
affects our comfort, is seldom imagined, until that want is
actually felt. Bryan feared nothing, and was obnoxious
to no party. He proposed himself to undertake an
expedition
to Durango, to procure these articles, and that
he might bring us back a history of what was transacting
in that world, from which we had fled. He was not only
fearless, but he was faithful; and he saw with instinctive
quickness the views of others, and would always be on his
guard. Of course we could have entire confidence in
his management of that part of his commission, which
must be left to his discretion, and full persuasion that he
would commit neither himself nor us. He felt himself
honored by this entire confidence, and undertook his
commission
with alacrity.
There must be many Robinson Crusoe arrangements,
for we had all been so sick of murder and crime, and had
been so nearly on the verge of destruction, that we
determined
to remain concealed here, until the revolution took
a more decided character, or until we could return to the
world with safety, or at least as long as this place would
serve us as a retreat. I had acquired some skill and
experience in
buckwoods
management. I was chief
hunter. Bryan was envoy extraordinary; and, when not
on a mission, was servant, cook, cabinet-maker, upholsterer,
and blacksmith. The young ladies each took their day
in superintending the kitchen establishment. Indeed, until
our interior arrangements were completed, which was a
work of some weeks, our provinces were in danger of
interfering
,
and our duties were confounded. An important
part of this arrangement was the adding to our natural
defences squared timbers, so connected and adjusted, as
to render our habitation in front one of those rude
block-houses
,
so well known by the first settlers of our country,
as a strong defence against the Indians, and in which a
couple of resolute men have often sustained a siege against
hundreds of the savages, and finally driven them off. Our
horses, when not employed, fed quietly in the little plain
in front of our dwelling, and we found them indispensable
in removing these timbers to their destined place. In
raising them to their ultimate situation, the ladies put their
fair hands to the work, and even the Saxon, cheered at
the sight of these rustic labors, hobbled to give us a lift.
We had plenty of carabines, and we taught the young
ladies the use of them. I had the pleasure, as a military
man, of drilling them to their exercise. They shrunk at
first from their lessons, and shut their eyes, and turned
pale at the discharge of their pieces. But when I
explained
to them, that the use of these carabines, added to
mine and Bryan's, might be the means of defending us
against any common force that might be sent to apprehend
us, and that it might save us all, as well as their father,
from another captivity, they no longer blenched, and were
soon trained to their proper place and duties, in case of
attack. I complimented them liberally on their progress,
and they answered, that the motive was sufficient to
render
them Amazons. These were our rougher duties.
But we had our assigned hours for pursuits, more proper
to their character. We wanted books, but we had
drawing
paper, and materials for drawing, from the baggage
wagon of the Royalists. We had the most beautiful
specimens
of flowers, and shrubs, and evergreens, the palmetto,
the jessamine, the meadow-pink, the magnolia-cup, and
the nymphea-nelumbo, the most splendid of the tribe, and
the American aloe, and the agave, and these decked our
parlor with more than oriental magnificence and perfumes,
beyond Araby the blest. The ladies put themselves
to the task of learning to transfer their rich hues and
graceful forms to the paper. Another part of their time
was devoted to religious exercises, and I soon learned to
unite my voice with theirs in their beautiful Saxon hymns.
Another part of the time was devoted to conversations, in
which the Saxon gave us his adventures and wanderings,
up to the day when, to use his invariable phrase, he
started to hunt after the tamned liberties.
Our table was luxurious. We had meat of course in
the greatest abundance and variety. The mountain
potatoe
grew plentifully in the terraces of the mountains,
and was an excellent vegetable. There were many wild
fruits and roots, whose properties Bryan knew, that added
variety to our repast. With sugar we could well dispense.
In almost every hollow tree was a swarm of bees, and our
residence flowed with honey, if not with milk. Bread,
tea, and coffee, were the only articles of the first necessity
that we could not supply, and we reserved our small stock
of
Parso
for the wounded and feeble father, and for
emergencies.
Our several departments and functions were soon
settled
with great exactness. Our more servile duties we
so arranged, as to become a part of our pleasures. We
passed much time in the quiet and delightful conversations
suggested by the time and the place, in dwelling upon
the past, in talking over the characters with whom we
had been conversant, and the dangers from which we
had escaped, which seemed the more appalling, when
viewed from this secure and quiet retreat. Even the
Saxon seemed almost to forget that he had seen better
days, to participate something of our increasing
cheerfulness
,
and to thrive in the bland feeling of this serene
and mountain atmosphere. Now and then the dark
outline
of the future, and the remembrance of the past, came
over his mind like a cloud, and the prodigious force of
other and long established habits, was felt, and then he
relapsed into silent and gloomy meditation.
I felt, I believe, more than the rest, one great and bitter
privation, the want of books. And the want of this luxury,
to one who has been used to it, until it has become a
necessary, is soon felt to be one of the most tormenting
privations. To converse with friends is delightful, and
will stand in stead longer than almost any thing else. To
converse with nature is delightful, but the eye tires in this
converse, if the mind does not. To converse with God
must be the highest, as it is the holiest enjoyment; but in
this employment our weak physical elements soon inform
us, that we are not yet emancipated minds. Books are
the only calm, quiet, unsating, untiring companions, that
we always meet again with the same pleasure as at first.
The enjoyment of reading is to the mind, just what the
colour of green is to the eye, such a happy blending of all
the elements of enjoyment, as is capable of being tasted
forever without satiety.
To supply the want of these, as well as of the other little
articles, we proposed to start Bryan on the projected
expedition
to Durango. He was to procure bread, the staff of
life, and wine, which, as he prepared it, was life itself,
and tea and coffee for the physical nature, and books,
the food of the mind. We formed a variety of schemes
for obtaining these articles in safety, and the result was,
that he should go to Durango, and find a retired residence,
making himself as little known as possible; that he should
purchase the requisite supply, and transport them on his
horse to a convenient distance from the city, and secrete
them in a place, whence he could convey them all at one
load, in our wagon, to our residence. We laid down
abundance of precautions, which, after all, might be of
little use, as it was impossible to foresee and guard against
emergencies, and we were, after all, obliged to repose the
main trust in his own native sagacity. We started him on
the best and fleetest of our horses, and it was, after all, a
solemn day, when we took leave of this faithful and
cheerful
creature.
We could again say, that time passed both swiftly and
pleasantly in this rural and isolated place. Banished
from earth, its passions and cares, we only felt so much
excitement, as gave us the pleasurable consciousness of
existence. The summer, which in that climate possesses a
sky so bright and cloudless, had the fervors of its sun so
cooled by the mountain breeze, as never to render the
heat uncomfortable in the shade. Its perfect elasticity
and purity inspired the delicious sensations of high health,
and invigorated exercise of all the powers of life. We
had most delightful morning and evening walks, under the
shade across our little table plain. We climbed the wild
cliffs, and found out the dells of the mountains. The ladies
often amused themselves with trials of agility and daring,
which could easiest scale a precipice, or stand with the
firmest head upon the dizzy eminence, that looked down
upon the dark caverns below. We hunted out those green
slopes on the mountnins, where the yellow trumpet-flower
exposes its broad cup with a lustre, surpassing the richest
gilding. We paused for rest and refreshment in some one
of those sweet spots of shade, verdure, springs, prospect,
sublimity, and loneliness, which nature seems to have
VOL. II. 8
formed in these recesses, for her own peculiar enjoyment.
What conversations, alternately gay, tender, and solemn,
we had! How often for these amiable and
unsophisticated
girls, who felt and loved nature to a passion, have I
culled the wild flowers, and brought forth all my little
stock of botanieal knowledge, and quoted all my best
remembrances
of poetry in my own language, where
according
to my judgement, the most consecrated stores are
in preservation, a language which they now well
understood
,
and which their enunciation and German accent
rendered delightful. Not unfrequently, our thoughts, taking
their flight from the summits of the mountains before us,
soared to the Eternal throne. For though our religious
conversations might not have been deemed exactly
orthodox
,
when measured by any of those graduated sliders,
which doctors in theology have invented for dividing the
necessary measure of faith into inches, and hundredths,
we often discussed religion, often dwelt in solemn
earnestness
upon the wisdom, benevolence, and immensity of
that Omnipotent Being, who reared the immense piles in
our view, and our talk was often of the life to come.
They were beautiful and fascinating girls, and as such
they always impressed beholders. But with them
constantly
,
as I was, and uniformly treated with the confiding
tenderness of sisters, I was conscious of feeling for them,
only the interest and the attachment of a brother. I thought
of them, when absent, with none of the feverish and
tumultuous
sensations with which I recalled the memory of
another. All my thoughts of them, were in keeping with
the scene of our residence; as tranquil, as the repose of
the mountains, as bland as the mountain breeze. The
sad recollection incessantly returns to me, that three of this
family are taking their last sleep in that sweet and lonely
spot, and all that we talked, and all that we enjoyed
together
there, is now only the memory of joys that are
past, pleasant and mournful to the soul.
In due process of time, Bryan returned, and his return
was a day of jubilee. We had a tea party, to which we
were all invited, and our parlor was decked with an
extraordinary
profusion of flowers; for Bryan had returned safe
and sound, had attained all the objects of his mission, and
managed them with the wisdom of the serpent, and the
innocence of the dove. We had a good store of books, an
ample supply of wine, and plenty of tea and coffee; and all
that he was unable to bring with him, was deposited in a
place, whence they could be easily and safely transported
here in a wagon. One consideration, had, unaccountably,
escaped all our recollections. We had thought nothing of
the essential article of dress. To me, it was an
unimportant
omission. To the Saxon, who was dainty in these
points, it was more important. But to the young ladies,
who had never been called to stint the farthest and
most expensive range of fancy, in the variety and elegance
of this article, to be confined, week after week, to the
casual dress which they wore when they went to prison, I
knew enough of female nature to understand how
painfully
this privation must be felt. They affected, indeed,
to consider it as a trifle, and we talked of fig-leaves and
dresses of skins, and of the innocence which felt no
shame in the want of these things. But I was perfectly
aware, that as daughters of our common mother, they
would have felt some of those splendid dresses, which
they used to wear in Durango, no unimportant accession
to their comforts.
We observed that Bryan seemed rather reluctant to
undo
all his budget, and that his countenance bore the marks
of painful concealment. Such was his interest for us, that
little by little, it all came out. And such were the terrors
excited by this full disclosure, that, so far from thinking of
their oversight in the article of dress, the young ladies
were hardly willing that Bryan should incur the exposure
of taking the wagon to the place, where our articles were
hidden, to bring them home. The amount of his
intelligence
was this. The Conde had not only resigned, but
was under the suspicion of having abetted the attack on
the Royal corps, that escorted us. In order to vindicate
himself from this suspicion, he had joined in all the
measures
against us. What do you think, said Bryan,
was the first thing which I saw stuck on the posts and
pillars
,
and at the corners of the streets, when I entered the
city? Why, God bless your Honor, just this thing; a
reward
of five thousand
pesos
for your Honor's head, and
the same for that of your friend, and five hundred for
mine. By Saint Patrick! my hair rose on end. But,
devil burn them, if I let out a word that I was Bryan
himself
.
But he ascertained, that the country was in such a
state of internal discord, and there were so many
commencing
rebellions, so many partizan skirmishes, and so
many
guerilla
parties, so many battles and massacres,
so much mutual distrust, and so little preponderanceof
any one party over the other, that he thought us perfectly
safe, while we kept ourselves concealed among the
mountains
.
Every individual was too anxious about the safety
of his own head, to think of earning five thousand
pesos
,
by taking ours. We inferred, on the whole, that we were
in little danger, except from needy and guilty assassins;
and unless many of them leagued together, we felt as
though we should be able to give a good account of them
Our apprehensions were somewhat quieted by another
consideration. The general impression in the city was
that in our flight, we had made for the United States, and
as they had not heard of our arrest, it was supposed we
had succeeded in our escape. In this conversation before
the De Benvelts, all that he pretended to know of the
Conde's affairs, was, that he and his family lived in
profound
retirement, and were seldom seen in the city.
When we were in private, Bryan admitted, that
contrary
to my orders, he had been at the palace. I could
not keep, said he, from going to see the old place
again, and indeed, your Honor, I swore to Martha, by my
mother, the last time I saw her, that I would give her a
little bit of information about your Honor, whenever I
could. So I made myself known to the servants, and the
Conde, and his lady, and Martha, and all came to see me
in a private way, and they made much of me too, that did
they. Devil burn them, how they came at the thing, is
more than I can guess; but Dorothy, that you used to
learn grammar, and all the Conde's people beside, knew
well where your Honor was, and how we have spent our
time, and all about us here. Martha said but a little
before
the rest of them; ay, but I saw the jewel alone; and
then she asked me such a heap of questions, and shed so
many tears, and inquired, how we all lived together here?
And so I told her, `As thick as three in a bed.' `Ay,' says
she, `Bryan, I expect so. But it's not the decent thing, for
young ladies to live together in a cave, and run about the
mountains with a young man. You may tell your master,
that I think so, too.' Says I, `God bless your Ladyship!
They are as sweet, sober, demure, so, so kind little
bodies, as you can find on the earth, as modest as nuns,
and as pretty as angels.' `Why really,' says she, `Bryan,
you have the gift of the gab, and one would think you was
8*
smitten too. The prettier they are, the less ought they
to behave in this way.' So I sees which way the wind
sets, and so I says, `God love your Ladyship, they pray
and sing like nuns, and I dare say, never think a bad
thought. And for my master, the girls call him brother,
and I am sure he loves them only as dear good sisters.
But God love your Ladyship, he loves you after another
sort of a fashion, and better, I'll swear, than he loves his
own eyes.' Upon this, she makes up her mouth, this way,
and smiles, and says, `Do you think so, Bryan?' `
Indeed
do I,' says I. `For he sometimes stops short, and
he looks towards your quarter, and he looks big and
solemn, this way; and out comes the hard sigh. Ay,
your Ladyship, I know what all that means.' And she
says, `Bryan, you have learned to flatter. Your master
and the young ladies have had too much of that talk about
brother and sisters. You can tell them, that they are in
no danger at all. Persuade them to come away, and live
with me, and I will answer for them. That will be better
and safer, and more decent too, than to live in that cave,
and wander about with a young man, that, after all, is no
brother of theirs.' `But,' says I, `your Ladyship, would
you have them leave their poor old lame father?' `Ay,
that indeed,' says she, `Bryan, is a thing I don't know
how to manage.' Then, God forgive me, I runs on again,
to tell her Ladyship, that I could swear you never thought
of any body, except in a brotherly way, but her Ladyship,
and that I was sure you loved her better than the light of
heaven. And that pleased her, your Honor, to the life,
and she says a thousand and one kind things about you,
and asked all how your Honor looked and talked, and all
that. Still the kindest thing about you was said last, and
the big round pearls stood in her glistening eyes, when I
was about to come away; and then she says, `Bryan,
swear to me, that you won't tell him that I have said a
word to you about him. Say nothing about it to any
body. For,' she says, `in the old proverb,
Secreto entre
dos es secreto de Dios. Secreto entre tres es secreto de
todo el mundo
.' `Ay,' says I, `I am as close as a dead
man.' And then she almost showed a heart to kiss me,
when I came away.
The articles that had been overlooked in Bryan's
mission to Durango, were soon supplied, and in a way
which convinced us at once that we had friends in the
the city, and that by them, at least, the place and
circumstances
of our retreat were well known. As we went out
of our dwelling, a few mornings after Bryan's return,
we found a large package, labelled in Spanish for the
Misses Benvelt. It happened to be precisely on the day
in which Bryan returned with his wagon load of goods
from the place where he had concealed them, near
Durango
.
Thus all our wants were supplied at one time,
for, on opening the package, it was found to contain every
requisite article of a lady's wardrobe for the three young
ladies. In the same package were changes of dress for
De Benvelt and me. This ample and expensive package
was the gift of the father of my former pupil, Dorothea, at
her request. It evinced, on her part, a considerate
generosity
,
a noble use of opulence, and a kindness of heart,
which struck us all with a deep feeling of gratitude. De
Benvelt was delighted with feeling himself once more
clad as formerly, and to see his daughters looking as they
had in Durango. He rubbed his hands, and exclaimed,
Now, mein Gott, if this is not what I have read in the
Pibles, how the prophet was fed by de rafens! There
was a letter in Spanish, along with the package. It
informed
us, that to a few friends the place and
circumstances
of our retreat were well known; but that we need
have no apprehensions from that knowledge, for that those
friends would only avail themselves of it to put all
others on the wrong track; that it was understood that
the things sent must be indispensable to our comfort,
and that it was hoped we should use them, as the giver
would have done, had situations been reversed. It was
remarked, that it was wholly unnecessary to inform us
how the giver came by this knowledge of our retreat, and
that all it concerned us to know, was, that our secret was
perfectly safe with them. It was hoped, that the times
would soon become tranquil and safe; that we should get
effectually cured of our patriotic fever, return under a
general amnesty, and every thing go on as formerly. A
few remarks at the close, excited in me the deepest
sorrow
and regret. The young ladies read the letter first,
and I saw, by the change in their countenances, that they
read something which inflicted the keenest anguish. They
handed it to me. In a kind of postscript to the letter,
were these words:The friends of the Misses Benvelt
have but one opinion about the intercourse between them
and their former teacher. They can return with perfect
safety to Durango at any time. As well for his reputation
as theirs, they are earnestly requested to return.
As much as I rejoiced in this addition to the comforts
of these young ladies, so much was I grieved with this
cruel intimation at the close of the letter, otherwise so
considerate and kind. I tasked all my powers to explain
at away, and account for their impressions, on the ground,
that some gossiping spy had invisibly pryed into our
privacies, and misrepresented the character of our
sentiments
and our intercourse. The blow, I saw, had taken
effect and they were struck to the heart. It was past all
my skill, in the slightest degree, to heal the wound.
That they could fly from danger to their father and to me,
and in avoiding exposure of one kind, subject themselves
to pain and exposure, so keenly felt by all modest women,
of a different and more appalling kind, seemed to them a
thought not to be endured. The more deeply they felt
the perfect innocence and simplicity of our intercourse,
the more bitterly they felt the cruelty of these suspicions.
There is no getting away from evil, they said. The very
attempt to fly from one danger, only plunges us into a worse.
Whatever there may be for you, there is no refuge for us,
but in the grave. Of all evils that we have yet
encountered
,
calumny is the worst. I urged upon them the
necessity of relying upon the inward consciousness of
integrity
.
I clearly discovered their unabated regard for
me, and their fondness for the unrestrained frankness and
gaiety of our conversations, walks, and amusements. Their
eyes were opened, and seeing the light in which others,
especially ladies of their own age and condition, viewed
this intercourse, they began to contemplate it with shame
and fear themselves. The charm of their walks and
conversations
,
the confiding
navet
of sisters in their whole
relations with me, were laid aside. There was now
restraint
,
and distance, and painful blushes, where there
had formerly been nothing but the unsuspicious confidence
of man before the fall.
Bryan had unknowingly inflicted another wound, for
he had carelessly given them to understand, that in his
late excursion to Durango, he had been at the Conde's
palace, and they had finally drawn from him all the secret
of his conversation with Martha. They saw that she was
impressed upon this subject in the same manner with
Dorothea. They had always regarded her as a model,
her opinions upon all subjects as oracular, and her
decisions
as merciful and just. So then, they said, if
we survive danger, we can never hope to survive shame.
Why not then, I cheerfully asked, why not remain
here, as long as we live? We feel that we are innocent.
We can here appeal to God and our consciences, and so
long as we are all satisfied with one another, why need
we regard what the world says? To all this they
replied
,
by asking, if it were not better to follow the advice
given, and return to Durango? Mein Gott! cried the
father in an agony. Yes, go, if you wish to part from
your old lame father for ever. But I hope you will have
the goodness to get this young man to strike off my head
with his sabre first. He is a good young man, I grant
you, and harmless of all the tamned lies that these
gossiping
girls talk about you. But he will not be hurt with me
for saying, that he can never be to me in place of my
tear girls. This statement was conclusive and final, and
they never again resumed the subject of leaving their
father.
The bard said, Sorrows come not single spies. The
father's wound, with the coming on of autumn, and with
the visible chagrin and increasing silence and dejection of
the daughters, grew worse. Hitherto he had regularly
hobbled his two or three turns, morning and evening,
across the little plain. When fatigued, he sat down on a
bench, with its moss cushion, purposely prepared for his
repose, under the sycamore, and appeared to enjoy our
promenade, as we gaily tripped back and forward. All
at once he complained of the excessive fatigue of this
exertion, and was only lifted to the door to see us walk,
and to contemplate the rising and the setting sun. Bryan
would take him in his brawny arms, and carry him about,
handling him as tenderly as a child. We all redoubled
our exertions. The daughters, at my suggestion, not
only suppressed every appearance of dejection but
assumed
a painful and constrained gaiety.
It was but too evident, that these deep evils of the
heart, coming so together, involved, with the decline of
their father, their own sorrow and decline. Wilhelmine
had always seemed to me the most sensitive and delicate
of the three. The lily in her cheek most preponderated
over the rose. It is impossible to measure the effect of
sorrow on different natures by any other scale, than actual
experiment. The buoyant natures of the two younger
sunk first. The roses on their cheeks faded daily away.
Our charming walks among the mountains, where we
talked the flowing heart, contemplated the glorious and
spirit-stirring scenery, and courted the mountain breeze,
the reckless laugh, the exuberant gaiety, that was delighted
with the passing trifles, all these were gone. When the
father took his daily sleep, we sometimes repeated the
walks, and mounted the same heights, and contemplated
the same scenes as before. But they walked slowly and
by themselves, and were restrained and distant, in
permitting
the common courtesies, that they used rather to court.
A slight fermentation changes the nature of the purest wine.
A little change in the mind and circumstances, changes
what was delightful, to a source of pain. When I saw
that I was actually a restraint upon them, I told them that
they had enough to encounter, beside the pain of my
presence, and that if they were afraid of me, or doubted
me, or deemed that my presence was doubtful in its
influence
upon their reputation, I would leave them, and seek
for myself a more solitary retreat. Ah no! they said,
with one voice, that would kill us all at one blow.
What could we do without you? What need we care
what they say of us? All our world is here.
The autumns of this region, especially in the mountains,
are inexpressibly delightful. The azure of the sky is
charming. The coolness and dryness of the atmosphere
remove the languors of summer. We had in the
summer
often anticipated the coming of autumn, with delight.
At last the sober autumn, so desired, came. The
thousand
wild fruits, with which our table was to be decked,
were matured. The mellow and impressive operation of
autumn upon the mountain scenery was produced. We
experienced the invigorating influence of a keen and frosty
air by night, which, we had hoped, would have given such
a delightful aspect to the blaze of the domestic fire, that
would illumine our cave. Bryan produced the fruits, the
smoking coffee, the venison, the
Parso
, and he took the
feeble Saxon in his arms, like a child, and placed him on
a kind of rude, but comfortable sofa, made soft with moss,
and spread with buffalo-robes. But the expected joy
would not come. We tried the sweet hymn, but the
voices of the daughters sunk away, and instead of hearing
the prayers and the hymn, we had only silent tears.
Mein Gott, said the father, sobbing himself, why will
ye cry, and break my heart? Bryan, give me that bottle,
and that cup. Here is to `fader land,' and let us be
comfortable. The very effort to take his customary cup
of wine, showed his weakness, and after a few vain efforts
to parry, or to hide the thrusts of nature, and pass them
off for drowsiness, he requested to be carried from the
fire to the bed. The paleness of his daughters seemed to
say, `Our father will never share this fire with us again.'
Two of them, though not so helpless, appeared as deep
in their decline, as himself. He never, after that, arose,
except to be dressed, and managed as an infant, while the
indefatigable Bryan, beat up, and prepared his couch.
As the frame of De Benvelt was thus imperceptibly
wasting away, nothing on our part was spared, to rekindle
his hopes, or soothe his decline, which friendship, or filial
tenderness, could invent or offer. I had been lately more
assiduous in my habit of wandering in the mountains,
partly with a view of seeking something new, in the way
of aliment, to suit the ever varying fancies of a sick man's
appetite, partly to throw off the debilitating gloom,
resulting from breaking off my former active habits, and
spending the greater portion of my time with the invalid,
and partly to indulge in the contemplation of nature, in
her most imposing features. My excursions, since the
sickness of the family, had been short, and confined to the
immediate vicinity of our retreat. One morning, after I
had seen De Benvelt sink into a refreshing sleep, and his
daughters apparently more cheerful than I had seen
them for some time, I determined to extend my ramble
beyond its accustomed range. I took my gun, and having
lighted a trunk of fat pine with fire, whose ruddy flame
and smouldering smoke might serve as a distant beacon,
to guide my returning steps, I sallied out alone, and
climbed from crag to crag, along this rugged spur of the
Cordilleras, until I had extended my walk to a great
distance
from the cave, and saw from my elevation far
beneath
me, the smoke of my beacon-fire lifting its
cylindrical
pillars aloft, amidst the blue and still atmosphere of
the mountains. What a spectacle arrayed itself below
me! How pure and elastic the air, which, perhaps, never
mortal had breathed before! Far away below me, the
boundless plain of the prairies slept, like the ocean in a
VOL. II. 9
calm. Above me, towered, pile above pile, those mighty
masses, which seemed the ancient battlements of heaven.
I stood wrapt in profound meditation. My thoughts
expanded
,
my imagination soared, even beyond the immense
prospect before me. There is an inspiration in mountain
scenery, at once soothing and elevating, the happiest
mixture
of poesy and devotion. Amidst this tranquil
entrancement
of meditation and reverie, I was suddenly
startled by the report, apparently of a musquet, at a
considerable
distance still above me. The reverberations
from a thousand caverns, became fainter and fainter, until
Echo herself seemed exhausted with her own magic
mimicry
.
Can this, thought I, have proceeded from the
hand of man? Are these sublime and remote solitudes,
peopled by other exiles, who have, like us, toiled in
benevolence
for our fellow men, and been by them driven,
for a refuge, to the caverns of the mountains? Or is it
the precursor of a volcano, laboring to give vent to those
central fires, which these ancient mountains have
smothered
for ages? I was suspended in doubt, wonder, and
astonishment. I determined, however, to make my way
in the direction of the report, and attempt to unravel the
mystery. With great difficulty, and not without danger
of being precipitated into some of those deep ravines,
which had been washed out by mountain torrents, I
reached
the summit of a high peak, which commanded an
extensive
view. At its base, and not more than fifty paces
from where I stood, I discovered the mouth of a cavern,
and a Spanish musket standing by the side of it. While
I was surveying this new object of wonder, a man slowly
stepped from the cave. He was, apparently, about forty,
brown and swarthy, with untrimmed mustachios, and a
long black beard; and he was clad in a dress of leather.
But there was the dignity of self-estimation, and of manly
firmness in his port, and a searching glance in his keen
black eye, which struck me with awe. Reflection taught
me in a moment, that this was no ordinary anchorite. He
had not yet espied me. He stood for a moment,
seemingly
wrapped in profound and melancholy thought. As
he turned his eye toward the spot where I stood, he
instantly
grasped his musket, and cried out in a tone of
authority
,
Qui en vive?
A friend, I answered in the same
language. He fixed his eye, sternly, and steadily upon
me, holding his piece in a position for instant use, if
inspection
should afford the occasion for it. Hold!
I cried. Whoever you are, or whatever may be your
motive for seeking this wild asylum, I come not to spy
you out, or disturb the solitude of your retreat. My
approach
to this place, was the result of pure accident. As I
come with no hostile intent, no disposition to break in
upon the sanctity of your refuge, or pry into the mystery,
with which you have seen fit to shroud yourself, there can
be no ground of hostility between us. I took you,
said he, for one of those miserable, hireling tools of
despotism
,
who, lured by the reward offered for my head,
had scented out the haunt of a Patriot exile. I am,
I returned, like you, an exile myself, and like you a
price is set on my head. I am an Anglo-American, and
lately an adherent of Morelos, and in the thickest of the
fight against the satellites of despotism. You may have
heard of the unfortunate fight of
Palos Blancos
.
Defeated
in that fatal field, with a sick friend, I am an outlaw,
and a tenant of nature, in these wild mountains. The
musket dropt from his hands, as if he had been
palsystruck
.
A companion of Morelos, cried he, and an
Anglo-American! And now I discover from your accent,
that you are of English origin. I love even the language
in which Washington and his great compatriots spoke.
That dialect is the consecrated idiom of freedom, and of
independent and noble thinking. The day will come,
when over the globe, he, who shall speak that language,
will claim the same exemptions and immunities, in
consequence
,
which he demanded in the ancient days, who said,
`I am a Roman citizen.' There is an air of candor in
your countenance, which inspires confidence. Approach!
I descended the peak, and approached the mouth of the
cavern. Before you enter this sanctuary of an exile,
said he, holding out his hand, pledge me a soldier's
honor, and a Patriot's faith, that you will never reveal the
secret of this interview, at least until Mexico is free.
My name among men was once of too much import, to
become even now the theme of a passing tale. I grasped
his hand, and gave him the most sacred watch-word of
the Patriots. Ah, said he, embracing me, dear is
that word. Come in, and see the retirement of a Patriot
soldier. The cavern was deep and gloomy, a perfect
contrast to that, where dwelt my declining associates, and
without even the requisite accommodations for the most
hardy soldier. But the tenant had a mind, that had
converted
the stone floor to a couch of down. You see
before you, said he, a person, who was once one of the
most distinguished natives of this country, so delightful,
and so favored of nature. I might have shared in the
guilty honors and distinctions of its oppressors. But my
heart told me, even from a child, that God and nature
intended, that this great country should one day be free.
I was among the first, who disdainfully shook our chains
in the face of our oppressors. I was among the first to
join in the effort to cast them from us. While there was
a blow to be struck, I was not inactive. After the fall of
Hidalgo, the struggle was kept up by successive chiefs,
who rallied round the standard of independence, a motley
multitude, dependent for subsistence upon their swords.
We carried on a wild,
guerilla
warfare. But the
superior
discipline of the Royal troops, and the corruption and
unprincipled ignorance of men who had been brutalized
in long and effeminate bondage, and who, having broken
their chains, became wild and unfeeling tyrants in their
turn, and practised indiscriminate slaughter upon
defenceless
and unoffending families, and spread horror and
dismay
in their path, caused our army to dissolve like snow
in the sun-beams. Our hopes revived for a moment,
when Mina came, like a flaming meteor, from the north,
and with a handful of brave and devoted heroes, checked
for a moment the successful march of oppression. But
his brilliant career was cut short, and he was borne down,
the victim at once of treachery and of his own valor.
After the fall of this great man a few daring spirits still
clung to the cause, desperate as it was. We retreated
to a fortress apparently impregnable; but were followed,
and attacked by an overwhelming superiority of numbers.
My tongue falters even now, in making the humiliating
confession. But a very few, beside myself, escaped the
carnage of that day. Proscribed, outlawed in the land of
my fathers, banished from kindred and every charity and
endearment of life, we had no other resource than to
forswear
our kind. A price being set upon our heads, we passed
from place to place in various disguises, more than once
escaping, as it seemed, only by a miracle. I retreated
from mountain to mountain, until I buried myself in this
cavern. I have been offered any of the guilty honors or
places in the gift of Ferdinand the VII, if I would abandon
9*
the cause of my country. But in the free air of these
mountains, and in the hearing of the Divine ear, I have
sworn an oath upon my soul, never to make any
compromise
with oppression. No, I will give this to flesh to the
vultures, or the wolves, and these bones to bleach unburied
upon these crags, ere I ever return to man, until there is
some prospect that my country may yet be free. He
paused, as it seemed, from irrepressible agitation. I
attempted
to raise his hopes, and to present brighter
views of the cause, than he seemed to entertain. I
assured
him, that in every land, virtuous and free minds
not only sympathized with his country, but anticipated,
with the confidence of prophecy, her ultimate
emancipation
,
and the period, when the sun which now never sets
upon the slaves of Spain in the new world, shall illumine
in his glorious path, none but freemen.
`When Chimborazo over earth, air, wave,
Shall glare with Titan eye, and see no slave.'
I then gave him a brief detail of the melancholy
circumstances
,
which detained me in the sick family of De
Benvelt, and recommended to him, in awaiting the time
to strike for independence again, to seek a temporary
asylum in the United States. No, said he, I love,
I venerate that country; but will never fly from my own.
The stranger knoweth not, and cannot know, what
charities
I have been obliged to fly, in coming here. My
heart bleeds at the recollection, but no sympathy can
avail me. But if you have mistaken the despondence of
a father, torn from his children, of a husband, torn from
the bosom of the wife of his youth, for despair of the
cause of freedom, you have misinterpreted my feelings.
Seven millions of men that inhale such an air, and see
such mountains, can never be held in final bondage. The
spirit of freeedom may be at this moment, like the fabled
Enceladus, pressed down as under the incumbent weight
of mountains. But the subterranean fires will ultimately
burst forth. Let our oppressors beware of the explosion.
From what quarter we are to expect redress, it is
impossible
to foresee. But the day must, and will come. Great
God! Shall a despotism, as icy, and as eternal as the
snows upon these mountains, forever blast this lovliest
portion of creation? No. The generation that is now
rising, is tearing off the veil with which despotism and
priestcraft have hoodwinked them, and are beginning to
feel that they are men. While such men still breathe in
Mexico, as Guerrero, and Bravo, and Santanna, the
cause cannot utterly perish. For my part, my heart
kindled again at the tone with which he spoke, and in
which he gave me the details of various scenes, where he
had been engaged. Humanity and friendship called back
my thoughts to the place from which I came. I described
the condition and circumstances of the amiable and
suffering
family in which I dwelt. The simple narrative of their
sufferings, proved that this man, apparently of steel and
rock, this man who seemed to have no sympathies but
with his country, had a heart of the quickest and tenderest
sensibility. He lamented bitterly that he could do
nothing
for them, but pity them. It may be, said he, that
they and you will hear from me again. I am well
informed
of what is passing in that world below us. I am
waiting
for the moment, to rally the friends of independence
round her standard once more. If we should ever
conquer
our freedom, they will then see, if I am not the friend
of the friendless, the deliverer of the oppressed, and the
hope of such people, as those with whom you sojourn. I
viewed the singular man who stood before me; awe-struck
at his manner, and the tones of his voice. Such are the
extraordinary men, thought, I whom Providence raises
up and qualifies for such emergencies. I ventured,
indirectly
,
to ask him his name. Your curiosity on this
point, said he, does not dishonor me. I doubt not, that
you are a man of honor, and that I may safely trust you.
If this great land should bequeath a heritage of bondage to
the generation to come, I should not desire that my name
should reach posterity, and I should choose to live here
alone, with God and my conscience, and that this cavern
should be my tomb. But if, as I trust, a more happy
destiny awaits it, if hereafter the corrupt and blinding
despotism of this period should be succeeded by a young
and virtuous republic, true to its own glory and the
sacred
principles of liberty, and flourishing in all the arts of
peace and humanity, I trust, that my name will not be
utterly
forgotten. You will then remember this interview.
You will welcome your proscribed friends to all the
succour
and protection, that Guadeloupe Victoria can bestow.
Remember, that he predicted the future happiness and
glory of his country. Victoria! cried I, am I then
in the presence of that man He modestly checked
me, reminding me, that we had both forfeited our names
among the stars. He turned the conversation again to
the sick and suffering family, to which, I told him, I felt
it was time for me return. When invited to honor that
family with his presence, he remarked, that he could
bring them nothing but unavailing sympathy, and that it
seemed necessary for him to see no more scenes to soften
the heart. Patriots, said he, in these times, must
renounce
humanity, and act as simple intelligences, alike
above fear, interest, or feeling. If the time should ever
arrive, when I can wipe away a single tear from the eyes
of your distressed friends, then will I come to visit them
and you. I turned and left him with profound regret
and admiration.
As De Benvelt's strength declined, as his body wasted,
until
the skin of his once round figure could almost be wrapped
about him, his sensibility and the powers of his mind made
themselves more conspicuous. Before his girls, he always
spoke cheerfully, prophesying the return of good times,
and the chances of their shortly being allowed an
unmolested
departure to England, or the United States. But his
innate sincerity always manifested itself, through his
unwonted
shifts at disguise. And the third day of his
confinement
to his couch, while his girls had retired, as was
their custom, probably to private prayers, I went to his
bed at his request, and I saw the tears streaming down his
emaciated cheeks. Mein Gott forpit, said he, that you
should wrong me, and think that I am afraid to die, or that
I should have de fears of you. But it is such a tamned
pad world! My girls are as harmless as lambs, and that
you well know. But the world will speak against them
now. What will they say about them when their poor old
fader is gone? Mein Gott, it goes to my heart, to see them
droop and look so pale. That would kill me if there were
nothing else. The peoples are not fit for the tamned
liberties
,
and they will call my poor girls bad names, when my
bones moulder. When I am tead, you tell them, that I
bid them not cry. You send them off to your country, as
fast as you can, and the first scoundrel that speaks against
them, you kill! Mein Saviour forgive me! But my bones
would not rest in their shroud, if people should speak
against my tear girls. Swear that you will do this, and De
Benvelt will die in peace. It will readily be supposed, I
promised all that he desired.
It was only four days, after the father was confined
to his couch, before Annette, naturally the gayest of the
three, was confined to hers also. We moved her's so near
her father's that even with their faint voices, they could
commune with each other. And often in the intervals of
our nursing, and our efforts to cheer them, we heard,
interchanged
between them, the low and faint tones, which
trembled with all the tenderness of the father and daughter,
as they noted to each other the progress of decline, and the
color of their thoughts and feelings in view of it. Sophy
still made efforts to keep from the couch, but the languid
eye, though it shed no tears, was the sure index, that she,
also, was drooping. Wilhelmine, by incredible efforts kept
up her exertions, if not her courage and spirits, and was
continually walking from couch to couch, like a ministering
angel, begging us all to keep up our spirits, and trust in
the power and mercy of God. Amidst this scene of trial,
even Bryan's gay face became overcast. I often saw the
poor fellow struggle, to the utmost, to restrain the
expression
of his feelings, and when it was no longer in his
power
,
go abroad, and give free scope to his tears. My own
heart was inexpressibly heavy. I spent hours and days, in
intense thought upon the nature of their disease, and the
possibility of some remedy. I scrambled the mountains
anew, for mountain herbs, and every sort that Bryan had
heard to be salutary, was given in decoction. As a last
resource, I proposed to go in disguise to Durango. We
had no want of money, and I felt sure, that I could bring in
safety my friend the American surgeon. Neither the father
nor his daughters would listen a moment to the proposition.
The father, and both the sick daughters insisted, that they
were doing quite well, that they felt their disorder to be of
such a character, that medicine and physicians could do
nothing for it, and that time alone could remove their ills.
They assured me, that if I started away, the loneliness
alone would kill them, and that they should never see me
more; that even if I went, the temptation of the price on
my head would be sure to bring death to me, without any
other effect on them, than involving us all, sick and well,
in the same common ruin.
I will not tire you with these details of the decline of the
father and his daughters, if I may avoid it. I am aware,
that passing, as it did, under my eye, with my feelings so
interested by the family, and in our peculiar circumstances,
it may not engross the feelings of others, as it did mine, to
witness their almost imperceptible decay, their silent, and
uncomplaining approach towards the last hour. On the
middle
of December, there happened a strong white frost, and
one of those glorious mornings of a tropical climate in the
mountains, ensued. The first gleams of the morning sun
melted away the hoary envelope, where they fell. The
lengthened shadows of the trees were beautifully marked
in white, on the grass and the shrubs, where the sunbeams
were intercepted by shade. The birds feel the changes of
the atmosphere with the delicacy of a thermometer. They
are never so gay, as in the elasticity of the air, during the
rising of the sun in the sultry climates, after a frosty night.
They seem to be multiplied in number among the
branches
.
Their song is lengthened, and the movement is more
brisk and gay. It was so this morning. To the mingled
notes of a thousand birds, was added the distant baying
of our dogs, ringing, and echoing in the distant forests and
hills. The deer, the cabri, the buffalo, every thing, that
had life in the mountains, uttered its peculiar note of joy.
The brilliance of the morning sun illumined the entrance
of the cave. The carol of the birds, and the mingled hum
of the spirit-stirring morning, was heard, even by the feeble
tenants of the couches. What a beautiful morning, each
one exclaimed! To my surprise, both the father and
Annette
requested that they might be dressed, and helped
to the seat under the sycamore. Wilhelmine dressed her
sister, and Bryan the father, and Sophy was just able to
drag her weary frame to the spot, unaided. The father
when dressed, aroused himself. My tear Frank, said
he, Gott knows, how soon I shail feel so strong again.
This is too sweet a morning, to spend entirely on this
weary
couch. Help me up to look at the sun once more.
Bryan and I, with great caution and tenderness, lifted him
out and placed him on his seat. Annette was loosely
dressed
in a white muslin mantle. The unusual effort of rising,
had marked a small and bright circle of vermilion in the
centre of her cheek. But the rest of her face was
blanched
to the whiteness of her robe. We aided her sister, to
place her beside her father. Sophy leaned against the
tree. Here, set me down, said Annettee, and let me
breathe. As I carefully helped her to her seat, and
adjusted
her cushion, she smiled and said, My dear brother,
you forget how liable such gallantry is to suspicion, if any
one should be here in concealment to see it. Their
position
was only ten paces from the door of the cave, and
a position between sun and shade. The daughter
sustained
herself and her father, by passing her arm about his
neck, and their faces had that exaltation of feeling and
tenderness, mingled with the traces of sinking nature, which
clearly indicated, that the mortal was soon to unite itself
with the dust, and that the spirits were preparing for their
flight. Both were silent for some moments, as if lost in
the intenseness of thought or feeling.
Annette spoke first, and with a stronger tone of voice than
usual. My dear father, said she, laying her hand on her
bosom
,
there is that passing here, that no words can describe,
What a glorious morning, and how sweetly those birds sing!
They are chanting the praises of Him to whom we are
going. Oh! we shall be together there forever; and
there is no slander, no wounds, no shedding of blood, no
bitterness of heart. Look at the clouds on yonder plain;
see how they flit over the green grass. And such is life!
How grand and awful are those blue summits yonder, that
soar away towards Heaven. Dear father! whenever I
have lately mentioned, in our hymns and our prayers, the
sweet words, `fader land,' it was not of the country
beyond
the seas, where I was born, that I thought, but the
good and happy country above those blue summits. There
is `fader land.' There alone is peace. The father was
dissolved in tears. The sisters with difficulty restrained
the audible burst of their grief. Bryan turned and walked
away, unable longer to witness the scene. I remarked,
that she was faint, and that her bosom heaved with a short
and laborious respiration. I watched the entranced
inspiration
of her eye, which was kindled with an enthusiasm
and filial tenderness, that struck me with awe. At my
request
,
she took a little wine, and as she manifested a
purpose
to speak again, the father looked upon her with
entreaty
in his eyes. Mein Gott! It is too much. Tear
Annette, say no more. You kill me twice to see your eye
sparkle so, and hear your voice sound so strange. Let us
die, and go to Heaven together, and say not another word
about it. Dear father, she continued, but this once, and
then I will be still. Come here, my good Wilhelmine.
My poor, pale Sophy, come here. They both trembled
excessively, for they understood from her voice and
countenance
,
VOL. II. 10
that a change was taking place in her. They
came to her, however, and each took a hand. Be good
girls, said she, and neither mourn nor cry. It is not the
terrible thing, I thought it, to die. I am in no pain nor
fear, and I am quite happy, and feel like sinking to a sweet
sleep. She slowly raised her finger and pointed to the sky.
Look at that mild, blue firmament. Beyond are God, the
Redeemer, and my final home. Lay me beside the spring
there, a little below the foot of this tree, where our brother
sits to read. Each of you kiss me. They each
approached
nearer, kneeled, and gave her the long, quivering,
and final kiss of agonizing and parting affection. And
you, too, my dear brother, there can be no harm now.
They inclined their heads, and I kneeled, and
received
the pressure of her cold lips. She then said in a faint,
and almost inaudible voice, Dear, dear, father! the last,
and the sweetest is for you, for we shall sleep together.
But it was too late. The affectionate heart of the father,
broken with what he had seen, suffered, and expected, had
ceased to beat. The daughter, with her arm still thrown
round his neck, drew one long and deep sigh, and they
were both for ever free from the burdens of mortality.
Never shone there a brighter morning sun, than that,
which threw its radiance on these pale faces. Bryan and
I reclined them on the grass, without removing the arm of
the daughter from its place, and I aided Sophy to her couch,
and the other sister seated herself by her bed. It was a
scene of such peculiar sorrow, and I was so confused and
troubled in my thoughts, that I have but an indistinct
remembrance
of what followed. I remember distinctly, that
Sophy appeared to be no weaker in consequence of the shock
of this blow. According to the dying request of the sister,
no tears were shed, except by Bryan, and he wept only
when abroad. Wilhelmine walked thoughtfully backwards
and forwards, occasionally looking at the tranquil
countenance
of her sister, on which the last smile of affection and
hope was sealed up, and then on her father, whom we
robed for his last sleep in his full uniform. Bryan dug one
grave, and I the other, in the spot which Annette had
designated
with her dying breath. We sought diligently, and
we found blue slate of the mountains, and we wrought
slabs, which we placed in their narrow beds in the form
of coffins, reserving one for a covering, when their bodies
should have been let down. All this was not
accomplished
,
until the sun had already sunk below the tops of the
mountains. I then said to Wilhelmine, All is now ready,
my dear sister, for laying the bodies of these our friends
decently in their last bed. Say you, if there are to be
other solemnities, before we render dust to dust. She
wished to read the Saxon Lutheran burial service over
the bodies. I brought her the book, that contained it.
Bryan and Sophy kneeled on one side of the bodies, and
the priestess in this sad solemnity, and myself, kneeled on
the other. In a voice to which great intellectual energy
and exertion had seemed to impart calmness and touching
sweetness, and which was rendered by the scene, and by
suppressed emotion, sublimely impressive, and with an eye,
that often turned from the book to the sky, she read that
solemn service, every word of which, though I but
imperfectly
comprehended the meaning, carried a chill to my
heart. She then sung the hymn, that had been dear to the
departed, in the same language. As it has been since
translated to me, the purport of it was, that the living
congregation
below, that still toil in sin and tears on the earth,
and the emancipated congregation of the just above, are
but different members of the same unbroken body, united
in the Living Head; that it is the plan of his gracious
discipline
,
that the one portion shall walk awhile below the stars,
while the other portion is taken above; that the death of the
just is only the following him who hath triumphed over death,
through the dark valley, from the union below to the union
above. The mansions above are denominated fader
land, and these words formed a kind of ehorus, and
whenever
it recurred, the faint voice of Sophy, also made itself
heard. This service finished, they both kneeled a moment
in silence, and only uttering thoughts for the divine ear.
Bryan and I then took the body of the father first, and
afterwards
of the daughter, and deposited them both in the
lonely
bed, prepared for them. The daughters cast one intense
look at the loved countenances. We each took a slab, and
gently laid them both at the same moment on the slabs
within which the bodies rested, and they were hidden from
view by the veil of eternity. They each, according to the pious
custom of their country, threw a little earth into each grave,
and we heaped up their narrow bed, and smoothed down
their lonely pillow, and left them to their final repose.
The shades of evening had closed round us, when the
solemn duties were finished. Bryan kindled a bright fire,
and prepared our coffee, and Sophy exerted herself to
take her customary seat at the table. You can easily
imagine, that it was but a melancholy repast. When it
was over, and before they retired for the night, Sophy
grasped my hand, and thanked me, with solemn earnestness,
for all that I had done for their departed friends, both while
living and when dead. She added, with a melancholy smile,
We wish not to bow you to the earth, with witnessing
unavailing
sorrow. To you it is owing that they had all the
solace and comfort that their case admitted, to the last,
and that they have been so decently interred. We see
hat you look ill and distressed. Your labors to-day
have been not only pious, but exhausting. We mean not
to tire you with repining and tears. They are now
emancipated
,
and we owe them no duties, but those of memory,
and those we shall pay but too faithfully. And yet why?
How much happier are they than we, who still toil on
behind
?
Wilhelmine had a strong natural taste for
drawing
.
Sophy reclined on her couch, and the other sat by
it, and by the bright light of the fire, was calmly occupied
in sketching the outlines of the recent funerals, including
the mourners, the tree, the cave, and in the back ground
the grouping of the mountains. It will never be fresher
in my memory, she observed, than now. The design
was of great boldness, and there was a fidelity in the
loneliness
and grandeur of the scenery, that was in strong
keeping with the events, that the funeral piece was
intended
to commemorate.
The conversation turned on the only subjects that
belonged
to the remembrance of the day, the happiness of
the just, the certainty of brighter and better worlds, and
the little reason there is for mourning and regret for those,
of whom there is hope that they have been washed in
those perennial fountains for cleansing, that are for ever
open in Zion. The conversation was soothing and full of
hope, and befitting the duties and reflections of the past
day. I only felt, as I left them for the night, the fear that
this glow of faith and hope, these strong restraints, imposed
upon natural feeling, would be gone in the morning, and
that they would awaken to the condition and feelings of
ordinary mortals, and to double desolation of heart.
It was not altogether so. The inspiration of the
evening
had, in some sense, passed away in the morning.
There was still a strong struggle for self-control. Their
10 *
countenances showed how unavailing was that struggle,
and that nature will have her way. Sophy was evidently
soon to find rest beside her sister. She thought, and she
said so herself; and added, that she felt but a single
regret
in the thought, and that was, that she should leave
her sister still more alone. They saw too, that I was ill,
and their apprehensions on this score operated as a
powerful
motive to restrain the expression of their feelings.
Indeed the sympathy which I had felt with their sorrows,
and the unremitting attention I had paid to the sick, and
the loneliness of heart which I now experienced, had
borne heavily upon my health. But I spoke cheerfully,
and assured them, that they need have no apprehensions
of me. I made it a point to take Bryan with me to the
chase, that I might leave them to the first expression of
their sorrows without a witness.
To a mind of tenderness and sensibility, that enters
keenly into the sorrows of another, nothing is more
painful
,
or wears faster, than to perceive that all efforts to
comfort, arouse, interest, or amuse, are entirely unavailing.
To witness, day after day, the silent pressure of a grief,
that strikes deeper from being profoundly silent, operating
a steady and invariable progress towards the destruction
of its subject, is indeed terrible. The sisters made it a
point, never to speak of those that were gone. They
never again made the slightest allusion to the unfavorable
impressions and reports about our mode of living together.
On the contrary, Wilhelmine manifested a recklessness, an
utter indifference upon the subject, that impressed me
more strongly than any thing else could have done, that
she had set the world wholly at defiance, and that she
had utterly renounced its hopes, fears, and opinions.
Sophy became paler every day; but she made it a point
to arise occasionally, and be dressed. She became more
earnest and assiduous in her prayers and religious
exercises
.
When they were finished in the morning, she
generally
requested her sister and me to take each an arm,
and thus aided, she was able to take two or three turns
across the plain, in front of our cave. Of course every
turn led us by the grave of her father and sister.
The second time we walked, as we led this pale, but
interesting shadow, with her muslin robes floating so
loosely
about her, as to seem but the drapery of the tomb, by
the sycamore where were the two graves, she saw that
we had carved an inscription on the smooth and white
rind of the tree. She begged us to assist her to the seat,
on which her father and sister had died, where she could
read the inscription. The words which I carved, gave
the names and ages of the deceased, at the foot of the
tree
with this line, which has ever struck me as the most
beautiful and affecting monumental inscription for the case
to which it is adapted, in the English language: They
were lovely in their lives, and in their death they were not
divided. She read the inscription again and again. She
then turned, and pressed my hand, and her eyes filled with
tears. I think, said she, it is from the Bible, and I
know enough of your language, to feel the beauty and
force of it. There is room on this side for another grave.
We were both equally dear to him, though the heart of
Annette broke first. I wish to be laid on this side, and
then he will be between us. As she said this, we led her
back to the house.
I took an immediate opportunity to speak with
Wilhelmine
about the wishes of her father, that as soon as
he was gone, I should assist his surviving children to
escape to the United States. The strength of Sophy was
not sufficient for us to think of making such an
experiment
with her. But I suggested the propriety of putting
a couch into the waggon, and sending Bryan with them
both to Durango, where Sophy would have the advantage
of a comfortable house, society, medical aid, and better
nursing than could be had here, and, more than all, where
the chain of gloomy associations, connected with this place,
would be broken off. It was proposed to the invalid by
us both. She answered promptly, My dear brother, I
am perfectly aware, that to have no society, but a couple
of moping, and melancholy, and uninformed girls, and,
moreover, one of them sick, must be a painful and
tiresome
business to a young man like you. I neither wonder
at, nor think hard of you, for wishing to get rid of us. But
for me, and I think you may add, for my sister, the matter
about which you think so much, in this proposition, is
wholly out of the question. If there are spies upon us,
we care so little what the world may choose to say of us,
that I dare say, my sister does not bestow a second thought
upon the subject. I would not regard it, even if I
expected
to return to life, which I surely do not. For the rest,
I would not lose the pleasure of walking, as long as I am
able, beside their graves, and looking upon those
mountains
and that sky, which were the last objects of their
contemplation, for all the pageants and pleasures, which
the earth could have afforded me in perfect health.
Mysterious and delightful tie! How poor is language to
describe what I feel, when I look upon their narrow bed.
This is to me a consecrated spot, and nothing shall
separate
me from the place where their ashes moulder. But
a little while, and mine shall be there also. Above these
graves, there seems a point of milder blue in the sky; and
there, I fancy to myself, the very place where their gentle
spirits made their way to their home. Do not name the
thing again, my brother, of removing me from this place.
Here is my last home.
I have a satisfaction in reflecting, that there was nothing
that could be procured in these mountains, that we did not
obtain for her. Again I climbed the precipices, to procure
mountain herbs, of which, however, we had already
experienced
the inefficacy. Nothing which the chase could furnish,
that was deemed delicate or restorative, was wanting. We
descended to the plains, and Bryan displayed his
acquirement
in the arts of the country, by noosing a cow and a
goat, which we confined, and fed for their milk.
Wilhelmine
seemed still to have new and untried powers
of exertion, and an unexhausted fund of self-command.
She assumed cheerfulness in the presence of the interesting
invalid, and she was more than repaid, by the faint smile
which showed how much she felt the kindness. There
could happen but few events to diversify the sad monotony
of this existence. We still aided the invalid to drag her
feeble steps along her accustomed promenade. But no
cheerful conversations ever enlivened these walks, and
though she declined slowly, and gave no intimations that
she considered her death at hand, we saw that our cares for
her would soon have an end. The bloom of Wilhemine
too was all gone, but she insisted so firmly that her health
was good, and her capacity for the endurance of fatigue
and watching seemed so great and entire, that we were
obliged to credit her. Sometimes by an effort,
apparently
to reward our unwearied exertions for them, a
momentary
gleam of cheerfulness would come over their
countenances, but the effort was too painful to be long
sustained. Their conversations together and with us, were
calm and grave, and turned chiefly upon the life to come,
and things with which this world has no concern. In this
state of their minds, the soothing elevation of melancholy,
the joy of grief, no longer seemed to me a poetic fiction.
How many holy thoughts, how many pensive meditations
upon the emptiness of this transitory existence, fell from
the lips of these sisters, during her long sickness. The
remembrance of these solemn conversations, and the tone
and manner in which they were uttered, make this period
seem, in review, like a long sabbath. I deem these
remembrances
salutary. They check the folly of the
excesses
of hope; and when I find myself giving the rein to
my thoughts or my feelings, I recall the sober sadness of
their countenances, and their saint-like manner and
deportment
,
and I instantly awaken from my dreams, to the
consciousness
of things as they are.
During this slow and heavy winter, Bryan went on a
second trip to Durango, to procure not only a supply of
refreshments, but some little opiates and cordials, that
we thought would at least palliate the watchfulness and
weakness of our dear invalid. He returned with the
articles, and in safety. Royalism had, for the present, in
the internal provinces, a quiet ascendancy. But the
stillness
was that ominous and terrible one, that precedes a
tornado. A number of obnoxious Patriots, upon whose
heads a price had been fixed, had been brought in and
executed. Bloody and extreme counsels were the only
ones that prevailed. I was in no danger, only because
I was supposed to have reached the United States. Of
the two families that knew our secret, and interested
themselves
for us, he only heard that things with them were as
usual.
At home I read as formerly, and the sisters seemed to
give diligent attention; but it was obvious that they were
no longer interested in what they heard. I made efforts
to persuade Wilhelmine, leaving Bryan to sit beside her
sister, to take now and then one of those rambles that she
had formerly loved so much, with me among the
mountains
,
that we might again scale the precipices, and catch
new views of the glorious scenery above and around us.
We hoped it would, for a little time, break the gloomy
chain of her associations. Sophy added her intreaties to
mine. She besought her sister to listen, and to go with
me, only that she might keep up her strength and spirits,
and be able to sustain the requisite nursing and watching.
She adeed, I feel as if this weary existence clung to me
against my will, and I have fears that I shall live to
wear you all out, and be the last to die myself.
This is probably carrying out with tedious minuteness the
details of our manner of passing the winter, the spring, and
the summer. I felt my mind acquiring a kind of indolent
melancholy, a stagnation of existence, constantly contrasted
with the bustle and adventures of the camp life that
preceded
it. Months passed, and left upon the memory no
traces but a general and gloomy recollection of the same
sad way of getting along. Nature had not changed. For
the birds sung as gaily as before. The mountains lifted
their blue heads, and were as brightly illumined by the sun.
But the mind of the beholders had changed. And the
brightest light of heaven can in this way become gloom.
Sophy herself seemed sometimes verging to fretfulness
and impatience. She said it was hard to endure the
thought of this slow decay; to be longing for the repose
of her father and sister; to be incapable of any comfort
herself, and to be a heavy clog on the strength and
enjoyments
of those who might otherwise be happy; and that
she was impatient to be gone. As the autumn advanced,
she began to discern the term wished for, for she
showed
marks of more rapid decline. She had regular and
daily paroxyms of hectic fever, in which, as is customary
in that flattering and terrible disease; the eyes glistened
with the strange fire and brilliance of an excitement of a
very peculiar cast, but which I have often noted, as
belonging
only to that disease. One general symptom is an
increase of excitement and sensibility. I will not phrase
it by the technical term, morbid, for in her case it was
delightful. It was the enthusiasm, the poesy of disease
and the tomb, sanctified by the most elevating hopes of
religion, and associated with the cheering expectation of
soon rejoining her departed friends. I remember many a
conversation, which produced in me the deepest thrill of
feeling. Now, that it is too late, I regret that I did not
heed them more, and even write them down. They are
all passed away, unrecorded, with her pure spirit.
Apparently
,
the hope of speedy dissolution would have been
rapture to her, but for the thought of leaving her sister in
loneliness and sorrow behind. When she expressed these
desires to be gone, her sister would sometimes grasp her
hand, and intreat her to live for her sake. Look you
here, she would reply, holding up her skeleton arm,
and see, dearest Wilhelmine, if I could live, even if I
wished it.
The last walk which we aided her to take, she was
impressed
with a presentiment that it would be her last, and
it was the most cheerful promenade which we had taken
for a long time. To us she seemed better. She stooped
to admire the freshness of the flowers that we had planted
over the graves of her father and sister, and which were
now unfolded in full bloom. She remarked upon the
delightfulness
of the morning, the freshness of the inspiring
air, and what has so often struck me as a beautiful
accompaniment
of morning scenery, the distant and mellow
baying
of our dogs, which, now that we had ceased to follow
them to the chase, took their accustomed range by
themselves
.
She remarked what a glorious and happy world
this would be, if we could always see such scenery, breathe
such an air, have the exercise of perfect health, have our
friends always with us, and have perpetually the exaltation
of feeling that she then felt. She read the inscription on the
tree repeatedly, her lips moved, and she looked upwards.
She then complained of fatigue, and requested us to aid
her to her couch. As soon as she had gained it, she
remarked
,
that of all these pleasant walks, this had been the
most delightful; and I perceive, said she, that you
have not been aware, that it has been my last. I then
remarked for the first time, that she was dressed with
more than her usual care and elegance. There was
something of fancy and poesy in the arrangement of the
drapery of her dress, and her head was decked with
flowers
.
There was, as usual, a slight tinge of the rose, in
the midst of the whiteness of alabaster in her cheek, and
her eye sparkled with the unearthly brilliance of hectic
inspiration
.
After we had laid her down, and fanned her for a
moment
,
she begged her sister to leave her, and go to a
distant part of the cave, and execute some little
commission
,
which they had previously arrangedadding, that
she felt quite comfortable, and that she had something
particular to say to me. Bryan arose and went away,
and her sister left her to execute her commission. Sit
close to me, said she, dear brother, and listen. I have
a great many things to say to you, and you must task your
patience. This is certainly a lonely and melancholy kind
VOL. II. 11
of life, that you have been leading here for a long time.
What would you think, if your sick sister, to whom you
have been so very kind, should spend her last moments, in
choosing a wife for you? Pray do not look with so much
astonishment, for I am not wild, but I shall speak to you
words of the most sober truth. I am sure there can be
nothing forbidding in the idea of my dear Wilhelmine for
a wife. Do you know that this dear girl has all this time
loved you in secret, and in silence? And such a love!
It is not the haughty and coarse sentiment of Dorothea,
nor the romantic fondness of the beautiful Martha; but a
something tenderer, and I am sure as pure, as that of a
sister. She has lived upon this deeply cherished feeling.
She would have died with the rest of us but for this. She
has had something, about which to think, and for which to
hope. You would be to her, father, and brother, and
sister
,
all in one. We have all known that she entertained
this feeling, and have felt, that instead of loving us the
less, she has loved us the more for it. At the moment
that we knew how deeply this feeling preyed upon her,
she inspired me with jealousy, for I thought she loved
Annette and her father, more then I did. Has she ever
betrayed this deep feeling by a word, or a look to you?
I answered, that I had not dreamed that she entertained a
feeling towards me, beyond sisterly kindness. There,
said she, you have Wilhelmine's character, just that
ardor
,
and just that self-control. She well understood all
that would be said, and that was said, about your living
with us, as you have done. Could you have heard what
she said to us on the subject! Oh! such a sister! If you
knew her but half as well as I do, your mind is such, that
you could not but love her in return. I wished this
conversation
,
that I might make you one request. And you
need have no fear of frequent teasing in this way. It is
my dying request. This dear girl knows nothing of my
purpose, scarcely suspects that I know she loves you.
The request is, that you should marry Wilhelmine.
To-morrow
she will be alone with you. You know what has
been said already. How much more will be said, when I
am gone. I love you too and with a sisterly tenderness,
but I think it is so disinterested, that I would not, to save
her reputation, or her life, ask you to do this, if I did not
firmly believe, that you are formed for each other, and
that she will render you happy;happier, I dare to say, my
dear brother, than even Martha herself. That
overwhelming
sentiment would finally triumph over her melancholy,
and the loss of us all. The times will change, and you
will soon be able to leave these mountains with safety and
honor. Unless she leaves them as your wife, she will not
leave them at all. Here she will spend the sad days of
her remaining existence.
She was here, so much exhausted, that she was obliged
to lie down, drawing her breath, with that short, rapid,
and laborious respiration, which marks, that the organs are
performing their functions so much the more rapidly, as
they are nearer running down. During this interval of
exhaustion, her sister came to the bed, apparently
ignorant
of the purport of her communications to me. We
applied all the little restoratives, that we could
command
.
Wilhelmine stood over her, feeling her pulse,
and struggling to suppress the appearance of alarm, and
laboring to treat this as one of her customary fits of
faintness. It was half an hour before she revived
sufficiently
,
to resume the conversation. We then raised her
again, and with a faint smile, she remarked to her sister
that she had not yet quite finished what she had to say.
Her sister retired again, and she resumed the
conversation
.
I had a great many more things to say to you,
but I perceive my strength is failing, and I must come to
an end. What say you, my dear brother, to my
proposition
?
I have been settling the great concerns of eternity,
for months. There is but this single concern on my mind.
Satisfy me on this point, and I should sink, as in sleep.
I could not bear the thought of her returning to the world,
to encounter shame and reproach; or of her remaining
alone in these mountains, with no other objects to
contemplate
,
than the graves of her father and her sisters. When
I am once gone, and you and she are left here alone, or
with no witness, no protection, but your servant, guilty
or innocent, it will be the same thing in the view of the
world. Surely you will not embitter my last moments,
by denying to your sister Sophy, the last request she will
ever make you.
I am not a casuist. I knew not what answer to give
at once to comfort the dying, and not commit my
conscience
and my future conduct. It occurred to me to
say, that she might be deceived in respect to her sister's
feelings, and to admit that I was previously occupied with
other sentiments, which I could not immediately conquer,
and that it would be injustice to Wilhelmine, to offer her
a divided affection. But the progress of her decay, saved
me from dissembling or prevarication, and her from the
agony of a refusal. She passed into that state of feverish
exaltation, in which she always found every thing
according
to her wishes. She called her sister with such a
strength of voice, that she heard her although at a
considerable
distance. Her sister came trembling, or rather
flew to the bed. I have finished with him, said she,
and now, dear Wilhelmine, I wish to speak to you both
together. She clasped both our hands in hers. Do
you remember, said she, how sweetly tranquil Annette
was, when she died? Well, I feel equally so. I am at
peace with God. The only earthly concern on my heart
is settled, as I could wish. I shall be happy with my dear
father and Annette, above the stars, and you two will be
happy together for a while on the earth. How sweetly
the mornings will rise upon you, when in your husband
you will find, father and sisters all supplied. Then you
can adore God, and admire this beautiful nature together,
without any fear of evil tongues. Long and happy may
you live together, and when you come to join us above,
may that sweet verse apply to you, as it does to my father
and sister; `They were lovely in their lives, and in their
death they were not divided.' For me, my dear
Wilhelmine
,
if I am permitted to change my abode, I will share
it in heaven with them, and on earth, by being invisibly
present with you. When you hear the birds sing most
sweetly, and see the mountains, and nature, and the earth,
and the air, and feel existence more delightful than
ordinary
,
think that the freed spirit of your sister is near;
that I enter into your joys, by the communication of mind
with mind, and that I watch over you, and wait for the
time when we shall all be together. Saying this, she
closed her eyes from simple exhaustion. We stood by
her with awe, almost unmixed with pain, and scarcely
grieved at the thought, that her disinterested and
affectionate
spirit had fled. But she recovered again, so far as to
open her eyes, and, with a sweet smile, to press our hands,
and when she closed her eyes once more, as in a quiet
sleep, we saw that she had ceased to suffer and to breathe.
I pass entirely by the sad details of this funeral, only
remarking, that it was managed as the former had been,
11 *
only with this difference, that the number of the
mourners
was less. We laid her beside her father who now
reposed
between those daughters, that were so dear to him
when alive. The same priestess prayed, and sung as
before
,
and it was the same sweet voice of suppressed
emetion
.
All that was necessary, to make the inscription on
the sycamore appropriate to the three, was the name, the
age, and the time of decease of her who was now united
with the other two. Wilhelmine proposed the addition of
a Spanish verse from Quevedo in the following words.
O tu, qui estas leyendo el duro caso,
Assi no veas jamas otra bermosura,
Que cause igual dolor al mal, que parso,
Que viertas llanto en esta sepultura.
The first month after this death, was a month of still
greater gloom and sadness, than we had yet experienced.
The loneliness, of course, was more complete and entire,
and our eyes were incessantly turned to the couches, from
which the sufferers had passed. Bryan went out silent and sad,
with his dogs to the chase, and he returned with his spoils,
equally silent and sad. Wilhelmine appeared to court
solitude
,
and I made it a point on the other hand, to leave
her as little alone, as possible. Within, she employed
herself
much, in adding to her funeral piece, and abroad, in
planting privet, and cape jessamines, and altheas, and the
most beautiful flowering shrubs, about the graves, and
many times in the day, she was carrying water to these
shrubs. At other times, she seated herself in silent
contemplation
for hours together, at the foot of the sycamore.
During this month, Bryan was once more despatched to
Durango, and once more returned in safety. No
important
change had occurred in the political world, nor was
there any presage of a time, when I might safely leave the
mountain. But this time Bryan brought me a letter, in the
handwriting which I knew so well. These were the
contents.
Sir
,
I have wept over the ruin of the amiable
family
,
with whom you fled to the mountains, victims of a
sympathy, for which the subjects of it do not thank you.
I have a kind of right in what remains of the family, for
Wilhelmine has been my companion, and my fixed friend, and
she was very amiable and good. Now, that her father and
sisters are dead, I feel it to be a duty due to her, to claim,
that you now either marry her, or send the poor forlorn
girl to me. However you may have thought before, you
must surely feel now, that she can no longer reside with
you, as formerly. I will receive, cherish, and comfort her,
will ask no questions, and will answer for her safety. You
cannot mistake your duty, nor my right to this kind of
interference. Present her my love and condolence, and
show her this.
After the first burst of grief for her sisters' death was past,
I did show her the letter. Indeed, I felt that the contents
of the letter were as true, as they were important to her.
She shed some tears, after she had read it, and for the
first time for months she blushed deeply. I thought it an
omen for good. It evidenced, that earthly emotions still
had their sway. I would hope, said she, that Martha has
written those cold words out of kindness. But I fear, that
she allowed other feelings to influence her, beside simple
regard for me. She does me injustice in her suspicions
but what she writes is not the less true, that we cannot
longer live together here with propriety. I feel it is a
hard case, for every friend on the earth is now gone but
you. But I must conform, like the rest, to the hard laws
established by common consent, to preserve reputation.
You may have felt, while my poor father was living, that
honor forbade you to escape, and leave him helpless, as he
was, and his helpless daughters, among these rugged
mountains
.
All these obstacles are now removed. There is
food for a long time for me alone. You have taught me to
be an Amazon. I can procure subsistence, and I have no
fear. I shall never feel lonely, for I shall always feel as
if in the society, and under the protection, of my father and
sisters. You cannot be more sensible, than I am, that you
cannot now remain with me. I never, never can return to
Durango. We all have our peculiarities of
temperament
,
and this is mine. Take your servant, and escape
to your own country, and be a useful and a happy man,
and think nothing further of me.
I answered, You cannot surely be serious in proposing
to remain here alone. Be assured, that I will never leave
you in this place. If you distrust me, or are dissatisfied
with my presence and society, to get rid of it you must
fly from me. But, I continued, Whilhelmine, you
remember
the conversation I held with your sister, just before
her death. In that conversation, she gave it to me as a
dying charge, to propose, what I am now about to propose.
I am sure, it is impossible to feel more tenderness, respect,
deeper, or more internal consideration for a woman, who
unites every thing that we seek in woman, than I feel for
you. I once derided the notion of any other love. But
I feel to my cost, that above and beyond these tender
sentiments
,
which have always led me to consider you as the
most amiable and perfect of human beings, there is a
sentiment
of another sort, which I have long felt, and expect
forever to feel, without any hope towards another person.
I am but too well aware, that, even if we could leave this
place with safety, your reputation would be in some sense
committed with mine. The world will measure us by the
scale of its own depravity, and not by that of your purity.
I can make you but one reparation for an unintentional
injury
.
It is beside the question to leave you here alone, let
the world say what it may. You cannot compel me to do that.
Will you remain with me as my wedded wife? I pledge
to you that honor, that was never violated, that the first
hour, when it can be done with safety for us both, I will
have the tie solemnized with all the publicity, and all the
rites of that church, which you shall prefer. And I will
strive by my tenderness and fidelity, to make you feel as
little, as may be, the loss of those dearer friends, that have
left you. The proposal appeared to fall abruptly, and
wholly unexpected, on her ear. But she seemed rather
overwhelmed, than offended. Blushes and the paleness
of death succeeded each other in her cheeks. She sat down
under an excess of agitation. Leave me, she said, a
few moments, to consider on what you have said. Return
after an hour, and I will give you an answer.
At the expiration of the time, I returned. She was
perfectly calm, and evinced great firmness of manner.
I am sensible, my dear brother, said she, of all the
heroism and disinterestedness of this most generous
sacrifice
,
which you offer. I may, perhaps, now without shame
admit, that I love you deeply, sincerely, and with all my
heart. Who could have seen, what I have seen, and do
otherwise? But though I may be romantic, I am neither
selfish nor weak. I refuse your generous offer, not because
I do not feel all the nobleness of your conduct, in making
it; nor because my own treacherous heart does not incline
me to accept it. But I will be generous, as nearly like you
as I can, and for that reason I will refuse your offer.
I know too well what love means, not to know the duties
which it imposes. No words upon the subject, if you
please. My resolution is taken, I cannot return to
Durango
.
I will confess all. I am not yet firm enough, to see
you happy with Martha. But, as the only return I can
make you for the noble disinterestedness of your
proposal
,
we will, if you consent, attempt to escape together to
the United States. I will make my way to your parents.
You have heard from my dear father, that he had large
sums in the British funds. Money could be of no further
use to me, but to relieve distress and do good. Perhaps,
she added, with her sad smile, I may find in that country
of laws and men, some other brother, who may disenchant
me, and cure this gloom, and restore me to myself and to
humanity. I can listen to no reply to any part of my
proposals
,
but the last.
I mediated for a moment, and reflected that the
chances
of our reaching the frontier multiplied in proportion,
as death had diminished our numbers. I mentioned the
thing to Bryan. The United States have always been the
paradise of the Irish. His thoughts had always been that
way, and he was in raptures at the proposal. Now God
Almighty bless your Honor, said he, you make my heart
stir within me again. And here it has lain, all the time I
have staid in this weary place, like a lump of lead. Will
I go, do you say? Yes, your Honor, I would cheat or fight
my way there, through an army of devils, to get away from
this country of blood. I have seldom found much use in
turning over plans and taking new views of them, when
they strike focibly at first sight. I informed Wilhelmine,
that since she refused me as a husband, I would
accompany
her flight as a brother, that I felt honored by the
choice she had made of my country, as a place of refuge,
and that, if we were so fortunate as to reach it, I did not
doubt, but my parents would receive her as a child.
It was a thing of course, to be attempted as soon as
possible
.
We all three prepared ourselves with Spanish
dresses, as little conspicuous as possible. We spoke the
language with considerable accuracy. We assumed the
badge of the Royalists. Our wagon, and many of our
more cumbrous possessions here, we cheerfully left to the
next occupant. Such articles as were necessary, or had
value attached to them from other circumstances, we
packed
,
and our cavalcade had the usual appearance of a
travelling
party in that country. The time for departure was
fixed for the following morning. The firmness and
excitement
of Wilhelmine, which had hitherto so wonderfully
sustained her, passed away on this occasion. The
remainder
of the day she was sad, silent, and in tears, giving
me wrong answers, and often running to execute business
most foreign from her apparent intentions. Our
arrangements
were soon settled. She retired to long private
devotions
,
and I requested her to go early to rest, to be
ready to leave with the rising sun. I was myself gloomy
and restless through the night. The moment I slept,
the honest Saxon, and his deceased daughters seemed to
be about me, upbraiding me for deserting them. I arose
a little after midnight, and went abroad. The fair and full
orb of the moon arose from the boundless fog of the plain,
as I have seen the sun arise on the sea, pouring her full
and melancholy light upon the hoary cliffs of these ancient
mountains. The owls were hooting responses from their
hollow trees. The funereal howl of the wolf rung from
cliff to cliff, and from cavern to cavern. In the intervals
of their howl, I heard the low moans of a human voice.
At first, I doubted my ear. The moans were repeated,
and in a manner to leave no doubt of their origin. I went
in the direction of the sound. Wilhelmine, for it was she,
arose from her kneeling posture beside the graves.
Forgive
me, she said, the indulgence of the last opportunity,
I may ever have, to visit these graves. I wished not to
distress you in the morning with my sorrows, and I desired
to finish these sacred duties, unwitnessed and alone.
What a place, in which to leave these dear and hallowed
remains! Wat a funeral torch is that pale moon! What
a monument these everlasting pillars of rock! What a
dirge the howl of those wolves in the caverns of the cliffs!
Here a poor orphan, with a continent and an ocean
between
her and the remotest kindred in the land of her
birth, is compelled to leave these dear remains to slumber
alone. If it be His will, who orderth all things right, I
would gladly return to this spot once more. But if not,
there is as short a passage from these mountains to the
celestial
mansions, as from any other place. Your spirits,
my dear departed friends, I doubt not have found the road
to your home. Farewell, then. Rest in peace, until the
plains and the mountains, the earth and the sea, shall give
up their dead. I would have persuaded her to return to
her couch, to avoid the gloom of the scene, and the
dampness of the night air. But I saw, that she intended
to pass the remainder of the night there, and that my
presence was a restraint upon the expression of her
feelings
.
I left her to commune with the night, and with
these graves, and to utter thoughts, intended only for the
Divine ear.
It was a cheerful morning to all the world, but the
solitary
tenants of this cave. A thousand circumstances
united
,
to render it an affecting event to us all, to leave this
place. We were once more putting to sea in the midst
of the storm. But the idea of the dangers, upon which
we were throwing ourselves, was not the circumstance the
most impressive. The cheerful hours I had spent with
the dead, the quietness and repose of the place, a
thousand
blended associations bound me to this spot. So
dear was it to me, so many attachments to it had grown
up in my heart, that albeit unused to the melting
mood, as we were packing, and making arrangements to
mount our horses, my eyes involuntarily filled with tears.
But I felt it must be so much more affecting, and painful
to Wilhelmine, that it became to set her an example
of calmness. The dogs that belonged to the defeated
Royalists, had followed us here, and had been faithful
companions, and of great utility in the chase. They came
about us, wagging their tails, and, apparently knowing
that we were about to decamp. It became a question
whether to take them, or leave them. Bryan's heart
swelled at the thought of leaving them behind. Please
your Honor, said he, dogs are good luck. I would
not leave them for my right hand. We concluded, that
the pack of dogs would be in keeping with our cavalcade,
and we rejoiced Bryan's heart by consenting.
Bryan led the van. The dogs raised their joyous cry,
and preceded us on the way down the mountain. Now,
said I, dear Wilhelmine, as a brother, since you have
forbidden
me the use of a dearer name, I implore you to give
me a good omen, as we depart, and not go away in
sorsow
.
This place, I well know, must be dear to you by
the tenderest associations. We have had our joys here,
as well as our sorrows. We believe, however, that all
that part of these dear friends that is worthy of mention,
has passed beyond pain and toil, to the repose of the just.
All that we leave here, is unconscious dust. We have
VOL. II. 12
not striven with the nature, which renders that dust dear.
For we deposited it with awe in the earth, and we
bedewed
it with out tears. We have planted flowers, that
will continue to spring on the sod when we are away. If
the gentle spirits that once animated these bodies, descend
from their clouds to these mountains, they will still hear
the red-bird, in whose song they so much delighted when
alive, singing their requiem. Perhaps, in safety and honor,
we may one day be allowed to revisit these mountains,
and remove the dust to a more hallowed rest. It is still
at your option, to return under my protection as brother, or
with the still dearer name of husband. Saying this, I
assisted
her to her horse, and we took our solitary way, after
Bryan, down the mountain. I was neither disappointed
nor sorry, when I heard, by her audible sobbing, that her
heart was throwing off its load of oppression, in
unrestrained
weeping.
CHAPTER IV.
The world was all before them, where to choose
Their place of rest, and Providence their guide.
De essa tu bondad immensa,
Por que no ay mayor defensa,
Que contigo, para ti.
Lope de Vega
.
We
made our way down to the plains, determined to
travel on the prairies, as wide as possible from the
accustomed
track of men, and if we met with any people
disposed to question us, to evade their questions, if
possible
,
to excite as little attention as we might, and that if we
were assailed with a view to our apprehension, should
there not be fearful odds against us, to attempt to defeat the
assailants. For myself, I was determined not to be taken
alive. The first day we traversed the customary grassy
plains, and we saw nothing but herds of wild cattle, and
one or two solitary Indians, who crossed our path on
horseback, and seemed quite as glad to avoid us, as we
were to avoid them. We had a kind of tent prepared at
night, for Wilhelmine; and Bryan and myself slept by a
fire, the one at the head and the other at the foot of the
tent.
We travelled unquestioned, and without annoyance,
some days, until in making a wide circuit among the
wooded hills, to avoid Chihuahua, we were encountered
by three persons, who hailed us as Patriots, but who were
unquestionably robbers. They fired upon us, and we
returned their fire, but at such a distance, that we
received
no other harm than the wounding of one of our horses.
In passing the vicinity of towns and villages, we thought it
most prudent to lie by in sheltered retreats by day, and to
travel by night. A fortunate occurrence prevented us
from the necessity of further disguise or concealment.
We were making a distant circuit to the left, to avoid the
town of Coahuila. We were descending an abrupt and
precipitous hill, a little after sunset. Before we were
aware, we had descended immediately upon a small
encampment
of soldiers at the foot of the hill, concealed
from us by thick trees, until we had almost stumbled upon
their camp. We motioned Wilhelmine to remain, and I
and Bryan, with as little appearance of concern as we
could assume, rode up to them. They saluted us with
great courtesy, asking us the news. We assigned as a
reason for having none, that we had come far from the
interior at the northwest, which was indeed the fact. We,
of course, inquired the news in return. They informed
us, that they were marching to Chihuahua, that a
great revolution had commenced at Mexico, that Iturbide
had been proclaimed emperor, and that all parties in the
capital, and the more populous provinces, had been merged
in this new one; that Royalists and Patriots had coalesced,
that the Royal commandants had resigned, that there was,
in fact, at this time, no king in Israel, and that every
man did what seemed good in his sight; that all that
was necessary, was, for every one to be able to guard his
own, and that they were marching to the south, to join
themselves to the imperial army. They added many
more details of the same sort. We readily perceived that
they were sanguine adventurers, possessing no exact
information
upon the points about which they affirmed. But
their information, at least, went so far, as to relieve us
from all apprehensions of being arrested as Patriots, as
the dominant party now called themselves by that name.
I was every way happy in being thus relieved. It was
extremely painful to travel with a young lady, used to the
former habits of Wilhelmine, in this unpleasant way of
concealment. She would now, not only be relieved from
travelling in the night, and from many privations and
hardships, but I calculated soon to place her under
respectable
female protection. I had had enough, too, of deserts,
and a surfeit of solitude. We had been faithfully taught
the comforts of crowded cities, of civilized life, and the
haunts of men. We immediately got directions for
Coahuila, from which we were distant little more than a
league, and we determined to spend the night there.
We arrived at the outskirts of the town at nine in the
evening
.
We made many useless inquiries, where we might
find entertainment and lodgings for the night. There was
so much distrust, and people had been so long in the habit
of considering strangers as enemies, that we despaired of
gaining admission any where, and began to regret leaving
the shelter of the wood. At length I obtained a visit from
a nun, who, after carefully inspecting us, and especially
Wilhelmine, whose sweet and melancholy face could not
but secure for her a favorable opinion, and after returning,
and consulting with her sisterhood, came back, and
admitted
Wilhelmine to entertainment and lodgings in her
convent
for the night. On their recommendation, I and
Bryan were admitted to the house of a
cur
, where we
were comfortably and hospitably accommodated. It was
the first night that either of the three had enjoyed in the
luxury of a bed, for more than a year.
During this night, I lay restless on my down; and as
many thoughts and reflections passed through my mind,
as could well be crowded into so short a space of
time. You may suppose that I had some ties to this
country
,
that rendered the thought of leaving it forever,
sufficiently
painful. The dangers and hairbreadth escapes
which I had experienced in it, only bound me to it the
more. Some invisible band, the band of destiny, I must
suppose, still tied my heart to it. I thought much too of
Wilhelmine. She wished to fly to my country. My
parents
had seemed to her desolate heart, in place of the
friends she had lost. She was beautiful, amiable, and
accomplished
,
had strong sense, the most affectionate heart,
and the profoundest sensibility. She had an ample
fortune
,
and every new position, in which I had seen her, had
called forth new virtues and attractions. In every change
of condition, I had seen developed sweet dispositions,
winning
manners, and the most exalted and generous
principles
12*
of action. Why could I not love so amiable a
woman
?
What more could I expect on the earth, than to
return with such a wife to my father's house, and enjoy
the gifts of Providence and fortune, in peace and privacy?
It was not vanity, that assured me she loved and trusted
me, and had only rejected my offer, because she was
aware, that the affection was not equal and mutual. Why
should I leave her thus doubly forlorn, as she would then
be? Still farther, I discovered in the recesses of my
heart, that although something was wanting in my feelings,
there was a train of thought connected with her, that
rendered
the idea of parting from her exquisitely painful; and
the notion of her loving and uniting herself with another,
struck me with something of bitterness, that I had learned
too well to class under the name of jealousy.
My resolution for the future was, however, taken
during
this night. It was, to escort her so far on her way to
the United States, as to put her under proper protection
if she chose to stay; or otherwise, for her journey to any
part of the country, that she might select. For myself, I
resolved to return to the centre of the scene of action, and
if, on investigation, I approved the cause, that I would
offer
myself as a volunteer, in the armies of Iturbide. I
informed
Wilhelmine, when I met her in the morning, of
this my resolution. She showed herself prepared for it.
She could not restrain some tears, but she added, directly,
My mind has been prepared for this, or any thing else, that
can happen. It will be hard, to find myself entirely alone
in this wide world, and to lose such a friend, and such a
brother, at the last. I tremble, too, to leave you in this
wild and wicked country. But every one must fill up his
destiny. You can have little idea, how I shall feel at the
thought of leaving you behind me here. I do not
complain
.
I feel, that the same tie, were I in your case, would
detain me too. You know, I answered, my dear
Wilhelmine, that it is in your power, at any moment, to
arrest my steps, and to command my tenderness and my
duty, to the last hour of my life. I well understand
that, too, she replied. You are in no doubt why I do
not avail myself of a protection so dear to me. I am not
going to prove myself ungrateful for all that you have
done, by repining that you cannot do more. I remember
it all. And my pride, for I have plenty of it, little as you
seem to suspect it, is saved by the reflection, that my
misfortune
probably resulted from your having seen Martha
first. My dear brother, I pardon you, that your heart
still clings to this country. Would that I were a man! I
would go to the wars with you. And no danger should
reach you, that my powers or my life could avert. As
it is, I cannot follow your steps. There is but one place
in this country, but what is hateful to me. I will go
farther
.
I have not yet strength of mind enough, to bear to see
you happy with Martha. But, if you feel that love and
honor call you to stay, it shall not be said, that you are
obliged to tie yourself to the steps of a fond and weak
girl. Leave me then, and return, and fill up your destiny;
and if there be any prevalence in my prayers, you cannot
be other than great and happy.
Thinking over a thousand things last night, she
continued
,
it occurred to me, that you would ultimately
come to the resolution, which you have adopted. I
learned
last night, in conversation with the nuns, that there is
now in this town a Protestant minister, or a heretic, as
they call him, with his sister, on their way from Mexico to
the United States. I made inquiries about them, and I
discovered, that the extreme jealousy of the Catholics, on
the score of Protestant ministers coming among them, in
these times of revolution, has induced them to sift every
circumstance in relation to these people. It occurred to
me, that I would procure an introduction through you to
them, and if in your judgment, their characters suited, I
would put myself under their protection, and journey with
them to the United States.
According to her wishes, I went abroad and inquired
for these persons. Such was the bigoted jealousy of these
people, that I found no difficulty in obtaining directions to
their lodgings. There was in the town a kind of
hacienda
,
where people from the States, who had begun in
considerable
numbers to travel from the American frontiers
to Mexico, usually associated together. Here I found the
gentleman and his sister, introduced myself, and made
known my object. The gentleman was shrewd, guarded,
and cautious, and perfectly aware of the light in which
Protestant ministers were viewed here. My dialect, and
every thing about me, shortly convinced him, that I was
no spy, and he became communicative at once. He told
me, that his name and appellation were the Reverend
Thomas S, a preacher of the Methodist connexion, who
had a local society in the valley of the Mississippi; that
his society had heard much conversation of late, about the
country in the interior of Mexico, and had received high
impressions of its mines, its fertility, and the richness of its
productions. They had, in consequence, become
disgusted
with their own slow and laborious ways of gaining
subsistence
.
They had a fixed impression, that a revolution
was at hand in this country, and they wished to be among
the first, who, in a new order of things, might reap the
advantage of the bestowment of lands. They had deputed
this gentleman as a precursor, to spy out the land, and
bring back some of its goodliest clusters and figs, and
ascertain
the prospect and the advantages of gaining a tract
of land, where they might settle together. He had
commenced
this journey with his sister, and easily
ascertaining
how an avowed Protestant minister would chance in
that country, he had doffed the character for a while, or
rather sunk it in that of land-speculator. As such, he
had a passport. He had made his way to the city of
Mexico, and thus far back, without committing this
character
.
But the recent revolution having been rather
unfavorable to the influence of priests, and all parties
being
involved for the time, in suspicions from every quarter,
he had begun to feel it more safe to take his real
character
from his pocket. The natural zeal of proselytism,
which adheres more strongly to this sect than any other,
had operated on him, to hold forth to some Americans in
this city, in private. The thing reached the hearing of
the priests and magistrates, in half an hour, and nothing
would have saved him from the mines, but the relaxation
of all power, and the lawlessness and the terrors of an
interregnum
.
The sister was a well formed and rather pretty woman;
half fine and half Quakerish in her dress; of unlettered
shrewdness, and the severe sanctity of restraint and
seriousness
,
so characteristic of the profession. A certain
smile, that showed brilliant and fine teeth, and a pretty
movement of the head, evidenced a little spice of woman,
mixed up with the ingredients of the saint. The man
was large, finely formed, and broad chested; with long
hair hanging down his shoulders, plump and ruddy
cheeks, a rather handsome face, and a voice
naturally
deep, mellow, and delightful, but which a vile trick of
the profession had accustomed him to twang through his
nostrils, with a sound, not unlike a brazen trumpet. His
suit was solemn black, neither fine nor coarse, but made
with the most rigid regard to the Methodistic costume.
Occasionally, deep sighs, and groans half suppressed,
as if from distress of cholic, an assumption of canonical
and immaculate sanctity, frequent ejaculation of the words,
Gracious Lord! did not conceal from any observer, of
ordinary acuteness, the quickness of his apprehension upon
every point of worldly advantage. I made him acquainted
with the character, situation, and views of my amiable
protege
. When I spoke of her exquisite sensibility, and
great beauty and goodness, I perceived by his
excitement
,
that he mentally contemplated the conquest of such a
fair and amiable subject to his sect. When I mentioned
that her father had been ennobled, and had left her an
immense fortune in the British funds, his habitual caution,
and apparent elevation above all thoughts of earth, forsook
him, in his eagerness to obtain so promising a prize. The
flush of trembling impatience to close with me, and
undertake the job, actually and visibly flashed in his face.
He caught the aroused suspicion of my eye. He uttered
one of his suppressed groans, and in a moment he had the
air again, of being an abstract intelligence, and of having
the world under his feet. I felt internal distrust, not
altogether
unmixed with something like indignation, at the
thought of resigning this frank and amiable girl, to the
care of a man, so capable of art and design. But the
protection
was, in most points, better than could have been
expected, in such a place; and in some points, as good as
could be desired. The whole aspect of things, spoke
clearly, that no advantage would be taken, but that which
would result from the conquest of the mind of my
protege
in a state, peculiarly favorable to imbibing such
impressions
,
as the plan of operations would naturally tend to
produce. He so readily comprehended, that I was not a
fit subject to work upon, and he so directly saw the
land lay with respect to me, that it was with the utmost
circumspection, and starting numerous small difficulties,
and easy to be vanquished, that he consented to be
introduced
to Wilhelmine. He affected to be indifferent,
while the inner man was trembling with eagerness and
impatience. He finally consented, that if all parties
desired
it after the introduction, he would consent to take
her along with his sister.
Introduced him and his sister to Wilhelmine. I was
half amused to see her cast her mild and pensive eye upon
the form of the sister and brother, and traverse them from
head to foot. The first impression was the obvious one, to
an unsuspicious mind, of the purity and sanctity of the
parties
,
and the perfect safety and propriety of their
protection
.
The next was, that curiosity would be gratified,
and that people so unique, and different from any thing she
had yet seen, would furnish her a new study. The subject
of her wishes was introduced by herself, in a few simple
words. As soon as she touched upon her melancholy,
and the cause of it, so fair an opportunity was not allowed
to escape; and with a deep intonation of his mellow voice,
and his eye cast upward, he descanted most eloquently
upon his favorite and kackneyed topic. The manner of all
this was perfectly new to the unsuspecting Wilhelmine.
She was melancholy, and she was disposed to deep and
religious feeling. The tones of his voice, and his manner,
so solemn and austere, struck a latent string, which only
needed this key note, to cause it to vibrate. When he
spoke of religion, as comprising all that we need on earth,
of the union of happy spirits above, and of the necessity
of treading the earth under foot, every word thrilled upon
the heavy and disappointed heart of Wilhelmine, and her
first feeling was thankfulness, that in losing my society
she would thus have inexhaustible resources opened to her
by another, a character so saint-like and superior, and so
little to have been expected here. The observant eye of
the minister, quailed under the frank and straight forward
inspection of Wilhelmine. Parties could scarcely be
better
satisfied with one another. All the arrangements of
preparation on her part, were entrusted to me, and they
waited her time for departure. He asked her, how soon
she would be able to depart, and with a voice trembling
with emotion, she asked me, when I proposed to leave
Coahuila, for that she could not think of departing for my
country, to leave me still in that place. Her departure
was fixed to take place in two days, as my
arrangements
in her favor could not be settled in a shorter time.
In a long and confidential conversation, I promised her, if
I was spared, and circumstances admitted, to return this
way in a year, and find her out wherever she might be.
I gave her letters to my parents and friends, if she should
be disposed to continue her journey so far. I had all the
terms, upon which the parties were to journey or reside
together, drawn up and executed with legal exactness,
and the whole plan was settled on the footing of services
rendered on the one part, and full compensation on the
other. She afterwards had sufficient reason to see the
prudence of these precautions.
I hesitated, how to inspire in her confiding nature a
sufficient
degree of caution, about putting her property in
these people's power, without, at the same time, inspiring a
distrust of them, unfavorable to her peace and enjoyment,
while in their society. I endeavored, generally, to
insinuate
that it would not be safe for her, to measure human
nature by the standard of her own heart; that man was
every where, and under all circumstances, a being so
intrinsically
selfish, and at the best, so liable to be actuated
by mixed motives, that, for her own independence and
comfort, she ought to hold her affections, her confidence,
and her property, as much as possible, in her own control,
and her own keeping; and that little had been ever lost by
distrusting appearances, and being slow in confidence. In
fact, I turned sage and philosopher, and I gave the sweet
girl as many grave maxims, to regulate her department, as
the Don did Sancho, when he sent him away, to govern his
`Oil-land.'
When I had brought my chapter of maxims to an end,
she turned her melting eye full upon me, And how came
you, said she, who, I think, are not so much older than
myself, to know so much about human nature, and bad
human nature too? I well know, you have not drawn
from your own heart. Have you seen a great deal of
evil? Can there be cause for distrust of people, who seem
always to have heaven in their eye? My dear brother,
you would tremble, if you knew how near I have been,
during the past night (for I slept not a moment) coming to
the resolution, to accept the alternative, that you had placed
in my power. This must be a bad world. Every one
says so. How tranquil and confiding I have always been
with you? Why should we part now? Indeed,
Wilhelmine
,
I answered, propose that question to your own
heart. It must be, she replied,and I will remember
every word you have said, and when I want to be cautious,
and prudent, I will think of you. One thing I advise you.
Woman is changeable, you say. Unless you wish to be
burdened with a wife, depart quickly. Another thing I
VOL. II. 13
propose, and I am sure you are too kind to hesitate, and
that is, to divide my fortune with you. My dear
father
,
while living, intended to have made you equal with
us in this division. There were then, three; and there is
now but one. The reasons for carrying his wishes into
effect have been gathering weight; and in offering you
this, I am not thinking of compensation for kindnesses,
that are beyond price; but simply carrying into effect the
wishes of my father. To this I replied, that to a soldier of
fortune, rushing into the contest, in a revolution so full of
danger and uncertainty, money, beyond my immediate
wants, was of no use,and to that extent, she knew I was
supplied already. But I promised that, on my return, I
would converse with her on the subject, and consent
to any thing, that would give her pleasure. The only
return
I could make to so generous a proposal was, to offer
her the services of Bryan, so far as I could induce him to
accompany her; and his services would be to her
invaluable
.
To this she replied, that fond as she was of Bryan,
and much as he would remind her of me, that she could
never consent to take from me so faithful a friend, and
one who would be so necessary to me.
As he had always manifested a wish to go to the United
States, I mentioned to him my purpose. Said I, Bryan, you
have always been wishing to go to my country. I have no
need of a servant where I am going; nor do I wish to involve
you in my dangers. You can now go on to my country
with Wilhelmine, and all the kindness and fidelity you
show to her, will be more than done to me. He scratched
his head, and appeared to be in a study for a moment.
But Wilhelmine was away, and he felt himself at liberty
to say all that was in his heart. Why, said he, your
Honor seems to want to get rid of me, and I know I am of
no great account. Your country must be a good country,
for I have heard it for certain, that whiskey it but little
dearer than water, and that every man is at least as high
as captain. Wilhelmine is a sweet good girl, and the
prettiest
but one in the world. I would give her three fingers
of either hand any day. But, God love your Honor, I
would give you my whole body, and my blood and bones
into the bargain. If your Honor turns me away, good.
But your Honor don't think I'm such a coward as to be
afraid of the Dons. I go with your Honor, come devil,
come dobbie. Further, your Honor, I don't like that
queer minister-man, at all, at all. Bother him! don't his
voice twang in his nose like a trumpet? Do you think he
did'nt ask me my religion? And I told him my father's
to be sure. And then he run on such a rig! Oh! bother
him, he turn'd my brain round like a smoke-jack. But,
for one thing, the devil will have him, that's certain. He
said, that if I worshipped the saints, (Saint Patrick among
them!) I should go to hell! Think of that, your Honor!
I'm no coward. But I'd rather fight the Dons, than go
with such a man.
The remainder of the time until we parted, Wilhelmine
passed for the most part with me, and in conversations so
affectionate and solemn, that they were not soon forgotten.
I pass over a most painful interval. The morrow, and the
parting came. I aided her on horseback. Bryan wept like a
child. The minister uttered his deep farewell. Neither
Wilhelmine
nor myself trusted our feelings to words or looks.
Our faces mutually averted, I received the final pressure of her
hand, and heard the receding trample of their horses die away
in the distance. And you may imagine the loneliness of
my solitary apartment when I returned to it and found it
empty.
A regiment was making up in Coahuila for the city of
Mexico, and the service of Iturbide. There were some
adventurers from the United States in this regiment. The
members generally professed to be Patriots, and they
thankfully
received me as a volunteer among them. The
society of my compatriots, and still more of Bryan, was
some relief to my mind in the bitterness of Wilhelmine's
loss. But how dreary did the selfish and heartless
society
about me seem, in comparison of hers. As we drew
near to Durango, however, another train of emotions began
to supplant these feelings of loneliness and desolation.
My heart beat more rapidly at every step. Every thing
began to bring Martha before me. The new position of
things, in which her father's family was placed, might
abate something of the lofty tone of his feelings, and I
entertained
hopes in spite of myself. Bryan, too, was
delighted
with the thought of having the range of his fat
kitchen once more. Judge of our disappointment, when, on
entering Durango, I inquired for the Conde, and found
that he and his family had been summoned by the new
government to Mexico, under penalty of proscription and
confiscation of property, in case of refusal.
The father of Dorothea met me in the street, and insisted
upon my accompanying him home. He there brought
down the chronicle of events to the present time, and he
gave me a connected view of all that happened while I had
been retired in the mountains. Dorothea was the same
dashing and gay young lady, that I had formerly known
her, equally fond of dress and display; equally kind, and
ready to forgive my want of taste and gallantry, to this time,
and receive me still, and, if I still continued blind, equally
ready to console herself, and be on the lookout for another.
When she saw me determined to go on to Mexico, she caused
to be prepared for me many little articles of the first
necessity
,
and furnished me with many things for comfort, and the
ordinary ornaments of a soldier, and begged me to accept
them in memory of her. In all this kindness, there were
few words, and little circumlocution. All seemed to be
mercantile and matter-of-fact business. Her father, too,
undoubtedly fulfilling her wishes, offered me a purse, with
soldier-like frankness. When I informed him, that my
purse was yet well filled, he smiled, shook his head,
and remarked, that in this country, a handsome young man
that was well with the ladies, had nothing to fear.
I might give you a sketch of the particulars of my
journey
from Durango to the city of Mexico, but it would
betray
me into details, beyond my purpose. To take a
retrospective
view of what had been happening in the centre
of this empire, where I had not yet been, would be equally
foreign to my plan.
The regiment with which I had marched, joined
themselves
to the imperial army at the city of Queretaro, and I
and Bryan continued our course alone to Mexico.
Travelling
at our leisure, I omitted no opportunity to gratify he
eye and the imagination, as we went along.
The city of Mexico, though on an elevated table of
more than seven thousand feet above the level of the sea,
has still the appearance of occupying a low and marshy
situation, as in fact it does. It has been, as every one
knows, more than once inundated, and that for years, by
the accumulated water of the lakes, during the rainy
season
.
I was within a league of this celebrated city, before
I had a distinct view of it; and then the wide circuit, over
which arose so many spires and turrets, and above which
lay the murky smokes, and the dun mist of a city, gave
me magnificent ideas of its extent. None of the cities of
13*
my own country raise so much promise in proportion;
for the catholic cities have a greater number of spires,
generally, than the protestant. The approach to this city,
as is the case generally with the Spanish cities in America,
is mean; and you are led to them by clay cabins, and
through muddy lanes, where hundreds of domestic animals
dispute the mud and dust with the passing traveller. But
all this only forces the immediate contrast of magnificence
and splendor, more strongly on the eye. Travellers
competent
to compare, have said, that few cities in the world
exceed this in the magnificence of its buildings, and
especially
in the comfort and luxury of the interior
arrangements
of the houses. Every one has heard, that this is
the city of churches, and notwithstanding my raised
expectations
,
the number, the grandeur, and solidity of these
colossal structures, were matters of astonishment.
There was an appearance of
fte
and display in the
streets and squares, as we slowly rode through them.
The coronation of the Emperor had not long since taken
place. The forced rejoicings of that occasion were hardly
over, before there was an illumination for three nights in
succession
,
on account of a recent victory, said to have been
gained by the emperor's troops over some patriot
guerillas
,
that still held out against him in the mountains. We
arrived on the second evening of this illumination. It was
produced with colored lights, and had a most brilliant and
gaudy effect. We rode leisurely along these magnificent
streets, crowded with passengers, the greater part of them
glittering with lace, while their dress terminated in rags.
Thousands of drunken and disgusting lepers infested the
streets, like musquetoes. The isolation of my own case,
contrasted with such a moving mass of life, amidst so much
fracas
, and riot, and bacchanalian joy, fell upon my heart
with more force from contrast. I felt what, I suspect,
every traveller of any sensibility has felt, on arriving in a
distant and strange city, with double force, the solitude of
my own condition, in comparison of these moving
thousands
,
so joyous and gay, who have their affinities,
even the miserable lepers their circles of friendship,
that lie together under their open sheds. In this vast
city, there was but a single family, that I knew, and
with that family, pride, with a multitude of other
considerations
,
forbade me from attempting to renew my
acquaintance
,
unless advances on their part, or very different
circumstances on mine, should call for its renewal. I
spent so much of the evening, in riding about the city,
comparing its gaiety and brilliance with my own loneliness,
that the night was closing in, before we had found a
shelter in which to spend it. Here I found my
knowledge of the language to be of infinite service. That,
and my wearing the costume of the country, prevented me
from exciting distrust and suspicion as a stranger. I
was directed to that splendid inn, called Sociedad
Grande, and there I obtained lodgings for myself and
Bryan. From an American gentleman of high standing,
who had long resided in this city, and who now had lodgings
at this inn, I obtained a succinct, but lucid and
intelligible
view of things, as they were at present in Mexico.
Iturbide appears to have been a soldier of fortune,
possessing
the single requisite of personal bravery. When
taken from the field, and there he seems to have been
properly
competent only to subordinate command, he shows in
the cabinet a miserable destitution of every requisite quality
for a statesman. His learning was sophomoric and
superficial
in a ludicrous degree. The hearer can hardly
restrain
a smile, to hear him quote facts as matters of history,
that never took place, and apply legislative maxims, that
never had an existence except in his own brain. The
laborious turgidness of his speeches,
exposs
, and projects
of laws, are but miserable parodies of the same things, by
his splendid precursor, Napoleon. His vacillating policy
is at once mean, rash, timid, and cruel. Chieftain after
chieftain has been unnecessarily sacrificed. I learned
here, that the brave and amiable Morelos had fallen a
sacrifice to the new order of things. My amiable friend,
Don Pedro, under an assumed name, corresponding to his
new dignity, was minister of war, and the deeper counsels
of the father Josephus, united with his, were supposed to
sway the measures of the imperial government. This
intelligence
enlightened me in a moment, as to the ground
I had to expect any honorable place in the present order
of things. These men ruling the star of the ascendant,
it was even questionable, if I were safe in the city. On
a very little inquiry, and the most obvious aspect of things,
I was clearly impressed, that an honest man could have no
part nor lot in this matter, and had nothing to do, but to
get away, as fast as possible from the country, or remain
here in profound concealment.
The gazette of the next morning after my arrival
contained
a long and pompous account of the illumination of
the preceding night, the rejoicings of the populace, and
a ball, graced with the presence of the imperial family. I
was reading along with careless indifference, and wading
through the strings of titles and orders of the several guests,
when my eye was arrested, and fixed upon the name of
Doa
Martha, who was mentioned as the brightest star of the
constellation of beauties, that had blazed at the
fte
. The
comforting addition, of her being engaged
to his
Excellency
,
the minister of war, and shortly
to be
united to him,
was given, as the report of the evening. There were
many other details, equally agreeable and refreshing. It
was in fact the common report of the city, and the
beauty, accomplishments, and wealth of the lady, were
matter of common discussion at the tables in the Sociedad
Grande.
My first thought was to fly from the city, which became
hateful to me, and to return on my steps and
overtake
Wilhelmine, before she should have contracted
indissoluble
engagements with another. But I found the
influence
of some unaccountable motive still detaining me here.
I spent this and the following day, in wandering about the
city, viewing its churches and towers, its curious
collections
of the plants of every clime, its noble arched
aqueducts, its beautiful Alameda, its astonishing contrasts
of meanness and magnificence, opulence and poverty. I
believe no other place on the earth presents them to the
eye in a manner equally glaring. I meditated deeply,
too, on the ruins of the ancient Indian city, and the
countless
generations, whose bones had served to raise the
foundations above the surrounding morass. I could have
found sufficient amusement for weeks, in these meditations,
if my heart had been more tranquil.
On my return to my lodgings this evening, Bryan
informed
,
that a note had been left for me, in my absence,
and that he had vainly endeavoured to find out the bearer,
or trace the mode of its conveyance. But, said he,
as he handed it with a grim of satisfaction, may be your
Honor can make out the hand. In truth, I knew the fair
and beautiful characters, as soon as they met my eye. I
broke it open, and read with trembling eagerness these
words in the handwriting of Doa Martha. Your life is
in danger, if you again go abroad unarmed, and alone in
the dark. Why should you expose yourself without
occasion
or necessity? You have been traced out by enemies.
Be always armed, and with your servant. It were better
that you changed your residence, and gave out that you
were leaving the city.
I pressed the lines to my lips, and blessed her as my
guardian genius in my heart, and began to think, that
the life, in which she interested herself so much, was
worth preserving. It convinced me too, that, retired and
unknown as I had thought myself, I had been discovered,
not only by this fair friend, but, I doubted not, by my old
enemies, the father, and minister at war, who, it appeared,
would never forgive my having twice saved their lives. I
was aware of my danger, from their bad preeminence.
But I had encountered so many dangers, and come off
safe from them, that I began to feel a kind of reckless
confidence
in my destiny. At least, I said to myself, that the
man, who aspired to love Martha, ought not to allow
invisible terrors to make him seek a retreat or a covert.
I imparted that part of the billet, which intimated that I
was in danger, to Bryan. Our suspicions were mutually
confirmed by his informing me, that a stranger had
accosted
him the preceding evening, in Spanish, and had made
the most minute inquiries about me, my place of residence,
my associates, and my objects here. Our conclusion was,
without hesitation, that Don Pedro had found me out, and
that his object was to destroy me by assassination, of which
I did not doubt him to be capable. I had too much reason
to fear, that if he could not succeed that way, I might be
arrested with other state victims, who were daily led to the
prisons, and there destroyed in private, or heard of no
more. It was the fashion for every one to go armed in a
city, where not a night passed without assassinations. I
armed myself and Bryan to the teeth, and we determined
that our lives should not be cheaply sold.
I, this evening, met one of the American officers, who
had been with me in the battle of Palos Blancos, near St.
Antonio. He had escaped from that battle, and had made
his way to Mexico, and now resided in the city, in
considerable
estimation. I did not think his way of gaining his
subsistence very creditable. He had won large sums at a
gambling establishment in the city, and was soliciting an
extensive grant of lands from the Mexican government.
He informed me, in confidence, that he was associated
with a body of malecontent Patriots in this city, of
increasing
influence, and embracing some of the most influential
men in the city. He informed me of their strength, and
numbers, their plans and resources, and invited me to
accompany him to their meeting. It passed, at present,
under the name of an Inquiring Society, and though the
government had some suspicions of the object of the
meeting
,
either there was not enough known to form a ground
of accusation, or such was the strength and importance of
the members, that the government deemed it most prudent
to wink at their proceedings. I reflected, that there was
little danger of my committing myself any more with the
government, than I had already, and as my feelings inclined
me to the Patriots, I determined to attend the meeting.
My compatriot introduced me to the meeting. It was
in a large subterranean apartment, in a retired quarter of the
city, which had belonged to the assay department, and had
been used as a chemical laboratory for private experiments
upon minerals. Here were met in dark divan those
Patriot
chiefs, who were disaffected towards the assumed
power
of Iturbide. I was formally introduced by the American
officer, as one who had fought honorably for the Patriot
cause in the internal provinces. It happened that a
number
of my compatriots, who had escaped from the
unfortunate
fight of Palos Blancos were there, and they all bore
a united and strong testimony to the manner in which I
had conducted in that and other affairs. I was received
with great applause and consideration. The meeting
contained besides Americans and provincials, more than
thirty distinguished citizens. Among them, plainly but
superbly dressed, and in all the conscious dignity of his
intrinsic
weight of character, I immediately recognised the
interesting exile of the mountains, who presided in the
meeting. From the kindling of his eye, and that cheering
look of recognition, which, under such circumstances,
gave it such a value, the whole assembly saw that we had
met before. In that way, which can alone be seized by a
superior mind, he briefly alluded to that meeting, and
remarked
,
that a man who had been so proscribed, and who
had been made known to him in the loneliness of his
retreat
in the mountains, in the discharge of such tender
and interesting duties, as brought me to his retreat, could
not be deemed unworthy of the confidence of the meeting;
that he, for his part, welcomed there, with a full heart,
every native of the country of Washington, that the cause
called not for mere mercenary and unprincipled
adventurers
from that or any other country, but for educated and
well principled young men, who had imbibed the free air,
the independence, and freedom of that great and rising
country; that he deemed the accession of such men to
their cause, an omen of good. The meeting seemed
to expect me to express my feelings, and I did it with the
utmost frankness. I averred, that though I had been
unfortunate
in the cause of the Patriots, I was still as much
attached to it as ever. I admitted that I had visited the
city, expecting to find things very different from
their present situation, and that it had been my intention,
in that case, to offer my services to Iturbide, supposing
that the revolution headed by him, was favorable to
liberty
,
the great cause which ever had been and always
would be dear to me; that since my arrival, and an
inquiry
into the character of the men and the measures now
prevalent, I had no more confidence in this government,
than in that, against which I had been in arms; that I
felt my heart united, as my hand, when allowed, should be,
with all honorable and well principled men, in fair and
decided opposition to the government; and that I would
aid with all my powers any measures, which would tend
to overthrow it, and rear on its ruins, a constitutional
government
of the people's choice. I was cheered with great
and unmerited applause, and was immediately, by a vote,
admitted as a representative from the internal provinces,
and was called upon to give an
expos
, or statement of my
views of things in that quarter, as related to the objects of
the meeting, the inclinations of the people in that quarter,
and generally, the power, wisdom, courage, and resources
of the Patriots. On all these points, according to their
request, I made a brief statement, which comprised all
that I knew, or supposed, capable of throwing any light
upon their counsels.
The point chiefly in discussion, was the extent of the
resources of the Patriots, in the various quarters of the
country; and whether the country was yet ripe for open
opposition to the imperial government. A general arrest of
the most patriotic members of the legislative council had
just taken place, and some of the members were of
opinion
,
that the excitement created by that arrest, afforded
a favorable opportunity to raise the banner of liberty.
VOL. II. 14
After various opinions, some in favor of and some against
this measure, had been advanced, my judgment, as a
man who had fought for the cause, and had seen much of
the issue of such undertakings, was asked. I spoke at
first in favor of a general union, remarking that so many
attempts had proved abortive, because the insurgents had
not been simultaneous, and had not understood one another;
because their movements had been desultory and
unconnected
,
and their enemies had been allowed to destroy them in
detail. I was for cultivating a general correspondence,
for ascertaining with precision the pulse of the country,
and avoiding those premature and rash undertakings, that
had hitherto been so fatal. This was the main theme of
my address, and I fortified the principal points in it, by a
strong reference to the scenes in which I had been
personally
conversant. The speech, such as it was, gained
me the favor of some of the most distinguished members,
and was received with unbounded applause. My views
happened strongly to coincide with those of the Conde de
Serra, the wealthiest and most influential man in the city
or perhaps in the empire. He was at this time
corresponding
secretary of this meeting,in fact, its organ, and, next
to Victoria, its most efficient cement.
After the sitting was closed, I was highly complimented
by my American compatriots, and received many civilities
from the members generally. I had many pressing
invitations
from them, to come and reside with them, during my
stay in the city. Among others, I received the most
gratifying
notice from the Conde de Serra. He made very
particular inquiries respecting my objects, pursuits, and
employments, and the probable time of my stay in the
city. He gradually unfolded to me his motive for making
these inquiries. He informed me that he had been in
pursuit of a private secretary, who could translate, and
who understood different languages, and was a scholar.
He was pleased to say, that the fluency and correctness
with which I spoke their language, turned his thoughts
upon me from the first moment of my speaking; that in the
course of the debates, he had made inquiries of one of
my compatriots, in whom he had confidence, respecting
me, and the result had been highly satisfactory,
particularly
,
as he had been informed, that I had been regularly
educated, and was grammatically acquainted with English
and French. He proceeded to state the nature of the
duties, and the proposed salary; and closed, by asking me
if I was willing to accept the office.
I answered, that, from present impressions, it would be
precisely the employment I should have selected, but that
I wished a couple of days, for deliberation upon the
subject
,
and that in the mean time, for any further satisfaction,
respecting my character and qualifications, I referred him
to the Conde de Alvaro. He added, that the reference
was highly satisfactory, and that his family was in habits of
particular intimacy with that of the Conde. He proffered
the customary civilities of his house, and proposed to show
me the city and its amusements, in the interval, until I made
my election. This offer, upon deliberation, seemed more
and more gratifying. The employment was both respectable
and lucrative. The protection was that of a man, so high
in rank and influence, that although he was known to be
viewed with a suspicious eye by Iturbide, even he was
afraid of him, and brought no articles of impeachment
against him. I should have, in this office, an ostensible
vocation, and should not feel myself precisely on a footing
with those numerous gambling and speculuting
adventurers
from the United States, who were on the top of this
crater of the volcano of revolutions, waiting for an
eruption
.
My heart whispered too, that here I should either
see or hear from Doa Martha.
The Conde de Serra was a creole, and his forefathers
were born in the country. His income was almost
without limits. Under the Royal
regim
he had been
considered the richest subject in the Spanish dominions,
and his manner of spending his income was generous and
princely. He was the high-minded and munificent patron
of every generous and noble undertaking, and held out a
sustaining hand to indigent genius and taste. He himself
was young and of fine appearance, and his family was
reputed
the most amiable and beautiful in the empire. His
eldest daughter, named Laura, ranked, in general
estimation
,
next in beauty to Doa Martha. She was scarcely
fourteen, an age, however, at which young ladies are
considered
marriageable in that country. For it is a well
known fact, that in these countries, both the mind and the
form are developed some years earlier, than at the North. I
received from my compatriots, the usual, but unnecessary
caution, not to let my eyes be dazzled by looking at the
sun.
At the assigned time, I waited on the Conde, and was
shown up the marble flight of stairs in front of his palace;
then, traversing a long portico, supported by Ionic
columns
of marble, and shaded in front by laurels and palms, I
was conducted to an ante-room, set apart for the proposed
office, and connected with a splendid and extensive library.
I was here received by the Conde with marked politeness.
He informed, that he had felt satisfied before the inquiry,
but that he had called on the Condesa, the Conde being
absent, and mentioned that I had referred him to that
family. He added, I obtained not a character simply.
I will not task your modesty by particulars, but if I may
believe her, you are a Hercules, a slayer of monsters, an
eighth wonder of the world. In return for so many
compliments
,
I could only close with his proposals. I was
inducted
into my new office. My employment
consisted
much in translations, furnishing draughts of
replies
for him to use, and suggesting alterations before he
signed certain papers. He wished me to add to these
duties, that of librarian and keeper of his very
extensive
cabinet of minerals, fossils, and specimens in
natural
history. I had an apartment in the palace, and
boarded
with some young gentlemen of respectable Spanish
families, who belonged to his establishment, and had had
offices in the mining department. They were at pres
ent out of employ, the Conde not having chosen that any
member of his family should hold any office under the
Imperial
government.
My duties were neither painful nor servile, and the
discharge
of them brought me of necessity acquainted with
the geography and statistics of the country, and the distance,
importance, and population of places, and gave me a great
deal of exact and important local knowledge of the country.
Every facility that I could desire, to make myself
acquainted
with this great and interesting country, was now
offered, and not offered in vain; for I put myself in
earnest
to these studies, every moment in which I was not
occupied in the duties of my office. In the morning I
walked to visit the natural and artificial curiosities of the
city, and in the evening, always accompanied by Bryan,
and fully armed, to the theatre. The decorations and the
scenery were splendid even to gaudiness, and having said
this, I need say no more of the theatre.
14*
I was again in those tranquil and satisfied days, of which
history has nothing to record. I only heard, incidentally,
from Martha; and then it was only the repetition of the
common report, that she was shortly to be married to the
minister of war. I had seen, that I was passing the
scrutiny
of the Conde, preparatory to more or less confidence.
His increasing marks of confidence and kindness were
indications that I was rising in his estimation. I made a
new arrangement of his books, manuscripts, and drawings,
and a new catalogue of his cabinet of minerals and
natural history. I introduced into his correspondence a
new order, and, in fact, created in all these departments a
new and complete system. The greater facility of
arriving
at information in this new arrangment, was obvious at
the first inspection. The Conde was delighted, and was
pleased to say, that my services were invaluable.
I had been a fortnight in the family, when I was invited
to dine with it, which I was told was a novitiate unusually
short. I felt it a duty, that I owed to my patron, to be
modestly but richly dressed in the customary costume of a
private Spanish gentleman. At the appointed hour, I was
ushered in with a numerous company of invited guests,
among whom were many distinguished characters from the
United States, and some from Great Britain, to the vast
and noble dining-hall. Very few of them spoke Spanish,
and I was naturally called upon, to discharge the duty
of interpreter. I was introduced to the Condesa, who
though the mother of a number of children, the eldest, as
I have remarked, turned of thirteen, did not herself seem
much advanced of twenty. She was fresh, blooming, and
beautiful, and by her affability and gentleness, made the
dignity of her rank and place forgotten in the deeper and
more interior respect, due to condescension and goodness.
The children were as beautiful as loves, and after dinner
were admitted into the room, in all the buoyant and frolic
gaiety of childhood. The elder daughter had, as the
phrase is, been brought out, and she had the usual
brilliant
eyes, a small and light figure, a beautiful face, rather
inclining to pale, with a slight olive tinge, such as marked
most of the matured countenances of young ladies that I
had seen in the city. She went through the ceremonies
of introduction to the company, with the perfect ease and
familiarity of conscious rank and beauty, and with
something
of the manner of one, that had been caressed too
much, and a little spoiled by the friends and dependents
of the family. When I was led to her, she eyed me from
head to foot, with laughing ease and composure. I felt
my cheek glow, when I was conducted from her to the
Condesa
and Doa Martha, and I remarked the conscious and
rather confused smile in her face, when we were introduced
as entire strangers. The two lovely young ladies were,
of course, the principal objects of attention, after the
Conde
and his lady. The dinner passed off as such great and
formal affairs generally do. It was impossible for even
the perfect ease of the Conde and his lady to banish
something of formality and restraint, which was increased
by the circumstance, that most that was said required
translation. The dinner, of course, was excellent, and
the wine produced something more of ease, and a more
unrestrained flow of conversation. It is well known, that
no dessert in the world can equal that of this city, and the
whole closed with coffee.
The foreign guests generally retired, and I took my hat
to depart with the rest. It was understood, that the
ceremony
of the meeting was over; and Laura came skipping
up, and told me, that she had her father's orders, that I
must defer my studies for this evening, and hold myself
wholly at the disposal of the ladies; for that there was to
be a promenade in the garden. It may be conceived, that
this was the pleasure above all others, that I should have
desired
,
and yet, knowing that Martha, and hearing that the
minister of war would be there, I felt no little embarrassment,
at the thought of such a promenade. The perfect composure
and assurance of Laura put me more at ease. I followed
her, and a number of Spanish gentlemen into the garden.
The sun was low, and the birds were cheering
themselves
in his parting rays. A delightful coolness was in
the air. In the distance, were seen the snowy summits of
San Puebla, their conical tops rising far above the clouds,
and emitting, from their volcanic apertures, columns of
smoke, that in the rarefied atmosphere, arose to immense
heights. A sea of mountains, in all directions, bounded
this vast and lovely vale. In contrast with such natural
sublimity
was the beautiful garden, the perfection of art,
seconded
by nature, here so fertile in what is suited to a
garden. Shades, verdure, fountains spouting water high
in the air, which fell back with a delightful murmur into
marble basins; statues, cascades, arbors and serpentine
walks, pavilions and temples, in short all the luxuries of
opulence
,
and all the beauties of landscape, were scattered
over this delightful place. Nightingales were pouring their
long and sweet strains through their little throats, and birds
of the most beautiful forms and exquisite plumage were
fluttering among trees, that were natives of all the
different climates.
Various groups, and solitary couples were sauntering in
this lovely place; and the gay flow of conversation and
the reckless laugh indicated, that all enjoyed this charming
walk. The Condesa de Alvaro, and the Condesa de
Serra walked together, arm in arm. Seeing me alone,
Laura left the circle of which she had been the centre, and
came to me. Confess, sir, said she, that these
mountains
spouting smoke, this cool air, this pretty garden
and these fine birds, and finer ladies, are a much more
amusing study, than those books that you pore upon forever
in my father's library. I am afraid I shall crowd too
many good things at a time upon you, but I am going to
lead you to a young lady, that, I believe, has seen you
before, and I conjecture that the meeting will not be
disagreeable
to either. Saying this, she led me to Martha,
placing me between them, as we strolled along the alleys
of the garden. We had scarcely recovered from the
emotions
produced by of this meeting, after so long an absence,
and had not yet come in possession of the full powers of
speech, when I saw my evil genius in an opposite alley,
and Don Pedro, with the measured insolence of his new
dignity
,
approached us. Martha turned pale, and the arm which
I held trembled. I returned as slight a bow, as his, and
a very meaning look of recognition passed between us.
I came, said he, to Doa Martha, at the request of her
father, to solicit the honor of her company in this
promenade
;
but I perceive she is so respectably protected, and
so happily occupied, that I suppose I may dispense with
my offer. I shall only remark to her, that this
gentleman's
name is in my department, on the list of
malecontent
and suspicious foreigners. I should have supposed,
with the pledges given to her father, in recent conversations,
that she would not have been disposed thus to commit
herself and him with the government. Past events have
made this gentleman but too well known to us, and she
cannot but be aware how particularly disagreeable he must
be to me, and to the government. Laura surveyed him
while he was making this speech to the terrified Martha,
from head to foot. It was obvious, that the minister of
war was neither agreeable, nor terrible to her. She made
him, however, a very low bow. Is this the face, said she,
which your Excellency wears, when you woo this young
lady? You must see that you are particularly agreeable
to her at this moment. As to this gentleman, sir, he
happens
to be at his time under the protection of my father.
You are a very great man, no doubt. But I would hope,
that such protection will secure him from menaces and
rude treatment, especially among ladies, among whom he
is an invited guest. Your father's name, he replied, is
a sufficient security for his family; but will not be considered
by us, a shelter for all the factious and traitorous foreigners
that he shall choose to harbor. Now, that is fine, she
replied
,
and these airs wonderfully become the minister of
war. I here remarked, that I had nothing to reply to this
kind of language in this place. The gentleman, no doubt,
remembered with pleasure some former rencounters
between
us; that I could not condescend to spar, and call
names in this company, but hoped we should have the
pleasure of a more private interview, for all such
conversations
.
Laura added before he could reply, Yes, I dare
say, the gentleman can take care of himself in such a
meeting
.
But just now, I wish him to have a little private chat
with this same young lady. I begin to suspect, that they
have known each other before. There seems to be some
strong dislike between them, and I want them to be a little
more acquainted, that they may shake off their prejudices
and make peace. I dare affirm that half an hour's
tete-a-tete
in this pretty garden, will bring all things right between
them. Now, therefore, be it known, I, Laura de Serra,
eldest daughter of the Conde de Serra, ordain and declare,
that they have a private walk together. I dare trust them,
although he is on your dark list; and I wish at the same
time to have the honor of a private walk with his
Excellency
,
the minister of war. Saying this with the mock
gravity
of command she took his arm, reluctant as he seemed,
and led him away.
I was once more alone with Martha, and it was obvious
that our time was precious. The circumstances of our
former acquaintance, and the confidence you once reposed
in me, Martha, said I, justify me in asking, how you stand
at present with that insolent and detestable man. I
certainly
may be permitted to ask, if the reports in relation to
you and him are true, why you have taken so much cruel
interest in me, as to intimate that I am in danger. If you
are indeed, as they report, to marry him, where can be my
danger? Or wat is life afterwards to me? I am not to
marry him, sir, said she. And if I were, I doubt not you
would be both well and happy afterwards. Let me be
frank with you. You know well, that there is neither
affectation
nor pretence in the interest I take in you. I have
been informed, how you parted from Wilhelmine, and all
my good opinion of you is renewed. You are, no doubt,
acquainted with the history of the late revolution, that has
made that weak and wicked man, Iturbide, what they call an
emperor. Don Pedro, after my father's return to
Durango
,
was treated coolly by us all. I had hoped, after my
father had resigned his command in disgust, that he was
awakened from his dreams of ambition, and that I should
be persecuted on account of this man no more. But stung
by our neglect, he conceived a deeper and deadlier plan
of coming at his object, and his revenge. He and the
father confessor left us almost without notice, and made
their way to this city. They gave in their adhesion to the
government, and timed it so well, as to secure for the one
the place he now fills, and for the other, the secrt but
efficient direction of the imperial counsels. The first
knowledge we had of this new order of things, was an
official
notice, signed with the imperial hand, notifying to my
father, that he must come up to the imperial city, and give
in his adhesion, on pain of confiscation. We well knew,
that there would be little ceremony about executing this
threat, in case of refusal. The wretch knew precisely,
what string to harp on. I would not be understood to imply
the slightest want of filial respect for my father. I could
yield any thing to his wishes, even life; any thing but this
detested union. It is said to be in the order of nature,
that men, as they advance in age, become more attached
to wealth, as they lose their relish for every thing beside.
As all other passions, even ambition among them, become
enfeebled, all his desires seem to be concentered in that
single point,regard for his immense possessions. My
father obeyed the summons, and carried us with trembling
haste to the capital. The wretch, now become the favorite
of the emperor, and all-powerful, plays continually upon
my father's fears of losing his estates. He suspends the
horrors of confiscation continually over our heads, and
keeps my father as true to his purpose respecting this
detested union, from fear, as he once was from ambition.
My father finding it useless to operate upon my fears,
like Don Pedro, has reversed all his former modes of
influence
,
and has adopted one a thousand times more difficult
to resist. He assumes before me the air of a supplicant.
He throws himself on my pity. The very idea of seeing
my aged father, so venerated by us all, one so high in
power
,
and so used to submission from others, himself assuming
the attitude of a supplicant to his daughter, is terrible and
revolting. He calls himself a forsaken and dishonored
old man, hastening to the same end with so many ruined
nobles in the old world, and that nothing will prop his
falling fortunes, but my consent to this union. He
points me to the consequences of drawing down upon him
the wrath of the weak and worthless emperor.
Confiscation
,
and poverty, and disgrace together, he assures me,
would kill him, and, indeed, I hardly doubt it. My mother
admits the worthlessness of the man, and hates him scarcely
less than I do, and yet insists that there are emergencies,
when a good child will yield all her inclinations, and devote
herself for her parents. She thinks this is a crisis of that
kind. But, sir, I feel that I have not this spirit of
self-devotion
.
To their tears and entreaties I reply, that hating,
abhorring him as I do, they may bid me die, but not marry
him. I propose to them, and I consent, to temporize; and
I promise so far to conquer my loathing, as to soothe him.
At present they seem satisfied with this, and their object
and mine is to gain time. We all hope, they will not be
able to maintain themselves on their dizzy eminence long.
In conformity with this plan, I task my feelings, to dance
with him, and receive his attentions in public. I even allow
him to hope, that if he is not precipitate, and allows me
my own time, I may, perhaps, in the end think favorably
of him. It is horrible violence to my feelings. Would
your Protestant system of morals hold this deception guilty?
All this succeeded well enough, until he found that you
were here. He discovered it by the emissaries of the
police
,
sooner than I knew it. The horrid flashing of his eye,
and the fiendlike expression of his countenance, told me
what he felt, on knowing that you were here. He cautioned
me against renewing my acquaintance with you, and
expressed
a suspicion that I was privy to your arrival. He
VOL. I. 15
intimated, that he had both the will and the means to
dispose
of you. Certainly, said I, Don Pedro, you
must estimate me an amiable and grateful woman, to think
of winning my regard, by threatening his assassination. I
say nothing of what he has done, and what he has forborne
to you. To me, you must think it a short way to my heart,
to murder that man. The malice of his heart was
sufficiently
visible in his pale countenance. But he affected to be
cool, and remarked, that I could not be so little read in
human nature, as not to attribute all this feeling to love,
and its natural attendant, especially in a Spanish bosom,
jealousy. Why else, he asked me, should I have
any antipathy to him? I answered in the bitterness of my
spirit, The natural, instinctive, and everlasting antipathy
of bad to good, base to noble, hell to heaven. You see,
sir, in what courteous terms we conduct our wooing, and
how little reason you have to be jealous, if I might flatter
myself that you could entertain such feelings towards me.
The time is precious. I am ready to believe that you love
me. I am but too sure of my own feelings, Your arrival,
so unexpected, has inspired in me the extreme both of
joi and terror. But destiny, I ought rather to say
Providence
,
I trust, watches over us, for you are fixed just
where I could have wished you to be. Iturbide is afraid
of your patron. I have conversed with that excellent man.
I have done more. I have laid open my heart to his lady,
and the family are your friends. If I can only gain time,
this imperial throne will crumble. You are now in the
way of the right sort of distinction. The times call for
such a character as yours, and you are in the place to avail
yourself of all chances. I need not urge you to cultivate
the favor of the family in which you live. You will
become
distinguished; my heart tells me so. I have still
more pride for you than for myself. Only get a name, and
gain power, and the hand of Martha shall be at your
disposal
,
as her heart has long been.
So fair a chance was not omitted. It is now all gone by,
but it was a most sober business I assure you at the time.
If strong emotions always render us eloquent, as they say,
I was eloquent; for my heart palpitated, and my pulses
were of feverish quickness, and I went through the series of
kneeling, protestations, and averments, with the best of
them. I was, probably, extravagant for a character that
she had rather considered as verging to the side of
coldness
;
for she almost smiled, as she raised me. This is
very pretty, said she, and quite enough. I believed
all this before. For a while, sir, you must be guided by
me. Be prudent, and you shall have your turn of
command
by and by. It comports with my plan to return, and
finish the evening in company with that detested man. I
do not wish you to endure the torture with me. Avoid
him as much as possible. So saying, she led the way to
rejoin Laura and Don Pedro.
As we came up with them, I motioned to withdraw.
Oh no, sir, said Laura, you do not so easily escape the
service of the ladies, when you are once fairly enlisted
under their banner; and she withdrew her arm from Don
Pedro, apparently relinquishing it in favor of Martha, and
took my arm again. Now, said she, which is the gainer
by this exchange? Mr. Minister at War, what think you of
the effect of this
tte-a-tte
upon this dear lady? Sir, you
Yankee American, have you been affronting her? I dare
say you have, you bad man! See the color in her cheeks.
She walked up to Martha, looking with pity in her eyes,
and asked, Dear Martha, what has the bad man been
saying to you, that makes you so affronted? This will
never do. I shall not dare to trust you together again.
Come, sir, and walk with me. I want to administer
correction
to you in private. With these words she led me
away from Martha, beside whom Don Pedro was walking
in sullen dignity, not knowing exactly upon whom, or what,
to vent his ill temper.
How I hate that man! said Laura to me, as soon as
we were by ourselves. There is no love lost between
us, neither. The loss of his office and influence has turned
the head of the poor old Conde, Martha's father. To
save his estates, he is persecuting that sweet girl, to marry
this wretch. As soon as she came here, I saw that she
not only hated him, but loved another. She has
confessed
to me, that you are he that has robbed her of her
heart. I am much astonished at her taste. You are
certainly a bad looking man, though a little more tolerable,
it must be allowed, than his Excellency, the minister. But
then, to palliate the matter a little, she says that you are
brave, and romantic, and generous, and good, and that
you have saved her from savages, and floods, and assassins,
and I know not what. While she was making you such
a reliever of distressed damsels, I wonder, it never occurred
to her, that I might take a liking to you myself. You? I
asked with surprise. Yes, and why not I? I have a heart,
sir, as well as another. And suppose it should have been
so, what then? Why then, I replied, I suppose, your
father would dismiss me with ignominy from my
employment
,
and shut you in a dark closet, and feed you on
slender
diet, until you recovered your heart's health and
your senses. Your humble servant, said she, I
perceive
you think me a child, and understand not the affair.
Why, sir, my mother was married before she was of my
age, and so are half the titled and endowed ladies in the
country. Not at all, sir, and I see you are not gifted
as a prophet. My father would look grave, and my
mother would shed tears and make a speech, and I should
be first sullen, and then fall to weeping, and to make me
smile again, they would consent, and you would be the
happy man. But mind you, sir, nothing of this is likely to
happen. In the first place, I love Martha too well. In the
next place, infant as you think me, I know men too well.
I had heard, how rapidly the female form and mind are
developed in the southern countries. This most astonishing
specimen of the fact, however, struck me with surprise.
But it was an agreeable and amusing one. She ran on
with the volubility and idle rattle of a spoiled child. If
I presumed, for the moment, on this tone of her mind,
perfectly
aware of it, she reversed the strain of her
conversation
,
and became sober, and sensible, rising at times to
sentiment and dignity. She displayed a most singular
combination of wit, simplicity, good sense, frankness, and
pride. Before we parted, she told me that she had taken
me and Martha under her particular charge, and that, if
we would both be on honor, and good behaviour, we should
see each other as often as possible, and that all that she
claimed for her part in the business, was to watch the
influence
and progress of love, that she might know herself
how to manage, when her turn came.
At the next meeting of the patriots in conlave, the Conde
de Serra read a despatch to the meeting, announcing, that
the republicans had again unfurled the banner of freedom at
Vera Cruz. Sant' Anna, who had conferred every benefit
upon the emperor, and had been one of the principal
in-instruments
in raising him to the throne, had, through some
of the intrigues of his miserable and misguided court, been
dismissed from the command at Vera Cruz, which had been
15 *
conferred on him as the reward of his bravery and his
services
.
He immediately assembled his favorite regiment,
placed before them the indignities that he had suffered,
and gave them a strong painting of the cruelty and perfidy
of Iturbide; and he closed by exhorting them to throw off
his yoke, and establish a government of the people. The
speech was received with
vivas
, and the regiment
immediately
adopted the resolution.
Immediately after this dccisive act, he sent a letter in
the form of an
expos
or declaration, to the Emperor,
reminding
him of all that he had done and suffered for him.
He adverted with indignation to the return he had
received
,
and declared, that by the last act of ingratitude, he
considered all his own obligations cancelled, and himself
called upon, to espouse the cause of a suffering and
oppressed
people. He reproached the emperor with his
acts of violence, oppression, and cruelty, and assured him,
that the people would never again be induced to trust a
man, who had once violated all his promises. For
himself
,
he declared his determination to be, to reinstate the
congress, and to form a pure and simple republic, based
on the rights of man. Finally, he counselled Iturbide to
renounce his assumed government, and throw himself on
the generosity of the nation.
There were many debates upon the point, whether the
country was ripe for this insurrection, and, as usually
happens
,
different opinions. When it came my turn to speak,
I remarked, that happy as I was in my present
employment
,
I should not feel satisfied to be idle, while the
banner
of freedom waved in any part the country, and that I
should immediately proceed to Vera Cruz, to offer
myself
as a volunteer in the corps of Sant' Anna. A number
of the younger members of the meeting followed my
example
,
and the meeting was dissolved amidst acclamations
for the cause. The Conde expressed regret at the thought
of my leaving him, but cordially approved my
determination
,
informing me, that in his opinion, now was the time
for me to act. I was to set out for Vera Cruz with a
considerable body of volunteers, who were to unite
with others at Xalapa. The Conde exacted from me a
promise, that whenever the campaign closed, I should
return
,
and resume my duties; and in the mean time,
invitme
to his table, until I departed. In this situation, it
became
my duty to escort his daughter to the public places,
and the theatre. I accompanied the family to the balls
and
tertulias
, and was treated as one domesticated in the
family.
I intimated my gratitude, almost my surprise to Laura
at this g eat and unearned confidence. She explained, in
her laughing way, the cause of it. In the first place,
said she, my parents have such an unbounded
confidence
in my correctness and discretion, that pride, as well
as gratitude, calls upon me, so to deport myself, that they
shall have no cause to repent it. In the next place, my
parents think Martha the next immaculate to myself, and
Martha will have you to be such a paragon of purity,
decorum
,
and honor, that no harm can be extracted out of
you. Lastly, every one can see that you are so entirely
in love with Martha, that you might stumble upon a
prettier
,
and have no eye to see her.
It was understood, that the minister of war was to start
for Vera Cruz, to take command of the imperial forces,
against Sant' Anna. I wished to remain until he was gone.
I had seen Martha but once since the first interview, and
then I only saw her long enough in private, to receive an
intimation from her, why she saw me so seldom; that it
was at once in conformity to her engagements, and her
plan. When the report was, that he had actually departed
from the city, I felt my breathing a little easier, and hoped
that I should at least have some moments with Martha,
before I departed for Vera Cruz.
I had sufficient intimation, though he was away, that
some friends of his had an eye upon me. I was returning
in the evening with Bryan from the theatre. Departing
from my customary caution, and thinking, perhaps, that
danger had ceased with his departure, we wandered into a
dark alley, at a distance from the lights. We were beset
by three or four bravos in the dark, with dirks and swords.
Bryan was slightly wounded in the onset. But we placed
ourselves against the wall, discharged our pistols upon
them, for fortunately we were both armed, and defended
ourselves against the odds of numbers, until the reports of
our pistols, and the increasing
fracas
, brought the city
guards to our aid and the assassins escaped. I had no
doubt that this was a part of Don Pedro's reverend care
of my health.
I spent the afternoon and the evening, of the day
previous
to that on which I set out for Vera Cruz, in the
Conde's
delightful gardens, and in undisturbed conversations
with Laura and Martha. We even had our coffee brought
to us in a little pavilion, and took it together. This, I
count among the happiest evenings of my life, marked, as
an old Roman would have said,
albo lapide
. Martha
freed from apprehensions, at least during the absence of
Don Pedro, and delivered for the present, from any
intreaties
from her father, relative to him, had once more
that tranquil and delightful manner, which had so won my
interest on the evening of the thunder storm. Our
intercourse
was that of minds, that had long been separated
and that now united with an eagerness and delight,
proportioned
to the obstacles, that had so long impeded it.
I received many charges from both, how to deport myself,
as regarded my society and exposures. I could not
have desired more marks of confidence, and tenderness
from either. Each gave me a ringlet of her raven locks
to be wrought into my sword belt, thus constituting me
their champion. Whenever the conversation became
gloomy, or turned upon the exposures and dangers of the
campaign, Laura with some of her whimsical remarks,
restored us to cheerfulness. At the same time that
Martha charged me not to expose myself, they both
bade me not return without glory. Martha assured me
that she foresaw, that this campaign would be decisive of
my fate, as well as hers. I had the privilege of banishing
the tears from her cheek, in a way which I leave you to
imagine
,
and after an evening too happy to be assorted with the
common color of our days, amidst a thousand kind wishes
for the success of their soldier, they sent me away.
From the Conde, I had flattering letters of introduction to
Sant' Anna, and the other chiefs, proposing me, as a
person
who had sustained a high and honourable command
in the Patriot service, in the interior provinces, and
recommending
me to a similar command in this
service
.
He gave me counsel with paternal kindness,
and seemed to take in me, almost the interest of a father.
With an affectionate shake of the hand from the Condesa
and Laura, and with benedictions and kind wishes from
him, I started once more a soldier of fortune and
revolution
,
for Vera Cruz.
CHAPTER IV.
Amor es Rey an grande, que aprisiona
En vasalage el cielo, el mar, la tierra
Y unica, y sola magestad blazona.
Quevedo
.
The power that conquers all.
I THANK you for the invincible patience, with which
you have listened to these my small adventures, so
modestly
related in the first person. Whether you are or
not, I am weary of this everlasting repetition of myself.
If your curiosity has not already expired in a surfeit and
an indigestion, and you persist in wishing to hear the end
of this matter, my story is hereafter to lie chiefly addressed
to your eye, and not to your ear. The operation of the
motives, and the influence of the views of the parties,
concerned in the most important event of my life, will be
best explained by the person most interested. You can
read at your leisure. You will hear much of me still.
You have had hitherto, to make due deductions for
egotism
.
You will have hereafter, to make still greater, for
a more blinding passion. I have been hitherto the hero
of my own story. I am now that of another's.
Nimporte
!
I gave you fair promise, that my trumpet would
always
be blown, either by myself or another. I have the
high countenance and authority of the pious neas, to
bear me out. You will learn in the issue, that I came,
legitimately by these letters, which are copies of the
originals
.
It is only necessary to explain a few circumstances,
that you may understand the order and connexion of
them. I have selected them from a basket, full of the
same materials, not because they are better than the rest,
but because they seem something like a continuation of
my story.
It is only necessary to premise, that Martha had, in the
convent, in which she had been educated, a female friend,
a little older than herself, who grew into life with her, and
between whom, was sworn one of the eternal friendships of
young ladies, similarly situated. They were the
companions
of each other's secret hours, and the confidents of each
other's secret thoughts. It so happened, that not long
after
the Conde de Alvaro had removed his daughter from
the convent, and brought her to America, this young lady
married the Royal commander of the castle of St. John
d'Ulloa, at Vera Cruz, and traversed the ocean with her
husband to his station. With this lady, Martha had been
in habits of constant correspondence. Almost every mail
was charged with the burden of their secrets, and
transmitted
the renewal of their mutual vows of everlasting
friendship. Every one knows, that such proffers, and
such vows, are worth just what they will bring in the
market
.
But as her correspondent is really sensible and
amiable, and as they preserved an unbroken friendship,
although they entertained different opinions, and belonged
to different politcal parties, it must be presumed, that there
was really a deep basis for their mutual regard for each
other.
These letters are exact transcripts of the mind of
Martha
,
and I confess, that I continue to think well of the
spirited and warm-hearted writer. They portray
neither
a goddess, nor even an immaculate mortal, but a
lovely woman, with all her weaknesses and foibles. But
let me not start criticisms, upon what you are yourself to
read. Out of this bushel of letters, as I remarked, I only
select those, that keep up the thread of my narrative, from
the point where I leave it. I should add, that they give a
regular chronicle of all that befell her, from her first
landing on the Mexican shore, to her residence at
Durango
.
They are chiefly descriptive, interspersed with many
moral reflections, and many of those wild, and if I may so
say,
Ossianic
expressions, so natural to a highly gifted,
and romantic girl of Spanish temperament, placed amidst
the vast plains and mountains of that grand country.
After
her return from the valley of the Commanches,
magna
pars fui
, I have been I find, the most promment
character
in the history of her thoughts and life. I am quite
satisfied, I assure you, with my historian, for I find my
ordinary actions are transformed into exploits. My
exploits
themselves, if such they may be called, are the
doings of Jack the giant-killer. Like the renowned
Swedenborg
,
she finds a high spiritual meaning, where I had
none at all. In short, sir, read for yourself, and make
your own comments. You will find me a very paragon, a
pious neas, or the analogy will be more exact. I am a
Charles Grandison, as near as any home-made Yankee
fabric can imitate the real superfine, of the British article.
All that I shall say farther is, that the name of Martha's
fair correspondent at St. John d'Ulloa, is Doa Jacinta
Escarra, and that I was afterwards honored with an
introduction
to her, and found her extremely beautiful and
amiable. I now leave you to discuss this
morceau
at your
leisure. When you have finished it, say so, and I am
ready, if you continue so minded, to eke out the
remaining
chapter of my history up to this time.
My Dearest Jacinta
,
Mexico
,
Feb.
1822.
I informed you in my last, of my arrival here from
Durango. My father was in a continual fret of
impatience
,
lest we should not arrive in season, to anticipate
the decree of confiscation. That terrible word
confiscation
!
There is nothing on earth I hate like Don Pedro,
and the worst name I can call him, is
Confiscation
. I am
wholly unable to conceive how, or why old men should
become so intensely fond of money, about the time that
they cease to be able to make any use of it. I believe,
he loves me, as the next best thing to money, and the
power he has lost, As to my dear, good mother, he may
have loved her once; but that is a thing quite gone by.
Do you begin to love your husband less, than you did at
first, Jacinta? More than once, on the way, he looked
sufficiently sternly upon me, reminding me frequently,
that if I had not been a perverse and disobedient child, I
should have been, at this time, lady of the minister of war,
and he, perhaps, prime minister! All would have been
safe, and I in a fair way to ascend the topmost round in the
ladder of eminence. I have found the advantage of
keeping up the fair ascendency that I have won, when
this hated subject is discussed. So I told him, that he
must have singular notions of the power of the said
minister
,
to communicate honor, for that he well knew, that he
was a coward, a liar, and an assassin; and I know not, if
I added other epithets; but I had plenty more in my
thoughts, and told him, that if it would comfort him to
have me die, I was ready to gratify him, but not in that
way. Upon the word, I had to encounter a long and
bitter
philippic, by way of comfortable even ng domestic
confabulation
.
He rung upon the old changes, the folly and
idle romanticity of foolish girls, and the absolute necessity
of wealth, to any thing like comfortable, or respectable
existence, and that one week's endurance of real poverty,
genuine love, and a cottage, would restore my brain to
VOL. II. 16
common sense, and bring me to beg, as a boon, the
favor
,
which I was now, in the wildness of folly, casting
from me. Then it was easy to digress to that dear
young man, and to say, that since that ruinous
acquaintance
,
all other men were liars, assassins, and all that
My mother, good woman, as the conversation grew
sometimes a little warm, put in a kind of neutral
interpolation
,
partaking equally of assent and dissent,
attempting
to smooth down my father's brow, and remind me of
the rights of paternity. Between apprehensions from
Indians, patriots, robbers and Royalists, for we seem to
be equally obnoxious to all, and this last and most
horrid evil of all, confiscation, I had but an
uncomfortable
time to the city. I had travelled the same journey
before, and had seen and felt the grand and beautiful
scenery. At this time, my heart was too heavy, and too
painfully occupied for me to have any eyes for nature.
Sometimes, a full sense of the claims of a father upon
his child came over me. I saw the real and corroding
gloom on his brow, the dejection of age, the sinking of
nature, the actual loss of place and power, and the
contemplated
loss of fortune all pressing upon him at the
same time. The silent paleness of his cheek upbraided
me, I said to myself, Why not conform to the wishes of
that dear and venerated being, thy father? Why not
marry this minister of war, and hate him afterwards,
as so many other wives are said to do? A husband is
but a husband, after all, and every one says, that in a
few months, it is all one thing. It would be so
delightful
to unbend that father's brow, remove these
terrors
of confiscation, and fill his aged heart with
grattude
and joy. Instantly as the thought arose, such
feelings
of repulsion and disgust on the one hand, and on the
other such a  Well, I found that I was not good girl
enough for the sacrifice, and I begged him to ask me to
swallow boiling water, or poison, and see if I was not an
obedient child. Swallow a fiddle! said he; you are
very ready to do any thing that I wish you to avoid
that I do not doubt. This little sample will give you
some idea of the standing of our thermometer of family
comfort, during this long journey.
We arrived safely at the imperial city, and I saw his
Excellency, my tormentor, the same tawny, grim figure,
more ugly and repulsive in his exaltation than ever, but
still rolling his dull, but terrible eyes of love at me, and
as full of the same nauseous protestations as ever. I had
promised my father, in good faith, to do every thing in
my power, in the way of civility to this man, that would
tend to ward off the terrible confiscation; so that he
would consent to my plan, to save time. So I threw into
my manner of receiving him as much civility as I could
command, as a sop to Cerberus. And then, how pleased
he was, even to childish delight! The vanity of any
other
woman would have been gratified, to see him, to whom
every body else cringed, as the Indians are said to do
to the Evil One himself, in return living only in my
smiles. I must believe, the odious being loves me. How
earnestly I looked round among the ten thousand new
faces, to see if my beloved was not among them. If
there be any thing like mutual feeling, he will be here,
and I shall see him. Wilhelmine was a sweet girl, and
she was always with him. And I can easily see, that the
present and visible face has the best chance. I wish he
had had my picture. But if he thinks no more of me,
why should I think of him?
We have, as you know, one of the noblest houses in
the city, und suitably furnished. I was presented to the
emperor, as the elected of the heart of his favorite. The
palace was rather gaudy than grand, and there were
such swarms of whiskered troops along the staircase
and the antechambers, and at the levee,and every where
so many hundreds of cringing expectants, with meanness,
submission, supplication, supplanting, ill-concealed
malice
,
treachery, and disappointment on their brow. And
what an emperor! With a person half German, half
Spanish, the everlasting grin of deceitful and simpering
apparent good nature on his face, where,not withstanding
all his efforts to counterfeit dignity, licentiousness and low
breeding are indelibly stamped, and with a head as well
moulded for intelligence as a negro's,such was the
emperor
.
The empress, the empress-mother, and all the
canaille of the imperial family, with their fine calico
mantillas, their pearls and diamonds, and sweetening
their imperial breaths with cigars, were all birds of the
same feather.
I was treated with great favor and distinction by this
emperor, who had really a bright complexion, almost
like that of my beloved. He condescended to tell me
that he took a double interest in me, the one on the
score of my personal merit and beauty, and the other,
because he knew me to be so dear to his friend, the
minister
of war. In the first ball, which I attended, I had
the superlative honour to lead down the dance with
majesty
itself, and for the remainder of the evening, I was
confined, by terms of treaty with my father, to the
detestable
Don Pedro. Such a show of fine things! Such
a glitter of jewels, and blaze of diamonds! I assure you,
that by candle light, and in the magnificent saloon of the
palace, it was a spectacle sufficiently imposing to turn a
young girl's head. It excelled the court of Ferdinand,
at least in point of glitter. There is a curious
sensation
,
in being associated with a man, to whom every body
does homage, and whose eye is the source of favor, of
life, and death, even if we know at the same time, that
this pageant, of such terrible energy from circumstances,
is intrinsically weak and worthless. There was a
thrilling
sensation from the
vivas
, when we had finished the
dance.
When you come to anaylze this pageant, and
contemplate
it a little nearer and more in detail, all the
splendor
vanishes, and you see the whole show in its intrinsic
meanness and deformity. The men were, for the most
part, swarthy, ugly, savage, and even ignorant looking
beings, and the women yellow, awkward, and less
informed
than the men. There were some brilliant
exceptions
(myself for instance) who seemed to have collected
these frights about them, only to show themselves to
more advantage by contrast. Among these was the
beautiful and accomplished Condesa de Serrea, fair,
fresh, and blooming, with content and satisfaction on her
polished brow. She is a Hebe, yet has six children, all
beautiful. Laura, the eldest, is no more than thirteen,
yet smart, accomplished, and piquant, though not highly
beautiful. In conversing with her, you have the
peculiar
interest of talking with one so
petite
and infantine,
that you feel the ease of conversing with a child.
Perhaps
at the moment, while you are indulging this
carelessness
,
she flashes upon you with the grace and wit of
an accomplished young lady, and the intelligence,
maturity
,
and seeming experience of age. She has one of
those heads, that, according to the hackneyed phrase, is
older than the body on which it is placed. I have
become
16*
much acquainted with her, and she would have my
secrets. She gave me much grave instruction in
relation
to my case, and she too, has discovered, that she
has a heart. She bids me be cautious, how I allow my
hero to appear on the Mexican theatre, for that I have
given her such an estimate of him, that she shall be
tempted to try a hand to supplant me. There is
something
in this gay, infantine, spirited old woman, in the
person of a child, that I cannot but love. Her family,
you know, is one of the most distinguished in the new
world. The Conde enjoys the highest possible
consideration
,
and in fact his immense influence turns the
balance
between the hundred contending factions here. He
is too simple in his manners, too much informed, too
intrinsically
noble, to be in favour with the emperor, and
Iturbide both dreads and hates him; and he owes his
safety only to the circumstance, that the emperor dares
not touch him. My tormentor, too, hates him with the
ancient grudge of bad to good, and, forsooth, stigmatizes
him with the name, republican. Would you believe it,
(but this in your earyou must not lisp it to your husband
for your life) I am something more than half a patriot
myself. Finding  a patriot, and the Conde de
Serrea
a patriot, and Iturbide and his minister of war
what they are, who would not be a patriot?
We have imperial presentations, fire works, shows,
gardens, promenades, drives, the theatre, the churches,
religious festivals, balls, fandangoes,
tertulias
, bull-fights
by the way I never see them,and a beau, and that
beau his Excellency, who hangs to me, like an evil
conscience
;
and we have what my dear Francis used so to
admire,the very writing of his name thrills my whole
frame,we have mountains, snowy mountains, and
sweet lakes, sleeping in their vallies, and we have San
Puebla cherishing, as I do, fires under his snows, a
beautiful
nature, a populous and splendid city, daily reviews
of troops, assemblies in the gardens and the alameda, and
an air so soft, so inspiring languishment and love,
and feeling as bland as cream. Yet I want
something
.
I want all. I need the presence of him, who
makes me feel that I have a heart; him, whose manner
of doing a good and a generous action makes me
perceive
that man can be noble, and like God; him, whose
glance upon these mountains caused my eye to kindle with
the contagious enthusiasm; him, whose voice and manner
inspired within me high, and I might almost dare to say,
holy, thoughts. In short, away from him, I drag to these
scenes of the amusement of others, a bodythey tell
me, it is well enough formed; but it wants a soul. I
feel the bland and delicious atmosphere. I look at the
mountains, pouring out columns of smoke, from under
their everlasting snows. I contemplate the most
beautiful
and rich valley in the world. I hear the foolish
people
,
who have nothing else to say, talk of all this, as they
do of the weather, and say How fine this is! I stupidly
echo the remark, How fine this is! In short, I have
little
reason to hope I shall ever see him again, and I am
equally incapable of enjoying nature or myself.
Mexico
,
Feb.
1822.
DEAREST JACINTA,
Our Lady of the Pillar preserve us! I have seen him
again, and my heart beats even now so loud, that it
disturbs
my thoughts, and my pen. I never needed a
second
look to assure me that it was the very man. I had
been driven to the alameda, with our old duena, who
was ill, and in company with my daily tormentor. The
carriage windows were drawn up on account of the air.
He was walking in the streets, and an Irishman,
formerly
a servant of my father's, was walking behind him.
How well I remember the calm and lofty port, the
countenance so animated, benevolent, and mild! I gave
a half shriek, before I recollected myself; and then it
was too late, for my countenance told the tale of what I
had seen. His prying and malignant eye soon
discovered
in the group the person that had arrested mine.
He expressed ironical regret at the cause of my alarm,
and muttered something implying that he would
not have such terrible objects in the way, to annoy me.
I gave him a look that I trust he understood, and told
him that to filial regard to my father, he must be sensible
he owed all my endurance of his presence. I know, I
cried, that you are equally cowardly and vindictive.
But, venture to touch a hair of his head, and I will move
heaven and earth, until an avenger of his cause shall be
found. Not that I have or expect ever to have any
personal
interest in his preservation beyond the common
interest
,
which all ought to have in preserving the virtuous
and the good. In this country of distraction and crime,
we ought to preserve at least one good person. If you
really wish endurance from me, much more, if you
expect kindness, expect it only from using moderation
and forbearance towards him. Make no use of your bad
power towards him, and in the same proportion, you
will be sure of my taking a less active part in his favour.
If you would promise me with a pledge, on which I
might rely, that you would avail yourself of your
influence
to protect him, I should be willing to promise in my
turn, never to see him again.
He promised, (but there was a sneer on his
countenance
,)
that the intense interest, which I took in his
welfare
,
should be his pledge and his guaranty, and that
he would not molest him, or allow, as far as his influence
extended, that others should. He intimated, that if the
event so desired by my parents, the emperor, and
himself
,
could take place, he would not only protect, but
charge himself with the promotion of the young man. I
thanked him for his kind intentions towards him, and the
honor he intended me, but assured him, that if the
promotion
of the man in question depended upon that issue,
much as I wished it, it was likely to be slow in taking
place. The conversation here droppedbut I little
heeded the promise he made, not to molest him, although
in my eagerness to shield him from danger, I would have
made almost any engagement, to soothe this bad man.
Though I had little confidence in him, I felt somewhat
tranquillized by what he had said, and immediately put
every agent in my power in operation, to find where he
was. I soon discovered that he was at the Sociedad
Grande; and since then, what think you is my chief
amusement
?
He has an Irish servant, Bryan, who used
to live with my father, who is shrewd, faithful, and
devoted
to me, next to his master. This man finds some
moment every day, in which he visits our family. He
repeats to me all that his master says, does, and even
thinks. Bryan assumes, on oecasion, to divine his
master's
thoughts, when he is silent. You may be sure they
are all about me. I well know that all this is
moonshine
,
but I take the same kind of visionary satisfaction
in it, that people do in having their fortunes told.
Bryan
promises first by his guardian saint, never to disclose
a word of all this to his master. I meet him in
company
with our old duea, who has a fondness for the Irish
lad, and every day he opens a new budget for me. He
even shows me, and he has a most wonderful talent for
imitating countenance, how his master looks when he
thinks of me. He assures me, that in consequence of
my intimation of danger, his master always goes armed,
and takes him with him, and that he particularly avoids
evening walks, so that he can be in little danger from my
admirer, except he bring him to a mock trial and legal
assassination. My apprehensions for his safety are much
moderated. Meanwhile the Conde de Serrea, who is a
naturalist, a chymist, and a philosopher, and engaged in
extensive foreign and domestic correspondence, and is
moreover suspected of having a Patriot party in this
empire at his disposal, wants a private secretary. Mr.
Berrian, among his other qualifications, is a profound
scholar, to my taste a doctor of all sciences, acquainted
with many languages, in short, to me a great Apollo.
It occurred to me in a moment, that this was the very
man the Conde wanted. Under his protection, I should
feel perfectly secure about him. They dare not touch
either
the Conde or his friends. It is a family truly
noble
.
They have a splendid library, a gallery of
paintings
,
cabinets of natural curiosities, and all that; in fact
it is just the place that I could have wished for him. So I
introduced myself to the Condesa, his lady, and I told
her all about this wonderful young man. I am sure I
did not undervalue him, for she had all the while a
meaning
smile, and occasionally added, Really! surprising!
is it so! he is an astonishing man, sure enough! To be
perfectly frank, I let her into the whole secret. I was
deeply affected, as I did it. She kissed me, and gave a
tear to my feelings and my story, and promised me, that
she would speak of the matter to her husband. Laura,
the little which, had heard the whole. I was half
fearful
of her, for she looked wondrous knowing and
expressed
a great curiosity to see, as she said, this eighth
wonder
of the world. I hope, even if I dared flatter myself
that I shall ever have any nearer relations with him, that
I should not be so foolish and unjust, as to be jealous
He has a look that indicates him unshaken as the hills
But then, they say all men are vain. Laura has a
prodigious
name, and is more pretty and piquant than a
mere beauty. The man must be a Phnix, who could
stand her fascinations, if she chose to coquet with him.
I trust, however, to her pride; for, young as she is, that
feeling too has gained a full development. I trust to
the natural barriers and impossibilities of the case. I
trust to his steadiness,and I am sure he loves me. More
than all, I said, in this family he will be improving,
he will be safe and happy, and I will not be so selfish as
to have a thought beyond that. He was invited to
attend
this meeting of Patriots, over which the Conde and
Victoria preside, and had the good fortune greatly to
distinguish himself in the debates. In fact, if he took
any part, he would not do otherwise. The Conde
offered
him this place of secretary. He accepted the offer,
and has been in the discharge of its duties for some
days. The family judge of him, as I thought they
would. The Condesa, while pronouncing his eulogy,
sportively tells her husband, that it was a dangerous
experiment
,
to bring such a fascinating man into his family.
Laura puts up her pretty lip, and appears not to hear,
when in presence of her parents; but when she speaks
of him to me in private, she actually blushes, and
manifests
a sentiment in common with all that see him.
Where, and what is the charm? Surely, it is not
beauty
of person alone. For me, I think it a look of mind,
of kindness, of fearless steadiness in the truth and the
right, of that noble moral intrepidity, which shows that
he would do justice, if the heavens were falling over his
head. I know not, that I trace the feeling to right
causes. But that he produces feelings of this sort in
every one who comes in his way, that I feel to my cost.
In continuation
.
I have been with him. We took a walk in the
beautiful
garden of the Conde's with Laura. My heart was
beginning
to expand with the highest consciousness of joy,
and Laura was chattering away to him in her
customary
fashion, when what bird of evil omen should light
down upon us, but Don Pedro. Both the men started,
as though they had seen a serpent. Don Pedro affected
the Bashaw, the man in power, and talked to the other
in a style of menace. I wish I could describe the look
which he gave him in return. It said, however, plainly
enough, Your worthlessness and the presence of the
ladies
are your protection. Laura, the dear child, has
somehow contrived to anticipate the experience of years.
She put on her stately airs with Don Pedro, and actually
took on herself the endurance of his Excellency, and
sent us off together on a beautiful evening to walk alone
in a lovely garden. If this man has any fault, it is a
disposition towards taciturnity. But you are not now to
learn, that I can talk enough for both. But I assure
you, the man became talkative and eloquent. He held
such discourse with his eyes too, and was so modest and
grateful, and so ready to be guided by me! Oh! if
I could always be as happy as I was for that
half hour's walk! He is delighted with his place.
The family is delighted with him, and I am delighted
with him; and I am delighted with every body.
We have, in some sense, tied up his Excellency to him
good behaviour. I believe after all, he partakes of the
homage towards this extraordinary man, and is afraid of
him, obscure and humble as he is.
How are you, my dear Jacinta, in that cage of your
on the resounding sea? Is your husband as dear to
you as ever? I hope when I see him, fierce royalist as
he is, yet to make him a convert to the cause of the
Patriots
.
I lean that way sadly myself. The refreshmen
of a long, frank, and cordial letter from you is almost the
only thing necessary to complete the present sum of
my enjoyments. I am too happy. I tremble and look
up in fear of some concealed and suspended thunderbolt
Commend me I beseech you to the Holy Mother, and
believe me affectionately, &c.
Mexico
,
March
, 1821.
Dearest Jacinta
,
The
standard of the Patriots is again unfurled, I am
told, and directly in view of your castle, in the city of
Vera Cruz. With how little ceremony they treat
emperors
,
and kings, and great men in these evil days, upon
which we are fallen. I suppose the royal cavalier, so
dear to you, sees with an equal eye the fighting of
Patriots
and Imperialists. Both are alike hostile to him
and when these parties have mutually worried and
weakened each other, he, the third person, can with so
much the more ease fall upon the victor and destroy him.
To him all this fighting may be matter of indifferent
regard
.
Not so to me. A man dearer to me than
liberty
,
or country, or home, or all the world, except my
dearer parents, and, the Virgin forgive me! except my
mother, dearer than even they, is going to join
himself
VOL. II. 17
to the Patriot standard. I sometimes flatter myself
that I am a Patriot by instinct. Since I have been
acquainted
with this man I have learned to read English;
I have been deeply engaged in the American history.
What a great country! What a noble people!
Compare
their faces and persons with those of the people
here, and what a difference! There is something
independent
and severe in the appearance and person of
these people. There is not a book in my father's
library
that treats of them, or their history, but what I have
thoroughly conned. But to my story; I am extremely
cautious how I indulge in the society of this man. If he
learned the half of my impatience to enjoy his society,
I fear he would hold me cheap. For they say, at least
my mother says, that men will not love too much love,
or value any thing that comes cheap. In fact I dare
not treat myself too much, or too often with that high
and intoxicating enjoyment, and I economize
every
moment of it, and feel as though I had
acquired
a title to enjoy it by forbearance before the
treat. I affect a distance and reserve in his presence,
that appears to give him pain, as I know it does me. It
is true, he has not complained in words. But there is
often a modest remonstrance in his manner which taxes
me with cruelty, more painfully than any words he
could utter. We had a long walk together yesterday.
To give us countenance, and to screen our purpose,
Laura
started with us, and as soon as we were beyond view,
she kindly left us to ourselves. How deeply this child
has read the chapter of the heart! And what was the
fruit of this solitary ramble? the very anticipation of
which was sufficient to rouse my pulses to fever
quickness
!
Why, we walked side by side most lovingly
indeed
,
but as silent as stock doves. He sighed, poor
fellow, and I sighed. He said Yeaand I said Amen.
He looked at San Puebla, which is now casting up
ruddy
flames amidst its pillars of smoke, and his eye
kindled
for a moment, but he soon returned to his sighs
again. Once he met me, as I well remember, with a kind
of saucy recklessness. But now, when he steals a
glance at me, his eye quails, and when to assist me in
passing, he takes my hand, his absolutely trembles.
My heart thanks him, for I feel that these are the
tremors
of a subdued heart. He came out at last with the
principal secret, and told me that he was about leaving
this city for Vera Cruz. It was now my turn to show
emotion; and it was at first too great for words. As soon
as I became collected from the first surprise, I told him
that those who wished him best, wished him nothing
better than to stay where he was, and that it was a
conduct
that militated against his professions to me, to leave
a place where he could visit me at his choice. He then
informed me, that the Patriot flag was unfurled at Vera
Cruz; that his principles, his predilections, and he
added
,
as his cheek reddened, his detestation of Iturbide
and his minions forbade him to remain in an inglorious
pursuit here, although he could at any moment look at
the town of the Mansion of Martha, where honorable
men his compatriots were rushing to the tented field.
He added, that his determination had been approved
by the Conde de Serrea; that he expected appointment
and rank in the Patriot army; that there was but one
vista through the darkness of his prospects to the only
hope of his heart, and that he saw no way for him, but
to cut his path through it with his good sword. I know
not if I give them rightly, but at the time I thought them
pretty words, and I understood the meaning to be that,
he had no hope of gaining me, but by gaining distinction
and power at the same time. I saw that his heart sunk
at the prospect of leaving me; and as he looked dejected
and on the minor key, I believe that I threw as much
encouragement as I well could into my manner. I am
afraid that he thought me too fond, for I think that I
pressed his hand and gave him well and fully to know
that, in me he had a tried and sure friend in the
garrison
.
Indeed more soft things were said than there is
any use in writing. I conjured him to take care of
himself
and not be rash. I cautioned him against the
assassin-dagger
of Don Pedro, who is to command the
imperial
forces against the Patriots; and then I placed
before
him the dangers of that sultry and sickly climate.
I conjured up so many horrors in prospect that my eyes
actually filled with tears, and I was obliged to turn
away to prevent his seeing them. He had harped on the
right string, and I became talkative. I said a thousand
things, and some of them I suppose more tender than
I should have said. I am sure that he discovered that
I was a traitor, for I expressed a decided wish that the
Patriots might prevail, and that he might acquire
consideration
and glory; and if they established a new
government
,
above all things, that he might acquire influence
enough to save my father's estate from confiscation.
He clearly understood me to mean that, whenever this
should be the case, he would be the favored man of
my father, as he was now of me. And here, the man
habitually so guarded in the expression of his feelings,
fell into a most amiable fit of raptures, and made a great
many protestations of love and respect and all that, and
he talked so fast, and so fervently, and withal managed
the thing so well, that I was obliged to let him run on.
At seven in the evening I was obliged to tear myself
away from him and see my persecutor. I told him so;
and told him moreover that when he saw with how
much patience I bore this torture, I wished him to
copy it.
I saw this hateful man. My parents have been
saying
every thing but just enough to break my heart, in
order to have me do, or at least say something decisive
before he sets out on this campaign. I have a firm
persuasion
,
that it will be a decisive one; and may God
grant that it may for ever take from him the power of
tormenting me, or any one else. He, too, made his
speech and fell on his knees. To get rid of him, I
assured
him that, if he would leave me free and unmolested
to the end of the campaign, I would give him a decisive
and final answer. He received it to be my intention
then to grant his request. How could I help it? I
wished to be sincere. It is for them who place these
temptations in my way, to answer for it if false hopes
are raised. At any rate, I am rid of him for the present,
and I breathe easier. I have gained time, and God, I
trust, will help the right cause. Don't you think that this
child Laura has threatened to like her father's
secretary
herself! Certainly, she said when she admitted
that she was pleased with him, You know it would only
be necessary to let him be informed of this liking; and
even if I am not as pretty as you, he would no longer
expose
himself to the danger of assassination and yellow
fever, for one fine girl, when he knows that he could
have another fine one gratis. And then your father
being old, stingy, and wilful, will never consent to this
thing, and it will be only necessary for me to affect a
little
VOL. II. 17*
fit of the agony of a broken heart, and my good
parents
would consent to any thing.
In continuation
.
Another proof of the villany of that villanous man,
his Excellency Don Pedro. Notwithstanding all his
protestations of burying the hatchet,and leaving this place
for the army in good will to my beloved, he went
directly
from these professions to plot his assassination. He
was returning, as I heard it, from the theatre to his
lodgings
through a dark alley, and he and his servant were
beset by assassins. Pistols were fired, and dirks drawn.
But Mr. Berrian and his servant played their parts so
manfully that they kept the villains at bay, until the
police
came up, and one of them was apprehended. He
admitted who was his employer, and such is the present
terror of the power of Don Pedro, that the murderer
was discharged at once. The wretch has now left the
city. Heaven grant it may be for ever! And my dear
preserver, too, is gone! I comfort myself that heaven
has preserved him for some great and good purpose, or
he would not have escaped so many perils, which make
it seem as if he bore a charmed life. I saw him a
moment
before his departure. I can never forget his
manner
of taking leave. There is a reality in deep and
genuine love. With him the uncertainty and suspense
of his case, for certainly he does not want
encouragement
,
has given an air of sacredness and purity to his
passion in perfect keeping with his character. He said
that the favoured warriors of other days in my country
had generally carried to the field some little token or
souvenir from the lady of their hopes, but that the most
he could hope even from a fortunate return, would be that
my family would not absolutely disavow his cause, and
that he should not find me another's, and that other his
bitterest enemy. I replied, that nothing justified this
desponding tone. You know my feelings full well. In
these degenerate days people are but too apt to
estimate
causes by their success. Return victorious, and
you may hope all that you wish. But when he grasped
my hand and said
A Dios
, I shed tears in abundance,
and said a number of foolish things, upon which the
wicked man actually pressed my cheek for the first time
with his lips. He is gone, and though for others a more
brilliant sun never shone, to me the blessed light of
heaven
is gloom. I am dispirited and in tears. Heaven
preserve him! The blessed Virgin watch over him! If
he should fall, notwithstanding all my folly, he will
neverknow, he will never dream, to what an extent I
have loved him.
Mexico
,
April
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I envy you, for you are daily near him, who occupies
all my thoughts. And yet such are the horrible
barriers
of party and opinion, your noble minds must be at
variance, and you cannot meet him, for he is a Patriot
and you are a Royalist. So once was I, and I think fiercer
than you. See this man, and but for your husband you
would be a Patriot too. But you are married, and for
your loyalty to your husband and your king you had
best not see him. We have had a large pacquet from
the Patriots, that is, the Conde has had one, and they
have had a battle, the Patriots and Imperialists, and the
latter had the advantage. Heaven be praised, my
beloved
is safe, and Sant' Anna writes that, he behaved
gloriously. He was every where in the thickest of he
fight, hunting, I dare say, for his Excellency, my admirer.
They have appointed him a Colonel, and he has gained
influence and respect far beyond his nominal command.
Every despatch is full of his conduct and his praises.
I rejoice in his glory with trembling. Angels and the
blessed Virgin preserve him, and bring him back in
safety
with his glory! To be admired and promoted in a
cause which the Conde espouses, must be real glory.
Then I read his own letter to the Conde written in
Spanish
.
The purity of the language and style, would have
done credit to the Royal Academy. Of himself he writes
with the perfect modesty and simplicity of a great man.
There was a chasm in the letter, and there, thought I,
had he dared, would have been love for me. I kissed
the white interval at the thought. He says, that Sant'
Anna is full of courage, that the Patriots are no ways
disheartened, and that the people are every day
flocking
to their standard. Indeed the emperor himself looks
in doubt, and his eternal simper was this evening
exchanged
for a look of anxiety, and he appeared the better
for it. He had a great deal to say about his
Excellency
,
and his being the firmest prop of his throne, and how
impatient I must be to hear from the army, and how
anxious for his return! This man of the muddy head
has not yet been admitted to the secret of my likes and
dislikes; and he is too destitute of penetration to see
what is most palpably passing immediately under his
eye. And then, having praised his Excellency, thick
and three fold, he began to anoint me in the same way.
There are certain little liberties which he thinks it a
great honor to bestow upon his favorites. He seemed
disposed to take them with me. I repelled them, and
in a manner, which could not be mistaken. I will aver,
that the man is not wholly destitute of good feeling; for
he blushed even to his red whiskers.
Mexico
,
May
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
You
have made my heart glad with your letter. You
say, that you espouse no cause, that blinds your
understanding
,
or takes away the power of discriminating
truth from error, pretension from reality. That is like
you. You have taken interest enough in him from his
being dear to me, to inquire him out. You delight me
by saying, that his deportment has won all praise,
triumphed
over envy, and even gained the applauses of
your husband. Every generous heart ought to feel the
difference between an unprincipled adventurer, and the
partizan, whose private life and deportment show, that
his heart and his principles are in the cause he espouses;
and who in private pities, relieves, and spares those
men for whose cause he professes to have taken up
arms. It is only necessary to look at him, to see that
the motives that have carried him to the field are
neither
interest nor to take side with the strongest. There
is something that speaks out when the heart is in
earnest
.
I have never seen a man whose manner so
strongly
evinces that every thing he does, is matter of
conscience
and principle.
In continuation
.
Heaven be praised! they have beaten the
Imperialists
,
and that too, when the tide seemed to have turned
against them. All admit that his intrepidity, coolness,
and conduct retrieved the fortunes of the day, and
turned
the tide back upon the foe. He was covered with
blood and with glory, and yet came off from the
conflict
unharmed. I have returned my
Te Deum
on my
bended knee. There are a thousand opinions here.
Even my father seemed to doubt the Imperial cause,
and to waver for a moment. He admitted that every
one allowed the palm of admirable conduct to his
schoolmaster! I told him, that the schoolmaster would
yet play an important part here, and have a hundred
times as much real and efficient influence as these
miserable
puppets that sustain and enact their parts in the
ludicrous
farce of Imperialism for a day. But he is old,
and, Heaven forgive me! he is obstinate and insists on the
miserable old saw, that a bird in the hand, &c. and
concludes with the prophecy, that Don Pedro will return
in triumph, and that if there should be any overturn as I
predict, it will be the putting down the present emperor,
to put up in his place his future son-in-law. Bryan's
favorite
saw two words to that bargain, came to my
memory in answer to my father's proverb. How I long
to see my hero!
In continuation
.
Another battle and he is wounded! Oh, why
cannot
I be there to nurse him, to read to him, and cheer him!
You have sent your surgeon to him, to dress his wound.
You would have won my everlasting love by that act,
if you had not ensured it before. Jacinta, if I have
any weight with the holy father, you shall be canonized.
How noble it is and how like you to do good to your
enemies
!
Enemies! There cannot be enmity between two
such minds as yours and his. I regret, for this turn, that
I am not a professor of the Order of Mercy. Then I
could go and nurse him without reproach. I have not a
doubt but I could help him more than your surgeon.
The report of the day is, that his Excellency is
retreating
upon Xalapa. Then he is so much nearer me, and
as soon as my hero is recovered, so will he be too.
They are marching strong detachments from this city
to the aid of the Imperialists, and the Patriot ranks are
filling up still faster. My heart exults in the glory
acquired
by my beloved. But it is too expensive and
purchased at too much hazard. I awake by night, and
think I hear the guns, they are firing upon him. In this
view I could almost rejoice that he has received a wound,
not dangerous, but sufficient to detain him awhile from
danger. You will congratulate me upon one point
gained
.
My mother has become a Patriot, and in the
presence
of my father, has expressed a decided opinion, that
their cause ought to prevail, and will prevail. She stated
at the same time that she was no longer and never would
be again opposed to my love, and that if I can gain my
father's consent she is perfectly willing, to break with
Don Pedro and give me to the other. I embraced her at
the moment and had almost stifled her with kisses. She
requested me not to caress her to death at that time, for
that she wished to live and see me happy. This full,
and decided expression of her feelings has not been made,
without raising a domestic storm. My father seems to
cling more resolutely to his ship now that it seems to be
sinking. But for me all my omens are of good. The
earth seems to have caught my delight! The city clocks
move faster! The birds have learned a new song, and the
very
leperos
seem good and handsome. At the
Tertulia
without being conscious of it, every one seems to enter
into my joy. I am sure he will yet be mine. I have
always had a presentiment of it. What a sober, quiet,
domestic, stay-at-home wife I should make. I could
knit or embroider a gear at a sitting, so that he were
with me. I would live with him on Crusoe's island
without
Friday. I fear that I am too happy, and dread a
reverse.
Mexico
,
July
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I have this day received a package of your letters at
once. I do not wonder at your astonishment that you
have had no news of me for a long time. It is a miracle
that you should ever hear of me again as an inhabitant
of this earth. Oh! what have I not suffered? I have
lived fifty years in a month, and I have performed, Oh!
such a penance for my sins. Surely, I must have sinned
deeply. But I hope my trials have not been without
their use. I am sure that I am more sober; that I have
acquired some practical philosophy, and that my pulses
will never beat so tumultuously again. But you shall
have the sad story of my sufferings. The evening after
my mother had at last come out with that decided
preference
for Mr. Berrian, that I mentioned to you; too
happy to sit still, and in a frame of mind to muse in the
moon-light and inhale the delicious evening breeze, and
think upon that man, I bade the duea walk with me
and I took the direction of the lake, for we live near that
extremity of the city. It was very imprudent I grant
you, in these times of distraction and misrule. But I
felt so happy and in such a delightful frame of mind to
enjoy the evening! and I felt too as if I was strong in the
strength of his protecting arm. We had cleared the
city and were approaching the lake before we remarked
that a carriage with servants wearing the Imperial livery
followed us. An apprehensive suspicion flashed across
my mind, but was instantly driven out by a pleasanter
train of thought. We continued to walk on for nearly
half a league, and the duea remarked to me that the
carriage followed at the same pace and kept the same
distance. Ashivering terror of some unknown danger
pervaded
my mind, as I perceived that she remarked rightly.
We immediately turned on our steps for the city. The
carriage stopped in a notch of the causeway. Petrified
with terror, I stopped too; but not long, for a man
muffled
in a cloak and followed by two servants made
towards
me. I shrieked and ran as fast as the unwiedly
duea could follow me. I was overtaken in a moment.
The stranger grasped me in his arms, and the servants
at the same moment caught the screaming and struggling
duea Indignation and the spirit of my father
returned
upon me. I sternly asked him what he wanted, for
that if it was my money and jewels they were at his
service. He replied that he was aware that I had not
so mistaken his object; that I could not but have
conjectured
by whom, and for what purpose he was
employed
.
Lest I should still doubt, he told me that he was
ordered to convey me safely and respectfully, if I would
allow him, to Xalapa, there to meet my affianced
husband
;
that he was instructed to explain so much of his
object in order to allay any unfounded apprehensions,
and to set my mind at ease as to my destination. That
for the rest, he hoped I would enter the carriage that
waited for me, cheerfully, when I knew his purpose;
for in that case he was charged to use his best and most
respectful exertions to render the journey pleasant.
But that his commands were positive, and his business
urgent, admitting neither hesitation nor delay; and that
his instructions were to bring me to his Excellency at
Xalapa, respectfully, if I would, or forcibly if he must;
and he begged me to fix upon the alternative.
I put down the coward at my heart, and talked firmly
VOL. II. 18
and indignantly, and told him that none but a robber
would be employed in such a purpose, or would commit
such an outrage upon a man, much less upon a
defenceless
woman; that he might by brute force carry my
person to Xalapa, but that my mind was free, and I
spurned equally at his control and his master's; and that
I would prefer to yield a thousand lives in succession,
rather than put myself in his bad power. I cautioned
him that the times were dubious, and that his employer
might not always be, as now, in power, and that he might
one day be called to account for this evening's outrage.
More than all, I threatened him with the utmost
vengeance
of a powerful father, who had but me, and would
deeply avenge this detestable outrage. He replied with
ironical coolness, that he had no idea of engaging in a
war of reasonings, in which I was sure to have the
better
of the argument; and that he was happy to set my
mind at rest, as it regarded the interference of my
father
,
and that if I wished it, he would show me a letter
from him to his Excellency, the commander in chief, in
which the latter is authorized to take such measures with
me as he shall deem expedient, so that the result of
them be, that you are joined together in holy wedlock.
Having said this, he observed that he was in great
haste, and begged to know, whether he should have the
honor to escort, or to carry me to the carriage. It was
obvious that his purpose was fixed. Trusting to my
future chances, and judging that I should be able the
better
to avail myself of them if I preserved my coolness,
I told him that I was aware into what hands I had fallen;
that I did not doubt his ability or his will, in a trial of
brute strength with a defenceless woman; that I
preferred
settling the point with the master rather than the
man, and that if he would allow my woman to
accompany
me, I would trust to my chance to escape, or to awe
his master after I should arrive, and that I would go with
him; for that in the last resort of outraged liberty I had
resources
beyond his, or mortal control. Remember,
I cried, that I take this woman with me, and that you
pledge yourself not so much as to pollute me again with
the touch of your hand, and that I submit to this
indignity
to avoid the stillgreater one of compulsion. Much
obliged to you, madam, said he, with a air of grinning
irony. You speak like Cicero. Every article of the
treaty shall be religiously observed, and if you are not
the first to infringe that article which binds us to mutual
silence, you are no woman. He opened the carriage
door without offering me his arm, and I sprang into it
as though I were embarking on a party of pleasure.
He lifted the duea in after me, mounted himself, closed
the door, gave a signal, and we were whirled away.
Words would but weakly portray my thoughts and
feelings. We were hardly passed the causeway from
the city, before we were joined by a number of armed
persons on horseback, and among others, I recognised
my father's confidential servant, which circumstance
instantly enlightened me as to the truth of what had just
been told me, that my father was privy to this outrage,
and not only consenting to, but aiding it. This was the
unkindest cut of all. I was obliged to think that he was
seeking what was my happiness, according to his notion
of it, in order to avoid thinking of my father in a way
the very thought of which would be terrible to my heart.
We drove on in silence; for when the man made a
movement as if to speak, I insisted upon the terms of the
treaty. I heard the distant tones of the bells in the city
softening and diminishing in the distance. Finally, all
faded away but the rattling of the wheels and the
trample
of the horses. All hope of rescue or return was at
an end.
We stopped for a moment, and I called my father's
servant by name, and asked him the use of carrying me
so far from home to excite consternation and alarm at
least, with my mother, only to have the pleasure of
carrying
me back again? The man replied (with a
shortness
which evinced, that he had nothing to fear,) that he
would answer all this to my father, and to no one else.
I contented myself with hoping the pleasure of
being
one day able to punish his insolence, and I relapsed
into my former silence.
At three in the morning we came to the mountains.
The person who was with us in the coach descended,
and made a motion for me to follow him. I
perceived
that the whole escort amounted to twenty
persons
.
The master of the gang told me that he was
obliged
so far to infringe the treaty, as to inform me that we
were to tarry here until the rising of the sun, and that I
should be obliged to proceed the rest of the way on a
mule, and that he hoped I would devote the interval to
rest, for that the remainder of the journey would be
fatiguing
.
I went in to the
meson
, and was shown by the
servant to a bed, and my duea had one prepared
beside
me. I called up the recollections of Spanish
romances
I had read, in which, under the aforesaid
provisions
,
distressed damsels sat up all night. But in
disregard
to the precedent I reflected that I should need all
my strength and composure for the scenes that were
before
me, and that, to make the best of my present
situation
,
would be most likely to give me energy and
endurance
,
for whatever I might have to encounter.
Accordingly
,
I went to bed, and dreamed that Mr. Berrian
rode up, the handsomest officer I had ever seen, at the
head of a fine regiment, and that at the sight of him all
my persecutors shifted for themselves; and I was
dreaming
further, and would have dreamed on in this way
for ever, when I was awakened by the summons of my
conductor. I arose, was dressed, mounted my mule,
and requested them to lead on. In the multitude of my
sad thoughts within me, as we were slowly mounting one
hill after another, I reflected, that I was the first
distressed
damsel, so far as I had read, who accompanied
those who carried her off, so peaceably and voluntarily.
I quieted this uneasy reflection by considering again,
that distressed damsels, if they had good sense, were
as strongly called upon to use it, as others, and that it
was better to bear the yoke willingly, which I plainly
saw I must bear at some rate. Besides, I hoped that
an apparent submission to my fate might throw these
people off their guard, and allow me the only chance
which the case admitted of escape. So I made a grand
effort to exclude every object from my thoughts, but the
delightful one of my recent dream.
In this way we advanced constantly, but slowly,
avoiding, as I discovered, the great road, and following
for the most part mule-paths among the mountains, until
we arrived in view of the beautiful city of Xalapa. It
was a lovely view to me, even in the deplorable situation
in which I was placed. Cradled among mountains, its
air is balm, its scenery inspiring, and the blue of its
atmosphere
more soft than that of any place that I had
ever seen. At sight of the town my heart began to
palpitate
,
and I was alternately faint and then my face
VOL II. 18*
glowed. I faintly breathed the dear name instead of
that of the Virgin Mother, and as though there were
relief and protection in the name; the spirit of my
fathers
began to stir within me, and indignation began to
inspire
me with the requisite self-possession. It was just
bright morning, and the morning gun was fired in the
city, just as we halted. I was left under guard of the
rest, and my conductor went forward, as I suppose, to
report his progress and success to his employer. It was
nearly an hour before he returned, and I had a fine
opportunity
to meditate how I should conduct in the
approaching
emergency. I revolved every conceivable
plan of address and action, and ended by feeling the
impossibility of anticipating a conduct proper for every
supposable case, and determined simply to act
according
to circumstances.
My conductor returned, and the escort marched
through various streets in the city. It halted at last in
front of a spacious and splendid building, which they
called the palace. I was ordered to alight, and my
conductor led the way up a flight of marble stairs to a
piazza, from which a door opened into a spacious saloon.
A lady dressed gaily, and with rather a handsome
person
,
but of a bold and disagreeable manner, requested
me to be seated. She informed me that his Excellency
the commanding general, would have the honor to wait
upon me as soon as he had finished some important
business
that could not be deferred. I replied, that it was a
thing altogether undesired on my part to see his
Excellency
,
as she called him, at all; and that the longer his
important duties detained him, the better I should be
pleased. Indeed, madam, said she, that is
astonishing
!
I should have supposed that ladies were more
alike in their tastes. The bravery and gallantry of our
noble general has won every heart here. I am told,
madam, that he has done you the infinite honor to elect
you for his bride, and that with the consent of your
noble father he has brought you here to celebrate the
nuptials. You can scarcely imagine how much you will
be envied this distinguished honor. You have only
to fear that some jealous rival will mix poison with your
beverage before it reaches you. I found the drift of
her discourse, and simply replied, Madam, I have not
the honor of knowing you, nor the taste to like you,
and when you have said all that you have on your
mind, I hope you will have the goodness to relieve me of
the pleasure of your company. She made a low and
sweeping courtesy, and said that she felt very much
oppressed
at heart, that she had not the good fortune to
please me in the same degree as she had long had
my future husband; that, as to leaving the
elected
bride of his Excellency alone, just on her
introduction
to his palace, and on the eve of being united to him,
was a thing not to be thought of, and that the general
would never forgive her such rudeness. I smiled in her
face, threw as much contempt as I could into my
manner
,
and reclined on the sofa with the assumed ease and
insolence of a high-bred lady and made up my
countenance
for meeting his Excellency.
It was nearly noon when he came, and if I had not
had such just cause for indignation and terror, I should
have pitied the wretch, when he approached me. He
had tasked himself to the utmost, to assume the
nonchalance
and tooth-pick insolence of a hero, who visits a
subdued and imprisoned enemy. The moment he saw
my look of high defiance, his insolence forsook him
His cheek was blanched, and he began stammering
something
about love and promises, and the consent of my
father, and my recreant and degrading taste for the vile
traitor, the Yankee adventurer. I heard him calmly to
the end, and then I opened upon him. Our language
i rich in terms of
belittlement
, hatred, and contempt;
and I was fluent in the use of them. I told him that
if he had possessed at the first, a single rudiment of any
thing that was noble in man, his birth, fortune, and
equality of condition, together with the wishes of my
parents, would, undoubtedly, have gained my consent to
a union with him, before I had ever seen any thing
better
.
But, that the moment he persevered in his suit,
propped by his interest with my parents, after he was
assured he never could have mine, he became to me, not
simply an object of dislike, but of loathing; for that a
man who would in any way impose himself on a woman
as a husband, after he knew she disliked and wished to
avoid him, must be a tyrant and a coward, unworthy of
a generous thought. I admitted that I did indeed love
the American adventurer, as he had called him, with my
whole heart, and I had thought, since I had known him,
that my aversion to his Excellency had indeed
increased
by contrasting characters so very opposite. I
hinted
at his having fished him from the water. Not to be
outdone in this strain, he reminded me, that much as
that adventurer wanted birth and condition, he had
invited
him to decide their mutual pretensions in single combat,
which he had declined. I replied by reminding him
that the opportunity, so sought, did afterwards occur;
and I remember, I continued, that there were two
accounts
of that affair, the one by him, and the other by
yourself, and they materially differed; I presume you
understand which I believed. This allusion transported
him beyond all forbearance. He reddened with rage,
turned on his heel, traversed the room twice or thrice
with rapid strides, and then placing himself full before
me, and summoning all his coolness, he said, Madam,
I see it is useless to contend with you in the war of
words. I shall not condescend to any farther
discussion
.
You are mine, because I have power, and love
you. You are mine, because I entertain a deadly
hatred towards the man you love. In the double game,
which you have played between him and me, you are
mine by implied engagement. You are mine by your
father's consent, and even assistance, as you discover.
All these indignant airs only give my pretty caged bird
a more engaging appearance to me. Make yourself
comfortable and at home here. You are mistress of the
palace and of its master. To-morrow perhaps,or the next
day, or at my convenience and leisure, you will
accompany
me to a
hacienda
in the mountains. Father
Josephus
and your father's servant will be in waiting, and
your duea on your part, to witness to earth and
Heaven
,
that you are my lawful wedded wife. You will
hardly
attempt to show any more of these airs, when you
discover that they only render you more piquant, and to
my taste. He could not however resist the cool smile
of contempt that I gave him, and grinding his teeth, and
half drawing his sword, he uttered a horrid curse, that I
should then be his, alive or dead.
His countenance while he uttered these words was
horrible, and I felt a sinking faintness at heart which I
disguised by turning away from him apparently in
contempt
.
I only added, You may, perhaps, carry me
there, and my poor father may have abetted this horrid
purpose. I will promise nothing beforehand. The same
Providence which has so mercifully interposed for me
before
,
will not forsake me now in this my hour of extreme
need. When it comes to the worst I can only die, and
the thought that I was your wife would blast me as
surely
as a thunder-stroke. You have taught me, what I
thought was impossible, to abhor you more than ever.
I hope that, until this dreadful hour of removal, I am at
least to have the relief of being left alone to think on
him who has so often delivered us both, and who little
thought, when he last spared you in battle, that he
spared
a viper to sting him, and all that was dear to him, to
death. He replied, that if it would comfort me, to have
one more solitary night for such pleasing
remembrances
,
he had promised my father that, up to the time
when he should have the claims of a husband, I should
be left to myself. Saying this, he withdrew.
The remainder of the day and the ensuing night
passed
,
as before, except that the lady, of whom I spoke,
showed herself only at supper. Early the next
morning
I made my way into the street, and attempted to get
out of the town and escape. At first, I was exposed to
the insults of the soldiery, of which the town was full.
But it was soon discovered who I was. The commander
was sent for, and he met me in the street, half a mile
from his residence. I was wearied, and frightened, and
subdued, and I wept like a child. I fell on my knees
before him in the street, and in presence of his brutal
soldiers, and implored him by his mother, his sisters, and
the blessed Virgin, to let me travel on foot and alone to
Vera Cruz. You need not go there, said he, to
see the adventurer. He is expected here every hour at
the head of the rebel troops to besiege me, and my
sweet bride in the palace. What a charming solace we
shall have for passing the dull days of the siege! It
was in vain that I wept and implored the officers,
soldiers
,
and passengers. The soldiers were ordered to
take me by force and carry me home; and I was
conveyed
there as if I had been a corse.
The dreadful hour was approaching; and I was but
too well apprized of the lengths, to which he was
prepared
to go. I had reserved a knife which I used for
preparing
pens and pairing my nails, for an emergency. I
had always believed him the kind of person that men
call a coward, and I had determined when we should be
alone to operate upon his fears, by a show of assault.
I dared hardly think of using it for another purpose, for
I had religious scruples in regard to suicide. I
searched
,
and found that it was gone. He was now with me
alone, assuring me that he should not leave me again
until the coach came to convey us to the
hacienda
. I had
read of fictitious personages in such cases acting in
heroics. For me, I felt that I was but a feeble,
trembling
woman. I again fell on my knees before him. I
folded my hands in the attitude of the most earnest
supplication
.
I said, Forgive me, Don Pedro. I will use
words of harshness to you no more. I will strive to
love you, and obey you, and become whatever you
wish. I cannot pass at once from hatred to love.
Allow
me but four days, and at the end of that timeand
I hesitated. And what at the end of four days,
asked
he. At the end of four days, I answered, I will
either consent to marry you, or die. Grant me this, I
beseech you, by the many days which we have spent
together
when I did not hate you, when I believed that I
one day might love you. That, madam, said he,
will never do. You have fooled me long enough, and
I see your only object is to gain time, until the Yankee
can come to your relief. `The present time,' the
proverb
says, `is the only time.' I must avail myself of it.
While this was passing, the carriage, that was to convey
us away, drove to the door. The hateful woman
appeared
to accompany me. I remember nothing farther,
except a certain swimming in my head, and that the
room and every object was inverted, and whirled round.
I did not awake to consciousness, until after midnight.
The faithful duea was weeping by my side. A
physician
and a priest were in the apartment. Don Pedro
came to my bedside, and they came with him. I felt
tranquil, but so extremely weak, as hardly to be able to
articulate. I heard the physician inform him, that in
my present situation, the least motion or alarm would
be fatal to me. I felt my strength and my powers
returning
with my consciousness, and was sensible that my
faintness had been that of extreme terror. But I
carefully
imitated, as well, and as closely as I could, the
symptoms which had been so recently real. I had the
inexpressible satisfaction to find that the physician was
deceived by this counterfeiting, and advised him to
leave me to repose, of which I feebly expressed my
need. Two servants were left with candles in the
remote
part of the room, and the faithful duea sat
by my side. You may be sure I had no thoughts of
repose
.
Not many minutes after the wretch left me, I saw
through the blinds the flash, and instantly afterwards
heard the report of a cannon, and a continued and
terrific
shouting of voices. Shortly after a person came
into the room and uttered something in a whisper. The
attendant women cried out Jesu Maria! and began to
wring their hands. We are besieged, they cried. The
North American general besieges us. Oh! the horrid
creature! He spares neither aged nor infants, lay
women
,
nor professed; and they crossed themselves and
comforted themselves with a prayer, that the general
might beat them off. How tumultuously my bosom
throbbed! The cannon pealed again and again,
and every discharge seemed in my ear the noble
voice of my deliverer announcing to me, that relief was
at hand.
In continuation
.
My tormentor came and went, and deep anxiety sat
upon his countenance. I made it a point to lie perfectly
still in bed, and my entire abstinence from all
refreshment
for some time, had given me the paleness and
languor
of real disease. The second day of my
confinement
in this way, I heard a louder and more continued
cannonade, the crash of small arms in the intervals, and
then the infuriated shouts of the assailants, and
sometimes
the shrieks of the besieged. The attendants came
into the room on tip-toe and in a whisper, but their
countenances evinced, that their terrors were real, not
the offspring of idle speculation. I made the best
interpretation
I could, of the broken exclamations and
whispers, and I inferred that Don Pedro had made a
sortie
from the town; that it had been routed and driven
back, and that there was hourly danger, that the town
would be taken.
I feigned sleep, and the anxiety and terror of my
attendants
were so great, that they left me alone with the
duea. My pocket-book had not been taken from me.
In it was paper and a pencil. I traced on a slip of
paper
these words: I am here under the control of
VOL. II. 19
Don Pedro. Save me from a destiny worse than
death....
I gave this scrawl to the duena. I was aware of her
extreme simplicity, and I gave every caution to enable
her to convey it safely to Mr. Berrian. I furnished her
with money, and told her that my life depended upon
that billet's finding its way to him. She promised her
best, and retired; and after a sufficient time, came back
with a satisfied countenance, informing that she had
hired
an Indian with five doubloons, who had promised, on
the sign of the cross, to have it conveyed to the Patriot
general.
At night Don Pedro returned, and I discovered by his
countenance, in extreme anger. The duena had
learned
that the garrison had been severely beaten, and that
it was the general impression, that the town could hold
out but a few days. I might have attributed his
anger
to this source, but he soon undeceived me. So,
said he, all this sinking faintness is a mere
ruse de
guerre
. I am astonished, that such a beautiful and
innocent
face can conceal so much intrigue and deception.
See, traitress, that there are others as wise as yourself.
That infernal rebel may learn that you are here, and be
urged to save you from an event so much more terrible
than death. But the information, you discover, has to
pass through my hands, and I must immediately possess
the rights of a husband, to enable me rightly to dispose
of your billet. There is some probability, that the rebel
may render it expedient for us to evacuate the town,
and retreat to a place more central to our resources.
But we must be wedded before we leave this place.
You will prepare yourself in a couple of hours for a visit
from the father confessor. He has resided long, in that
capacity, in your father's family, and you must feel it a
great privilege, to have him solemnize the marriage. It
is a fortunate contingency that he arrived yesterday with
despatches from the emperor, and has consented to
perform
this service for us. I recommend to you the same
wisdom which you showed in your journey hither. You
will have to submit, and I could wish it were cheerfully,
to the unavoidable necessity of your condition. Trick,
feint, deception will neither create surprise, inspire pity,
nor obtain delay. The thing may be worse than death
now; but, as one of your cursed English poets has said,
you will first `loathe, endure, and then embrace.'
Saying this he put the billet, which I had sent Mr.
Berrian
,
before me, and retired.
My resolution was formed the moment he was gone.
I threw my arms round the neck of my only friend and
adviser, the simple and faithful duena, and was
relieved
by a burst of tears. My heart would else have
broken. The long and tried affection of this kind
servant
manifested itself in earnest prayers for me to the
blessed Virgin, and she made a vow, which she never
made, except in extreme trials, and which, she assured
me, had never failed but in one instance, to obtain an
answer. She assisted me to throw on my dress. I
arose and summoned to my aid the whole energy of my
nature, resolving to keep myself as cool, and my eye as
steady as possible, to seize the proper moment and
course of action. One thing was determined, that Don
Pedro should never be able to call me his wife. The
duena's vow seemed to be answered, for I felt nerved
to any point of daring. Nevertheless, when I heard the
ascending footsteps of the expected party, my heart
began
to palpitate, my respiration became laborious,
and the apartment, as before, began to whirl round. I
was again unconscious for some time. The terror of the
parties when I began to recover, evinced that they were
aware there had been no deception in this fainting.
There were in the apartment the woman whom I first
saw on entering the house, some other women dressed in
tawdry finery, that might be servants, my father's head
servant, the father Josephus, and Don Pedro. The
duena hung over me sobbing and holding volatile salts,for
me to smell, and rubbing my temples with the same.
Don Pedro approached me and essayed to take my
hand. The touch instantly thrilled through my frame,
and restored to me all my native energy. I arose, put by
his hand, and passed him towards the father.
Father
,
said I, I have not thought well of you for a long
time. You have now a chance to redeem my good
opinion, and for ever ensure my gratitude. You have
seen how suddenly things change here. To serve me
now, may be one day of service to you. What is this
horrible farce that you are about to enact? You, a
minister of the altar, and abet this horrible business?
Marriage is a sacrament. There is no union unless both
parties consent. Could you conjure a fiend here from
his infernal abode, I would wed him as soon as that
man. I might at least respect the intellectual powers of
the horrible being. Think you, that Heaven will permit
such horrible sacrilege as you appear to meditate, to
pass unpunished? Why kill the child of your
benefactor
,
that never did you harm? You cannot doubt, after
what you have seen, that such an union would kill me at
once. I conjure you by your mother, your sister, the
blessed Virgin, Jesus who hung on the tree, by the God
of whose mysteries you were the minister, let alone this
impious mockery. Refuse to have part or lot in it.
Interpose
your high authority as the minister of God to
reprove and disappoint this wretch.
I pronounced these words in the tone of the most
impassioned
supplication, and held fast to his pontifical
robe. He turned deadly pale, and evidently faltered in
his purpose. The greater spirit was evidently
subservient
to the less, for Don Pedro, in a tone of authority,
informed him that all was ready; and bade him proceed
in the ceremony. He reminded him of his given word,
the consent of my father, and intimated surprise, that so
wise a man could hesitate in so just a resolution from the
tragic rant of a girl, whose head had been turned, and
whose heart had been polluted and rendered
disobedient
,
by heresy. This was touching the key,note, and
instantly restored to him his inflexibility of purpose.
He began in that deep and awful tone of voice, in which I
had so often heard him celebrate the mysteries of our
religion
in my father's house. His eye was cast up to
heaven
,
and his words seemed to come from the bottom of his
breast. Yea, said he, it is a sacrament, and one
that has been too long deferred. I plead guilty before
God and the saints, that when in former time I have
been urged by your father to this same course, I have
yielded to the motions of a weak and sinful compassion.
Hc mea culpa
. It is easy to see how deep and
fatally
that arch heretic has exerted his influence upon you.
In solemnizing this marriage, I unite you to your equal in
birth and fortune, a husband, destined for you from
your earliest years,and with whom you played as such in
the innocent days of your childhood. I unite you to a
true and faithful son of the church, the first subject of
your emperor, a man, who has a right to award the
honor
VOL. II. 19*
of his hand where he pleases. In doing it, I secure
your temporal happiness against your own perverted
heart and judgment. I secure your temporal happiness
and honor, and more than all, it is to purify your soul
from the taint of heresy, and to secure your eternal
salvation
,
that I commence these holy mysteries.
Saying
this, he began the usual services of the church,
commanding
me the while, in the name of God and the
church, to take Don Pedro by the right hand. I
indignantly
pushed aside the offered hand, and continued in a
tone of remonstrance, and in a voice so frantic and loud,
that it prevailed over the deep voice of the father's
services
.
These opposing efforts were making at the same
moment, and I could hardly make out that he had
proceeded
to that point of the ceremony, where our mutual
responses would have been necessary to its proper
validity
,
when I sprang by a strong effort from the two
women who, under the semblance of bride-maids,
actually
held me in my position, and in struggling to open the
door and escape I fainted and fell to the floor. My
agony
of head and heart was too intense, long to allow me
the repose of fainting, and I quickly recovered
consciousness
.
A burst of cannon and small arms was heard,
followed by shouts and shrieks, and all the wild outcry
of a captured city. Father Josephus fled in one
direction
,
and my infamous persecutor in another, and in the
next moment I was in the arms of Mr. Berrian! My
appearance was a sufficient comment on the duena's
narrative. I was pale as death, and my hair was
disheveled
.
He hung over me with the tenderness of a
mother, who watches the return of a child from a
fainting
fit. His countenance had hardly relaxed from the
sternness of recent slaughter, and his clothes and sword
were stained with blood. My visible agony, the
dreadful
extremity in which he found me, and the tale of my
sufferings melted the young warrior to tears, which I for
my part could have kissed away as they formed in his
eye. Dearest Martha, said he, let me wash away
these stains. You see I am polluted with blood. But
it was no time for scruples and feminine terrors. I
clung to him as if the horrors, from which I had
just escaped, were still impending. Officers were every
moment calling upon him for orders, and every thing
abroad was in the confusion of a city recently captured.
I saw that he wished to be abroad and with me, at the
same moment. O! leave me not, said I, for you
cannot imagine the misery from which you have saved
me. Was ever deliverance so great and opportune?
The victim you have so often rescued from destruction
is now yours, and yours forever.
While I was thus clinging to him, and weeping on his
bosom for joy, and the duena devouring his disengaged
hand with kisses, the shrieks and exclamations in our
vicinity gave a terrible evidence of the lawless outrages
of an infuriated soldiery in a captured city. He made
a great effort of self-conquest, placed a guard of his
countrymen about me, and tore himself from my grasp,
saying, that delightful as it was, to spend these
moments
of deliverance and joy with me, the highest of all
duties called him away from selfish enjoyment, and that
he must prevent the indiscriminate massacre of the
citizens
.
Dear Martha, said he, compose and assure
yourself. You have nothing to fear. I will restore
order
and stay the fury of the soldiers, and then return
on the wings of love and impatience. Yes,
answered
I, in the foolish transports of the moment; but
you cannot escape me so easily. I have suffered the
terror of distraction too long to forego the assurance of
your protection for a moment. Where you go, I will
go. Another general burst of shrieks came upon our
ears. I looked in his face, and my own sense of duty
returned. I relinquished his arm. Go, said I,
restrain
those wretches. Be to others what you have
been to me. God forbid that I should turn the current
of your humanity and protection from other
unfortunates
.
The moment he left me a shiver of terror ran through
my frame, as though the recent horrors, from which he
had delivered me, were about to press on me again. My
guard was commanded by a young American officer of
noble appearance, who did every thing to restore my
courage, assuring me that my persecutor was gone with
all his train, and that I was in no danger while his
strength and his good sword lasted. Notwithstanding
these assurances, the hour of his absence seemed to me
an age. In an hour he returned in a superb uniform.
All stains of blood had disappeared, and he had the
firm and tranquil port of command, and the eye and
manner of one, who had so lately guided the storm in
mercy, had restored tranquillity and confidence to
the trembling citizens, and had tied up the
unbridled
fury of his soldiers. Order and quiet, said he,
are now re-established, and the two coming hours, my
dear Martha, are wholly to you. The Imperialists have
left us in quiet possession of the city, and we shall
remain
here for the present. How little did I expect this
excess of joy! All that were present, except the duena
and Bryan, whose fresh Irish face sparkled with joy,
saw that we should prefer to be alone. I could not find
it in my heart to banish these persons, who participated
so keenly in the joy of my deliverance.
When all had retired but those before whom I felt no
restraint, after the thousand earnest and broken
exclamations
natural to our case, after the numerous
questions
,
that received no answers, had passed, and we had
become sufficiently calm to listen to narrative, Mr.
Berrian
informed me, that Bryan, who acted as a kind of aid,
and was always by his side during the siege, brought
him intelligence only this morning, how I was situated.
We had determined on the assault of this place
to-morrow
,
said he. This information anticipated the fate
of the place one day. I gave instant orders for the
assault
.
It was a fierce and bloody struggle. But the
Imperialists fought without a commander, and of course
much of their effort was wasted, because directed to no
given object. I arrived here, it appears, at the fortunate
moment. For, though such a constrained and
abominable
union ought never to have bound your duty or
conscience
for a moment, I am perfectly sensible, that I have
delivered you from painful scruples, and I am most
happy in thinking, that Don Pedro has not the miserable
satisfaction of saying, that the forms of this outrage were
consummated. He gave me various other details of
his short campaign, and taking my hand, which perhaps
I should have withdrawn, but did not, and looking timidly
in my face, he asked, Dearest Martha, what now? I
am made a kind of fair-weather and Guerilla general.
The short-lived Imperial pageant is crumbling to ruins.
Don Pedro will fall with his master. I cannot but
flatter
myself, that whatever order of things shall arise upon
these ruins, I shall have enough influence and
consideration
to secure your father's estate from confiscation.
What shall I say further, Martha? You know my heart
too well, to need any declarations more. I am
perfectly
sensible of the inequality between us in many points.
But I feel as if I had claims. Should you be disposed
to try me farther, or refer me to new contingencies in a
country so distracted, I fear I should turn tyrant in my
turn. I am a general, dear Martha, at your service,
and just at this moment am in great authority. Are you
disposed for ever to renounce Don Pedro, and titles and
hereditary honors, and become the wife of a simple
citizen of the United States? If not, I give you sufficient
warning, that I shall carry you off by a dark lanthorn,
to a distant and haunted castle, or a den, or cavern, or
something of that sort, and compel you amidst the
howling
of wolves, and by the terrors of a platoon of soldiers,
to say, `Yea, and Amen.' Indeed,general, said I,
doing
homage by a sufficient bow to his epaulets, you
need not use compulsion with a willing subject.
Provided
only, that the solemnity be consecrated with the
rites of my mother-church, and in presence of my
dearest
mother, who has given her full and unqualified
consent
,
you can take the Dona Miguela Martha de Alvaro
for your true and wedded wife, whenever you choose.
To be the wife of the general, here I bowed as in duty,
and a citizeness of the United States, fills all my present
desires. I mean not to infringe decorum or self-respect.
But to put the risk of being separated from my dear
deliverer, and falling once more into the base hands of
Don Pedro as much as possible out of the question, I
shall not, except by compulsion allow myself to be
separated from the escort of the general again, until he
shall deliver me over to the protection of my dear
mother.
You may suppose that he said kind things back again,
and he did so; and it was a kind of contest, which should
say the most civil and affectionate things. He is one of
those men, who show to most advantage when
contemplated
nearest at hand. It is true, he looked none
the worse for his epaulets, and for having fought like a
hero. I hope you will do me the justice to believe, that
though a woman, I am not precisely the person to
admire
a mere pageant, or to allow my eyes to be caught
with a fine person, a sword, and lace. How simple, and
yet how dignified is this man in private! Even after
this unequivocal giving myself up to him,remember the
situation in which I was placed,the same man who had
just driven the legions of the enemy before him, and
who came to me fresh from the slaughter of an assaulted
city, took the hands of a simple girl who threw herself
into his arms, with trembling. I shall never love or
respect
him less for intimate acquaintance. I have
always
doubted the man-hating maxims of Rochefoucauld,
and I am convinced of the falsity of one of his opinions
most frequently quoted, which implies, that no one is
great to those who see him in private.
The duena is confirmed in her persuasion of the
efficacy
of her vow, and I have promised her a husband,
as soon as a good one can be obtained, and she is
happy
.
Bryan talks Irish, and capers for pure joy, for I
have told him, that we, neither of us, are ever to leave his
master; and I have promised him, that he shall have a
shanty
built to his own notion, either at Durango, or in
the States. For we have already agreed,after the event,
(this dear man blushes even now at the word marriage,
so we call it
event
, as the Romans through delicacy,
softened
the term
death
, to the word
decease
,) after the
event, we are to live half the year in his country, and
and half the year in mine. We are thus to migrate with
the autumnal birds and the swans. In the autumn we
fly to the south, and in the spring return to the north.
Mexico
,
August
, 1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I am too happy to write to any being but you, and I
begin to credit the old saw, which asserts that happiness
makes us selfish. I left myself at the close of my last,
along with my general, at Xalapa. Instead of two
hours which he promised me, he staid until late at night.
Before he left me, he arranged the terms by a message,
on which I might stay at the Carmelite convent in that
city, as long as he occupied it with his troops.
Protestant
and heretic as they held him, he has present power,
and, I fear me, that is the divinity most devoutly
worshipped
here, as elsewhere. He promises the sisterhood
protection. He stations a guard without the walls, and
is to be admitted within them at any hour that he
chooses. They are to afford the shelter of their
sanctuary
to me, until he carries me back in triumph to
Mexico
.
The convent is a sweet place, the exact
retirement
for a mind and a heart like mine. It is in valley,
like a sweet isle sheltered in a sea of mountains. Here
are fine oaks, the sure indications of health. It has
orange groves, and the delicious fruits and flowers of
every clime. Amidst its bowers run a number of
beautiful
and limpid brooks, chafing over pebbles. Hither I
was removed, escorted by the youthful general and a
select body of troops. At midnight he retired and left
me to the notes of the pealing organ, the midnight
prayers of the sisters, and to communion with my own
thoughts.
In the morning he informed me that volunteer
Patriot
detachments were crowding to his standard, and that
three thousand have already joined him here. He tells
me, that he is impatient to see my mother, and that he
intends
leaving a garrison, commanded by an officer upon
whom he can depend, in this city, and pursuing Don
Pedro to Mexico, whither he is retreating. I
replied
that I was happy here, and begged him to allow my
heart a little repose, assuring him, that if he had the
regard
,
which he pretended for me, he would not leave a
place where I was so delightfully situated, and where he
could see me without molestation or suspicion. I
reminded
him how different all this might be elsewhere.
Not at all, he replied. They never shall take you
from me again, Martha. Besides, this is a cause in which
every consideration must yield to the requirements of
its interests. And I have a confident hope, when I
have seen your mother, that we shall find a place there,
that will content you as well as this. I could not but
admire the patriotism and self-control that led him to
pursue his duty against his inclination. I have not a
doubt, that he prefers the conversation and society of
Martha, to all the pomp and circumstance of war and
glory. I told him to do as his sense of duty dictated,
for that I was too good a Patriot, to wish to have him
sacrifice the interests of the country for love, and that I
had enjoyed one day and night beyond the reach of
fortune.
He had this day to make a march with a select body
of troops to a village, which will require his absence,
until
to-morrow morning. I shed childish tears at this
information
,
and held his arm, until he gently
disengaged
himself. To excuse me, remember what I have
VOL II. 20
recently suffered. I followed him as he rode slowly
away, until his figure, the waving plumes of his cap, and
the troop were lost in the distance. Then I had need
of the consolations of religion, the quiet of the sanctuary,
the pealing organ, the fragrance of the burning incense,
the deep responses of the prayers, to turn my thoughts
from idolatry towards a better country. What a
dreadful
thought, that we must be separated from those we
love, not by such absences, terrible as they are, which
leave us the confident hope of a return; but to be
separated
by the grave, and have the impervious veil of
eternity
interpose between us and them! Oh! to be
separated
from him forever! The thought is chilling. I am
in thought, weaving the ties of a relation with the earth,
too tender. Why was the heart formed capable of such
intense attachments, and yet to moulder in the dust?
And then what say the rigid of my Mother Church about
the soul him, I so dearly love? They term him heretic.
Francis Berrian, my beloved, whose every thought is
noble, whose impulses are all mercy and kindness, and
whose heart is consecrated to purity and virtue, a
heretic
!
And the sly, cruel, selfish, intriguing father
Josephus
,
one of the faithful, and a minister of our mysteries!
Jacinta, I remember, that you were formerly more
liberal
than myself, and that you used to say, that a good
heretic was better than a bad catholic. If he is a
heretic
,
I am in a fair way to become one too. Holy Virgin
defend him! Keep him from the dagger of the assassin,
and the sword of the enemy, and until he returns to
these walls, may no image of earth, but that of Martha,
mingle with his pure dreams.
Mexico
,
August
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
He returned next day in safety to Xalapa. Don
Pedro was too far in advance of him, to be overtaken.
He immediately selected a garrison and appointed a
commander for this city. He has had news from Sant'
Anna, who has captured Queretaro. Having settled his
arrangements for leaving this city, he spent the greater
part of the day alone with me, in the charming
gardens
and groves of the convent, and such a day! A
year of such days would be too much for a state of
trial
.
The next morning he started with his whole force,
except the garrison, for Mexico. It was a cheering, and
heart-stirring sight, the ceremonial of our leaving,
and I think, intended as a kind of
fte
for me. The troops
appeared to be in their gayest attire and in high spirits
They filed off in front of the convent gate. The piazza
of the convent was filled with all the gaiety and beauty
of the city. My general rode a spirited white charger,
and many an encomium did the ladies pass upon him
little knowing how my heart concurred in all their
praises. They all admitted he was the finest looking
man they had ever seen. This with ladies is no small
praise. As he came up in front and doffed his military
cap and waved his plumes, there was a corresponding
waving of handkerchiefs, and fair hands, and a general
shout of
Viva la Republica
, and
Viva el Capitan
Liberador
.
He dismounted and came up to the gate, which
was thrown open for the occasion, kissed the hand of
the prioress and other religious sisters, and asked their
prayers for the success of his cause. The prioress
presented
him with a consecrated handkerchief. which
received with a respectful address, and what surpris
them most, was not his uncommon beauty of form and
person, nor his gallant and dignified bearing as an
officer
,
but that he bowed like a king, spoke the true
Castilian
,
and kissed the hand of the prioress, like a devout
catholic. I confess, that a little pride mixed with the
love in my heart, when he came to me in the presence
of such a concourse, and begged the honor of escorting
me to Mexico, and to my mother.
To this request, most gracefully and gallantly made, I
bowed like an awkward country girl,and could not find a
word of reply. My heart said, Yea and Amen! To
Mexico and as much farther as you choose. Ten of the
first officers and select troops formed double parallel
lines. He led me through them, his cap in hand; and
theirs were instantly doffed as he passed, and they drew
their swords in sign, as they explained it to me, of
offering
me protection. The moment we were beyond the
gate, a beautiful horse, appearently matched to that of
the general, was brought me, and another for the
due
a.
He gracefully assisted me into the saddle. The
moment I was seated, the cannons fired. There was
what they called a
feu de joie
. The bells struck, and
the colors were displayed on the towers in the city.
Peal after peal responded from the town. The drums
rolled. The piercing notes of the fife were heard.
The shouts were re-echoed from the hills. Then there
was a momentary interval of silence again. It was
broken by renewed peals of cannon, and the army, the
citizens, the surrounding multitude, and the spectators
on the towers and roofs of the city, rent the air with
Viva el Capitan Liberador
. This was repeated a
number of times. Instantly all was still. The hats
were replaced. The general uttered the word March!
in a clear and strong voice, and a full band struck up its
slow and plaintive national air, in a note, which seemed
in my ear a wail for the dead, exciting in me a thrill of
feeling a thousand times more deep, than all that had
preceded. Our horses moved off at a slow and
measured pace, apparently the result of concert, that
every rank might settle into its proper place. We were
all mounted, and the trampling of so many thousand
horses, produced a sound so grand, and so unlike all
that had preceded, that nothing else could convey
any similitude of it. How delightful was this
journey
!
How different from the sullen and desponding
train of thoughts in which I came here! Jacinta, you
came over the sea with the beloved of your heart, and
had that long and intimate sojourn with your husband,
too. But it seems to me, that I cannot be happier, than
I am. I would be content, at any rate, to compound
with destiny, and remain always as I am I can pretend
to convey no idea of his assiduity, tenderness, and
gallantry
.
Not a word, not a look, apparently not a
thought escapes him, but what unites the expression of
devoted affection with that of vestal purity. He seems
to regard me as a kind of hallowed and consecrated
thing. Indeed, the second night of our journey, as he
led me to my apartment, in a sweet and romantic
cottage
,
which opened into a pretty garden, as we inhaled
through the lattice the fragrance of the jessamine and
the
multiflora
rose, when he wished me the usual
bon
soir
, he drew a deep sigh, which said, as plainly as sigh
could say it, that the separation was painful, and that
he should have preferred to watch with me all
night.
Every hour and every day of this charming journey
VOL II. 20*
was a succession of new enjoyments. It appeared to
me, as if the soldiers, the travellers, the earth, and skies,
did and looked their best, and were robed in their
gayest, to please me. I trembled even at this
excess
of enjoyment, and I expressed my feelings to
my beloved. This same deep capacity of the heart,
said I, for exquisite enjoyment, when the fountains
become troubled, will furnish a proportionate energy
for suffering. Let us hope, he replied, that these
hearts which can suffer and enjoy in such an exquisite
degree, will finally be rendered permanent in happiness
in a better country. Meanwhile, let us take the good
without any of these disquieting apprehensions.
Sufficient
unto the day is its own evil.
Jacinta, I recollect your remark, that what is said of
the history of nations, is equally true of the history of
the heart. The happiest periods are those, in which
there is least to say about them. Every moment of my
time until I arrived in view of the glorious valley of
Mexico, was a moment of tranquil and exquisite
satisfaction
.
My cavalier was always riding by me by day,
surrounded by his officers, bearing the port of command,
and each imitating his gallantry to me. By night even,
I well knew that he was watching near me. I heard
every hour his voice of music in reply to the sentinel,
echoing the words All is well.
The first view of this valley, which unites every thing
that is grand, or rich, or beautiful in nature and in art,
awoke me from my long trance of enjoyment. I
remembered
that this great city, so difficult to approach,
and so hard to attack with any prospect of success, was
in possession of the emperor and his troops,
commanded
by a wretch, whose hatred towards the chosen of my
heart, would be now tenfold more rancorous and
vindictive
,
than ever. My father, what would he say to the
present order of things? Of my mother I had no doubt.
But there was enough of doubt and uncertainty in the
prospect before me, to fill my mind with anxiety and
suspense. Mr. Berrian approached me. Yonder,
said he, are the towers of Mexico. My heart swells
at the sight, for I have a presentiment, that I shall soon
call you mine, and that the Patriot flag shall soom wave
from their pinnacles. And then, dearest Martha
And then, said I, my dear friend, you will be again
in danger. I will not advance a step, until you promise
me, that you will strive to avoid exposure, if not for
your own sake, at least for mine. You have already
won enough of glory. He assured me, that for the
cause, for his own sake, and a thousand times more for
mine, he would be cautious and not expose himself to
unnecessary danger. I have, he said, at this time,
motives to attach me to life, too powerful, and the only
fear is, that these selfish considerations will inspire me
with too much caution and fear of exposing myself; and
Martha surely would not wish that.
Arrived at the city, Mr. Berrian joined his troops to
those of Sant' Anna and Eschaverri. There was in the
united
army a party, and not a weak one, disposed to assign the
chief command to the American chief. He was so kind
as to consult me respecting the expedient course for him.
He told me at the same time, that such was the influence
of envy and national jealousy, that he thought he could
be more likely to the cause, and more likely to acquire
an influence that might be salutary to my father, in a
subordinate command. His views of course were mine.
There was an immediate canvass upon this point, and
conceded the propriety of his withdrawing his name,
as a candidate for the supreme command. There was
some question between Eschaverri and Sant' Anna. It
was peaceably settled, that the latter should have the
supreme command, and the two others coordinate
authority
.
When I saw them running to my beloved in every
difficulty, I thought with pride of the story of honest
Sancho
,
that settled the point of precedence at the Duke's
table. I saw that he who originated all the measures,
was the chief commander, whatever name he bore. In
the hour of perplexity and danger, the weak and
inefficient
commander in chief, naturally yielded to him,
whose appointment was under the sign-manual of nature.
And Mr. Berrian without the envy or responsibility of
the chief command, really originated every measure, and
his counsels eventually prevailed upon every point in
question.
If I were a man, and wore a sword and epaulets, I
should now have a glorious chance for describing the
ceremonial of the junction of these three chiefs on the
plains of Mexico. It was a proud and glorious sight,
and every measure was taken with the most perfect
union of feeling. The artillery pealed. The drums
rolled. The banners waved. The troops displayed,
and the cries of
Viva la Republica
, arose to the sky.
Even the horses, that bore this pageant of war, caught
the pride and enthusiasm of the moment. There is
something thrilling and awful, as I have felt, in the
acclamations
of the thousands of an army, when one
impulse
of feeling animates the whole mass. I felt the
truth of the adage, The voice of the people is the voice
of God! I admit, that as a woman, my heart beat
highest on seeing my beloved moving so gracefully on
his proud steed amidst waving plumes, fluttering
banners
,
presented swords, and all the pomp and
circumstance
of war, heightened by the inspiring notes of a
full band.
In continuation
.
Jesu Maria! I have been an hour on my knees in
thanksgivings, and yet I have not returned adequate
thanks. All doubt is over. They have passed the
dreaded act of confiscation. What care I. I should be
as happy as mortal can be, had I henceforward to earn
my bread by daily toil. I have not the folly to attempt
to paint the scene that I have just witnessed. What a
scene! My father and mother have arrived in camp.
My father was no longer the proud noble, the governor,
the heir of a descent of thirty generations. It was a
proscribed
father, stripped of all his honors, and of all his
immense possessions, his house converted into quarters
for soldiers, and himself and my mother obliged to fly
for their lives without a servant. It was so much the
more bitter, that all this cruelty was inflicted by one,
for whom my father would have sacrificed me and
every
thing. The order of nature was reversed, and
instead
of allowing me to fall on my knees, as I would, to
supplicate his pardon for my disobedience, he would
have humbled himself before me, and begged forgiveness
of me with the subdued humiliation of one, whose pride
and whose heart had both been broken. God, said
he, has punished me just in the point where I had
offended
.
He has made the Moloch, to whom I would
have offered up my dear and only daughter, the
instrument
of my correction. Old, infirm, a beggar, I would
demand pardon of Mr. Berrian on my knees. I threw
myself into his aged arms, and wept on his bosom.
My dear and venerated father, cried I, do I not
well know that mistaken love for me dictated all that
you have done? I never doubted for a moment that all
was done for love, and all is forgiven and forgotten. I
can now show you the extent of my love and duty. I
will make you feel and acknowledge, that wealth is not
necessary to happiness. What do I say? He will
overthrow their acts of iniquity, and restore you to your
wealth and honours. That cannot be, dear daughter,
he mournfully replied. I have committed myself with
all parties; and whichever of them ultimately prevails,
the insolence of success, and the rancor of triumphant
party, will effectually bar me from my possessions. I
shall never dare to look Mr. Berrian in the face. My
mother embraced me in her turn, and in our tears there
was no bitterness; for we had always had but one
mind upon these subjects.
As soon as we had gained calmness enough to enter
into these details, my father said, Don Pedro and
the father confessor returning in disgrace and
chagrin
to the city, related their reverses to the
Emperor
,
but never came near me. He redoubled his
follies
and cruelties, and his blind confidence in them.
Don Pedro avenging my misjudging partiality for him
on myself, and daspairing of ever gaining possession of
you, my daughter, to repay me for that guilty devotion
to him, which had gone such lengths to gratify his
wishes, procured an immediate decree of confiscation
against me, which was no sooner passed, than put in
execution
.
I had scarcely sufficient notice given me to
allow
me time to fly, and I was proscribed as a traitor. A
despatch of confiscation was sent to Durango. Your
mother
fled with me, and we have remained concealed
among the adherents of our house. As soon as we
heard of your arrival, we have come to implore
protection
of our enemies.
I might have observed that on my arrival here, I was
placed with the wife of one of the chiefs in a beautiful
tent, and in this I received my father and mother;
who here embraced the duea, the only one of their
numerous establishment, that now remained to them.
I left them with her, and went for my general, who was
engaged in another part of the camp in reading
overtures
from the Emperor. Bryan, who was prodigal of
the most respectful kindness to them, kept guard
before
the tent, until my return. I sent in a message to
the general. He came out. I put my arm
within
his, and in leading him to my quarters, prepared him
for the scene that was to follow. He was himself in this
scene, as in every other. He soon put my father at his
ease by a deportment just such as I could have wished
from him. His manner showed that he had estimated
my mother differently from my father, but that he now
saw nothing in him but the fallen noble, and the father
of Martha. He begged him to believe that the future
should evidence an entire oblivion of the past. He
pressed the offered cheek of my mother with his lips,
and she received his embrace as that of a child. You
have always been to me as a son, said she,  and if
you still wish it, you shall now be really so. To this
my father added, that matters were now so entirely
reversed, that Mr. Berrian could hardly be expected
now to desire an union with a poor unfortunate girl, who
had nothing to bring him but herself, and her helpless
parents. That, said he, is all I ever sought.
Present the next woman on the earth with one of the
Indies in each hand for a dower, and your daughter
portionless, and I would not hesitate a moment. That
was handsome in him, was it not? But why, he
continued
,
suppose she will be so? Not for my sake, or
hers, but for yours, and the comfort of your age, we
will have all these puppet arts of confiscation reversed.
We do not mean to sheathe the sword of patriotism and
justice, until you are reinstated in every tittle of your
possessions and honours, which have been so unjustly
wrested from you. I yielded to the exigencies of the
cause in every thing else, but for this, my heart tells
me that I ought to stand; and were there but my single
sword, I would not sheathe it, until that was obtained!
My father embraced him with tears in his eyes, and
answered with something of his former spirit; Why
have cruel circumstances ever estranged me from this
noble young man, whose title is worth a thousand times
all those that are written on parchment, and taken from
the office of the herald? I recognise, in all this, the
same man who has returned contumely by saving us,
who has been hitherto the prop of my family! Success
is in your eye, and follows your steps! I am cheered
with the hope that you will yet restore all! Forgive
the ingratitude of a doting old man, and take, if you
desire
it, all that I have now to give, my daughter! We
both fell on our knees before him. He joined our
hands. I see, said he, that you love each other.
I know that he is the soul of honor, and will be kind to
you when I am gone. I give up ambition, and only
hope to spend my old days peacefully with you, and to
expire in your arms. The angel of the convenant bless
you! Our mother likewise took our united hands, and
the tears trickled down her dear and venerable face,
as, in a voice scarcely articulate from excess of emotion,
she too, gave us a full consent, and implored blessings on
our heads.
How often have I said and thought, that my
happiness
could receive no addition, since I had been rescued
from the hands of Don Pedro. But, when I saw Mr.
Berrian my acknowledged and betrothed future husband
in my tent, my mother casting on him looks of affection,
and undoubting confidence, and my father, with
changed
and better estimate, looking to him as the future prop
of the family, and I pondering in my heart the kind
words, that he would prefer me to the fairest with India
in either hand, I felt that I could be happier than I had
ever yet been.
In the course of the conversation, it somehow came in
discussion, when I should really become the wife of the
Yankee general, and my father said the sooner the more
agreeable to him, and my mother consented in the same
way; and they looked to me to fix the time, and I said
from the Bible, that the general had fairly and twice
won me, such prize as I was, with his sword and his
bow, and that I might as well allow him the right of war
and conquest, as not. Then we all looked to him to
appoint
the day. And what do you think the cruel man
said? Why,  that he was probably the most impatient
of the three for the time, but that he was not now for the
first time, to learn how to control his wishes; and that
he had made a kind of vow or mental reservation, that
he would not ask so great an honor, until he could
render himself in some measure worthy of it, by
procuring
a reversal of the decree of confiscation, and a
restoration
of my father to his home and his honors. My
father and mother exchanged looks, as much as to say
Such is our son-in-law! I had a feeling on the subject
VOL. II. 21
too; but you know, I could not complain in words I
was obliged to admit even, that there was an honest
pride after what he knew had formerly been said on the
subject, in deferring to connect himself with the family,
until he had won the honor, by conferring benefits.
Besides I had told him that I neither expected, nor
wished
to be happier than I had been. There was one
comfort
too, in the new order of things. My father and
mother
were in perfect accordance with me, and agreed
that the name of Don Pedro, was as hateful to them as it
was to me. Moreover, there was no need of much of
the reserve of our former intercourse. We could see
each other without witnesses. He could spend every
moment with me, except those of sleep and occupation
with his duties. In fact, he lives almost in my tent.
He spends the greater part of the day with me, and in
the night he is constantly present in my dreams.
In continuation
.
Dearest Jacinta
,
Some in my case, and feeling as I do, would odiously
affect indifference and tranquillity and all that. But I
confess I am impatient with the tedious progress of these
miserable negotiations. The cities and the provinces
are all leaving the standard of the Emperor, and my
father's countenance brightens daily, for he too, has
become
a Patriot; and it is quite amusing to hear one of
the most ancient grandees of the Spanish monarchy,
talking about liberty and the rights of man, as if a thing
of very recent discovery. The Emperor has made the
Patriot general proposals, and the papers are all brought
to my future husband. I tremble even now, as I read
the hated name of the minister of war, signed at the
bottom
.
How everlastingly tedious are these miserable
politicians; and they will spin out the simplest trifle to a
volume. I have the satisfaction, however, to perceive
that the good man is as impatient and as much vexed at
this delay, as I am. He says nothing about it, and
sturdily
continues the air of self-control and the affectation
of philosophy. But I see by his manner that he will be
glad when all this business is settled. I am glad that it
vexes him. We love to see that others have no more
philosophy than ourselves. Why should I complain
we constantly pass the day together, and we chat like
old acquaintances. Instead of fighting the enemy with
guns and swords, we fight with proclamations and long
speeches. It is a hard thing to keep these stupid gen
erals from quarrelling among themselves. My general
is constantly throwing water on their fire. Sant' Ann
confessed to my father to-day, that but for the North
American general, they would all fall together by the
ears, and the cause would fail.
In continuation
.
Blessed be the Holy Virgin! Mexico is ours. I am
under my father's roof. The confiscation is reversed.
Mr. Berrian this morning brought my father a decree
of the National Cortes, assembled in Congress, which
reverses
all the late decrees of Iturbide, and restores my
father to all his fortunes, to his recent command at
durango
,
and to the presidency of that honorable body
He, Victoria, and the Conde de Serra may now be
considered
as at the head of affairs. Laura wishes me joy
with the best possible grace; but I clearly see a little
spice of envy. The day of days is fixed. My father
throws me gold by handfuls, and my poor head swims
with joy. When it was again put to me to name the
day, I almost found it in my heart to be revenged upon
him for deferring our marriage when he might have
named the day. But no. I respect the motive of his
forbearance, and I will play off none of these childish
airs.
I ought to go back and inform you in a word, how
these great events came about. Day before yesterday,
Iturbide sent out to the chiefs a full abdication of his
assumed
power, and immediately retired to his
country-house
.
Don Pedro and the father confessor wished to
fly with him. But some of the adherents of our house
collected a band of my father's friends and servants, and
had both the traitors arrested; and they are in the
calabozo
,
and their fate will probably depend on my father's
will. I have as little the inclination, as the necessary
information
and powers, to go into a history of intrigues, and
parties, and divisions, and scramble for places, in
pulling
down one order of things, and putting up another.
There are, no doubt, among the people some real
Patriots
.
But with the thousand scrambles, the only motive
for overturning and ejecting the present occupants of
place, is to fill the vacated places themselves.
Immediately
upon the abdication, a junta formed a provisional
government, and convoked a National Cortes. They
are ready to wink at one great deficiency in Mr.
Berrian
,
his not being a catholic. They offered him a
command
only subordinate to the commander in chief. But
equally in compliance with his own feelings and my
wishes, and those of his future father-in-law, he declined
it. He said that he had taken up arms not for himself,
but for the cause of man, and that having seen the
nation
restored to the full possession of its liberties, and
not having the honor to be a native of the country, he
wished to tender his resignation.
I was in the gallery with a crowd of the citizens when
he made this speech of resignation to the junta. It was
delivered with that noble simplicity that characterizes
every thing he does. My father presided at this
meeting
.
A majority of the members were his partizans,
and this speech, of course, was received with the loudest
plaudits and
vivas
, every one extolling the rare
example
of a victorious general, resigning his command to
the peaceful representatives of the people. A pension
for life and an extensive and beautiful estate in the
valley
of Mexico were voted him, and he retired amidst the
acclamations and waving of handkerchiefs, from the
galleries. Laura was differently affected, and I mistake
if her eyes were not filled with tears. The day of days
is the day after to-morrow. We are all sick of
revolutions
,
war, and shedding of blood. As soon as I am his
wife, we are to start for my father's government, and for
the shade of those venerable trees, and the shelter of
that noble mansion which I love so much better than
any other place. As soon as the Spring opens, we
journey
together to the United States, and he revisits the
place of his birth. I have studied no people or manners
but Spanish. He considers himself and me as citizens of
that country. No matter, to be sincere about it, even if
he were to visit the Hottentots; wherever he went, in
the language of the poet, eternal Eden would bloom
around. Independent, however, of that society which
would render me contented amidst the ice of Lapland;
I long to see and study that great, peaceful, and
flourishing
country, which gave him birth.
In continuation
.
Don Pedro and the father confessor were this day
brought from prison and placed before the junta. They
VOL. II. 21*
had the meanness most earnestly to supplicate the
interference
of Mr. Berrian, and attempted to cajole him with
eulogies upon his magnanimity. My father said that
the junta, in disposing of them, would be guided simply
by his wishes. He instantly expressed a wish that they
might be liberated, on the express condition that he
might never see them again. They were set at large.
Unhappy men! Retributive justice overtook them.
This capital is in a state of the most terrible anarchy.
Fifty thousand of the miserable populace have, in too
many instances, taken justice into their own hands.
Sometimes, it is true, they let fall the thunderbolt of their
wrath on the right heads; and sometimes they exercise
the indiscriminate destruction of wild beasts. These
bad men had, in some way, become peculiarly obnoxious
to the populace, and as they were liberated at the gate
of the palace where the junta were in session, some
factionist
gave the signal of marking them out for the fury
of the populace. They were literally torn in pieces. I
tremble even yet, and I pity them, much as they
deserved
their fate.
Mexico
,
Sept
. 1821.
Dearest Jacinta
,
This evening is to see me no longer Doa de Alvaro.
My hand trembles, and if the characters which I trace
are a little flurried, I hope you will pardon me, for you
have passed through the same ordeal. Let me tell you
something about these important arrangements. I well
remember and can produce your account of this same
business to me in three whole sheets. I will have more
conscience with you. First then, the Bishop of Mexico
is to solemnize the wedding. He is a venerable man,
dignified and unblameable in the discharge of his holy
functions, and has retained the confidence and respect
of all parties. He could never be prevailed on to take
any part in the usurpation of the Emperor. He has
always
been a friend of my father's, and is known to
incline
in his feelings towards the Patriots. Secondly, we
are to be publicly married in the church of `Nuestra
Senora de Guadaloupe,' my patroness, and Laura is to
be bridemaid. Poor little thing, her bosom beats almost
as mine! The day, too, is my birth-day! What a
singular
coincidence! Thirdly, my father being president
of the provincial junta, there is to be a general
illumination
.
Fourthly, immediately after my return to my
father's
house, Bryan is to be married to a pretty Irish
girl, whom he has found here in the city. Lastly, the
first and last wish of my duena's heart is to be gratified
in her being immediately after married to Matteo
Tonato, the stoutest man in my father's establishment,
and the bridegroom and the bride have charged
themselves with the expense of a
shanty
for the one
and a
casa
for the other. The whole is to conclude
with a splendid
tertulia
and
fandango
. I shall wish
all this matter in the Red sea.
I had almost forgotten the most important article yet,
my dress. The good man has been a little prying in
this article, and I have answered, You shall see, sir
all in good time, and I shall not look ugly neither. To
tell you the truth, he is not fond of jewels, or I would
blaze like the meridian sun. I have had a hundred and
fifty counsels upon this subject. My mother advised
gorgeous, flowered, and stiff silks, and Laura would have
me flash his eyes to blindness with diamonds. I will
smite him deeper than that. It is a plain, rich muslim
dress from the United States, and made by an
accomplished
mantuamaker after the best fashion of that
country
.
The compliment will be so much the more
delicate
,
as he supposes that I am to appear in a rich
Spanish
costume studded with jewels. He wears his
uniform
as a Patriot general. I have been looking in my
glass and trying to moderate the exultation and joy in
my countenance, to the shrinking timidity in which all
the romances tell us, the young bride goes to the altar.
Of one thing I am certain. No damsel in romance ever
suffered more from palpitation, be it terror, be it joy.
The very dressing maid perceived it. Jesu Maria,
said she, how your heart beats! Are you frightened?
I should not be in the least.
In continuation
.
Dearest Jacinta
,
It is all over. I will give you the details in their
order
.
Just as the sun was setting, my mother and
Laura
,
and two other distinguished young ladies of the city,
were assisted by the bridegroom into the state coach.
Thirty coaches of invited guests followed. The whole
was escorted by a select body of troops, lately under
the command of my husband. At the head of the
procession
was my father accompanied by the Conde de
Serra and the first officers of the Junta. Military
music, firing of cannon, and ringing of bells marked the
commencement of the procession. At the door of the
magnificent church we were received by the Bishop
and the priesthood of the city, all in their most solemn
robes of office. The church, was full to overflowing,
and adorned with evergreens, and covered quite to the
centre of its vaulted dome with that profusion of
splendid
flowers in which our city abounds. We walked on
flowers up to the altar. The bridegroom conducted
himself
with his usual dignity and calmness, and, after all, the
ceremony was so imposing, and the duties assumed of a
character so formidable, that I felt myself trembling and
faint, and should have conducted myself foolishly but for
the sustaining manner and countenance of my husband.
Amidst clouds of incense, the pious minister, dressed in
robes of the purest white, performed the solemn services
of this Sacrament, and we both pronounced our vows in
a firm and decided voice, after the manner of those who
had meditated the duties of this relation, and resolved to
be faithful to them. The moment the vows were
pronounced
,
we were literally covered with flowers, and
saluted with
vivas
from every quarter of the church.
My mother and father embraced and kissed me; and
my husband, you know, had now acquired the right to do
so. Laura too, kissed me, and whispered me, when
returned from the States, to bring her just such a
husband
,
as mine. The Bishop led me back through the
aisle of the church, and gave me his benediction at the
door. The organ was pealing its grand symphonies, a
I was assisted into my carriage. The city, as we drove
back, was one dazzling mass of illumination. On all
sides was the gaiety of fte, and I much fear of drunk
enness.
Every tree in my father's garden was hung with
variegated
lamps. A hogshead of
vino mezcal
was opened
for the Spanish populace, and a hogshead of
agua
ardiente
for the Irish, of whom there are multitudes in the
city; and Bryan, as my husband's favorite servant
was to have his way for this night; for he said, it was
but raisonable for him to be free, and to use his phrase
dead out for this night, if he was to be the slave of his
wife forever after. The parish priest solemnize
the united marriages of Bryan and his pretty Irish girl,
and the duena with her Herculean spouse. No people
that ever I have seen, enter into a festivity with such
entire
abandonment of joyousness, that excludes all thought
of the past and the future, as the populace of this city.
There were hundreds of them dancing by the light of
the illumination among the trees on the green turf. The
evening concluded with a splendid ball, at which were
present all the beauty and fashion of the city. It was
arranged by my parents and the Conde de Serra,
contrary
to all reason and rule, I am sure, and I believe
contrary to custom, that my husband should have the
first dance with Laura. My husband admits, that our
dances are infinitely more graceful than his; that ours is
the music of motion and expression, consisting rather in
beautiful movement, than in practised steps. I was
tormented
with downright jealousy, for the little Circe
seemed
to have condensed the sun-beams in her eyes, and her
movements were so graceful, buoyant, and joyous, that
the whole garden rung with acclamations; and as she
passed me in the dance, there was such roguish triumph
in her eyes, that I could almost have felt it in my heart
to put them out. The good man too, is one of those
who cannot move other than nobly and gracefully, and
when he passed me in the dance, I saw that he would
have chosen that I should have been the partner, and I
was satisfied. Before they retired, each one of the
company came up and wished me joy, and when Laura
left me, there was such a sweet and tender air of
sincerity
in her congratulations, that I really felt it in my heart
to wish her as good a husband.
You know all about our customs on such occasions.
My father is scrupulously observant of all the Spanish
rules of the olden time. I have only to say, that every
punctilio was observed on this occasion. The company
retired about midnight. Bryan was deputed on the part
of the Irish, to tender the civilities of the evening after
the Irish fashion. It is not necessary that I should
relate
exactly all that he said. He was evidently a little
mellow, and this, of course, created some little reserve
on my part. His perfect tact enlightened him in a
moment
into the cause of my reserve. The honest fellow
was affected to tears, partly, I suppose, of the bottle.
God Almighty bless your Ladyship, and his Honor,
said he, and be sure, I should have been drunk with
the pure joy, if I had not tasted a drop of the mountain
dew. Don't you forgive me now, honies, for being a
little
too glad? We both joined to quiet him, and stop
the sources of his tears, and to wish him joy of his
pretty
wife. The clouds not only passed, but he was
immediately
in high glee again. Now arn't you the
jewels? said he, as he turned with a caper to go away
It is said, that Bryan was king of the wake for that
night, that he sung gramachree and paddy whack,
and all his popular and national songs, until the morning
dawned in the east. The pleasantest circumstance
yet to be recorded. The Gazette, in detailing the
festivities
of the night, remarked that not a single accident
had occurred.
In continuation
.
Dearest Jacinta
,
To my great relief after a night of so much
fte
and
gaiety, we were entirely
en famille
in the morning. I
dreaded to see company, and could have chosen to spend
the day alone with my husband. But immediately
after
breakfast drove up the Conde's coach. A card was
handed me from Laura, requesting the pleasure of a
drive with me. I sent her for word, that, unless she was
disposed to give a place to my husband, she must
positively
excuse me. The message back was, that if he
chose to accompany me back, so much the better. He
consented to accompany me, and the drive was a
pleasant
one, except that occasionally when my husband
looked another way, Laura gave me looks so wickedly
and impertinently inquisitive, that I was obliged to
assume
matronly airs, look grave, and show her all the
difference in deportment, between a wife and a spinster.
But she is really a most forward child, and answered me
by looks of such merry defiance back again, that I see
nothing will cure her but to be able to put on the same
official dignity herself.
In the course of the drive she asked my husband if he
had ever visited the churches of the city? To which
he answered, that he had only seen the outside of them,
save one; and that was certainly the most beautiful
church I ever saw, and he gave me a look of gallant
kindness, which gave the remark a delightful
application
to me. She coloured a little at the reply, and
continued
,
that one, I must suppose, was the church of Our
Lady of Gaudaloupe. You would feel unplesantly to
confess, after you shall have left the city, that you had
not visited its churches, as they contain the chief display
of our city, both in architecture and painting. I will
have the pleasure of showing them to you. But, as
there are nearly sixty important ones, besides a greater
number of inferior ones, I begged her not to satiate him
with too great a feast, but only to show him the finest of
them. Accordingly, we drove to the rich and noble
church of La Incarnacion. From that, we inspected
one after another, the most noted churches of the city.
The church of San Domingo struck my husband very
much. I saw while he was viewing it, precisely the
same expression come over his countenance as I have
seen upon it, while he was looking upon San Puebla, and
the other sublime points of our scenery. I caught
myself
the thrill of feeling,which I knew was passing through
his frame. The interior of this church is imposing, and
inspires awe. In the different churches there are some
handsome paintings; and to me it appears, although I
am an European, that by far the handsomest are the
production
of native artists. There is certainly, as I have
seen among my father's tenants, a strong natural aptitude
to painting among the creoles of this country.
In the convent, attached to the church of
La Professa
we were shown the series of paintings which represent
the heart of man as possessed of the devil, and the seven
deadly sins. There is the usual form given to the devil,
and the mortal sins are represented by various ugly
animals
.
In the first painting they have full possession,
and occupy the centre of the heart. In the second the
devil and the animals appear to be losing ground, and
are crowded a little towards one extremity of the heart.
In the same proportion as they retire, a dove is seen
entering
.
In the next painting the empire of the heart is
shared between the dove, the devil and his animals, and
so on, until they are completely expelled, and the dove
has entire possession. This painting is celebrated in
this city as a model of taste and ingenuity in the science
of symbols: I looked at my husband as the fascinating
little Laura was playing the connoisseur, and admiring
it prodigiously, and expecting a corresponding
admiration
on his part. I saw a slight shrug, a
well-remembered
VOL. II. 22
mark of indifference, as dissatisfaction. She seemed
disappointed at his silence and asked him again, why he
did not admire a painting that every body considered as
a
chef-d'uvre
in its kind? He gaily answered, that
the animated paintings before him were too beautiful
and attractive to leave him taste or feeling to admire
any thing else. No, she replied, you do not put
me off with a compliment. I see, that you are not
pleased
with this painting, that every body admires. I am
told that your taste is very exact and severe. For my
part, I love to be pleased, and I never stop to inquire
why?
We had now finished the inspection of the churches,
and we went to sit in a pavilion in a garden, from which
was a most imposing view of the whole chain of
mountains
in the distance. In one of the churches, which
we had visited, we had waited during a most imposing
celebration of high mass, in which the rites of our
church had appeared in all their grandeur and
attraction
.
We are now seated, said Laura, in the cool
shade, and in view of San Puebla. There is here
before
us one of the sublimest objects in nature, after we
have seen all that our city has to boast of art,
consecrated
to the worship of the Divinity. I now wish to ask
your opinion. If I did not respect that opinion, I would
not ask it. You have been reared, and, I can discover,
religiously, as a protestant, or as we say, as a heretic.
You are married to the most amiable and lovely woman
in Mexico.(Why could the little witch wish to flatter
me?)You have seen all that is noble and imposing in
our worship and your union with this lady must dispose
you to think favorably of it. I am deemed in this
country
a free-thinker myself. Which worship do you
prefer
,
this, or your own? I grant you, I felt
unpleasantly
,
that she should have asked him this question at this
time and place, and in such a way, that he could not
wave it. This was his answer. I can hardly reply to
you, without making a speech, and I am too entirely
happy
to punish you, or myself, by such an infliction. The
whole taken together, if I must be frank, I much prefer
my own. Could I have done it without a compromise
of either principle or conscience, my interest and
inclination
would have led me to assume your profession.
I have felt the full force of a motive, a thousand times
more powerful in swaying the springs of action, a
motive
of such influence, when I have seen Martha raising
her eyes and folding her hands with such an expression
of celestial ardor and purity in her prayers and
observances
.
I have painfully regretted, that we were not
exactly
one in faith, as I trust we are indissoluble in
affection
.
It is my opinion that religion is the most solemn
of all realities, not at all dependent upon forms or shades
of opinion. I deem good people to be all of one
religion. I have seen enough of dispute about difference
of opinion, I have seen enough of pretension and
reliance
upon form, to be thoroughly disgusted with both.
There is enough that is common to every form of
Christian
faith and profession, to unite us in deeds of
beneficence
and feelings of charity. I admire, as I said to the
unfortunate father Josephus, I admire most of the
prayers and many of the forms of your worship. I have
seen and have admired the fidelity, and the exact and
impartial observance with which the minor priests of
your church administer the rites of your worship to
slaves, the ignorant and miserable
leperos
, the very
remnants
of humanity. I am well convinced, that the
ignorant
multitude of such a country as this, can have no
faith but an implicit one. Were it not for a few points
to which the more strenuous of your priests hold with
such perseverance, I could be a conscientious Catholic.
I have no hesitation in stating my precise objections.
Some of the dogmas of your church are not only
incredible
and impossible, but just as revolting to common
feeling
and sense, as to assert that twice two are five; not only
above reason, but absolutely contrary to it. Your
reading
on these points, I am aware, is so exact and
extensive
,
that you cannot but know the points to which I
refer
.
Neither, I admit, do my feelings go with the
multitude
of bowings, genuflections, shiftings of dress, the
gaudiness and finery of the sacerdotal costume, in short
a great part of the parade and pageantry of your church.
Simplicity, according to my notion, enters into every
kind of greatness and sublimity. How simple are all
the grand operations of the Divinity! By means how
admirably simple, are brought about the changes in the
visible universe! Can the Being who reared yonder
piles, and kindled the eternal fires under their snows,
who hears the music of the spheres, inaudible by any
other being, and who melts the snows of half the world
by an influence so silent and unostentatious, as the
gentle
actings of the suncan that Being, whose object it
seems to be, to achieve the greatest results with the least
ostentation, can He be pleased with a pageant so shifting
and tinselled? I do not avail myself of the thoughts or
similitudes that offer themselves to me, and you will
excuse
me for talking so plainly. I am aware how
respectful
and sacred all your associations may be, even with
this parade of rites and costume. Our worship is simple
and intellectual, and, as I think, nearer to these gran d
and simple actings of the Divinity as we see them in the
phenomena of nature. But I have seen so much of
profession
without reality in all forms, that I deem very
little
of the externals of any religion. It is the substance
of the thing and the being in earnest, that I respect. Of
the place where Martha shall worship, I shall always
think, in the phrase of the Bible, `Put off the shoe from
thy foot, for the place where she standeth is holy
ground.' Far from loving her the less, for this
difference
of opinion between us, the honor of our different
faiths, I trust, will operate upon us both, to strive to
evince which faith will inspire most tenderness,
forbearance
,
and fidelity. All the hope I entertain of
converting
her, and all the arts I mean to try, will be founded on
the purpose to show her what a kind, correct, and
undeviating
husband a protestant can be. What say you,
Jacinta? If the respective excellence of our faiths be
put upon this criterion, I am fully aware that his will
vanquish mine, and that I shall end by becoming a
heretic
.
But no. I have even heard him speak doubtfully
of sudden changes in these great and vital matters. I am
sure, that if I affected compliance from any other
motive than deep conviction, he would at once
detect
the hollowness of the motive, and respect me the
less. The Virgin preserve me from losing one tittle of
his respect.
Mexico,
Sept.
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I have received your kind letter and the beautiful
rosary accompanying it. I thank you a thousand times
for your kind wishes. I have no apprehension on the
score on which you warn me. I have no terrors of the
weather getting duller after honey moon, as you call it,
VOL. II. 22 *
I only fear that this more intimate view of things will
inspire an idolatry too blind, and that I shall only be
too much tempted to surrender my judgment and my
reason
to the keeping of another. When I loved him at a
distance, I knew but the half of his deserts. You must
see the manner, and the motive, that he carries with him
to the sanctuary of our privacy; you must walk and
ride with him, as I do; you must catch his eye as we
scramble together up the mountains, or listen to his
conversation
as we sail together on these sweet lakes; in
short you must find him, as I do most full, and rich, and
delightful in that dear spot, our home, to do full
justice
to his character. Let the Stoics preach that this
life never does, or can yield any thing, but satiety and
disappointment. I know better on experience. I could
live happily on the treasured recollection of the few days
we have had together, for a whole year. If I ever hear
foolish girls affecting to be witty again, as I have so
often
heard them before, in declaiming against the wedded
lifeby the way, you and I know, with how much
sincerity they do itI will say to them, Foolish girls, this
talk is all stuff. Be married to worthy men as soon as
possible. I have experienced more enjoyment in a day
since marriage, than in a year before. Indeed my
duena seems another sort of person, she is so happy; and
Bryan too, in his strange way, eulogizes matrimony,
and his red-cheeked and yellow-haired spouse blushes
her consent.
The only news of any importance, you have
undoubted
heard, that the Ex-Emperor has sailed with his whole
family for Italy, or, as is more generally believed, for
England. We have made most of our arrangements,
and shall start in a few days for Durango. We all are
impatient to be more private than we can be here.
Ftes
, balls,
tertulias
, and visiting occupy too much of
our time. I want the shade of those venerable
sycamores
,
and
catalpas
. I know of no one that I shall very
much regret leaving, but the Conde's family,
particularly
his daughter. Indeed, she talks of accompanying
us, and I am sure she would, if she could gain the
consent
of her father. Some of the ladies here have made
efforts, quite conspicuous, to intrigue with my husband.
Pretty things indeed! If my husband were not
invincibly
sober, I cannot but think, that, putting every thing
but appearance out of comparison, I should carry it
over these dizzened forms and swarthy faces.
CHAPTER VI.
Alma es del mundo, Amor, es mente,
Que buelve en alta, esplendida jornada
Del sol infatigable, luz sagrada,
Y en varios cercos todo el coro ardiente.
Quevedo
Consenting love
Sheds her own rosy garland on their heads.
Thomson.
Durango
,
Oct
. 1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I am so much the more delighted with the regularity
of your correspondence, as I know you have so many
important occupations. You still express curiosity to
hear from me, though I have passed that dread bourne
where all curiosity and interest generally cease. But I
feel that the energies of my affections, so far from having
become paralyzed by having passed this bourne, have
become more unchanging and more powerful. My
conscience
tells me it is a duty to write to you so long as
you feel any desire to hear from me.
Before we left the city, as it was very uncertain when
we should return to it, we went first to visit the estate, in
the valley acquired to my husband by the grant of the
junta. We found it to be a fine estate though it had
gone to waste from the troubles of the times. It was in
a sweet and retired place, and it was the first night I had
spent with him away from my father's house. Oh! a
woman well may leave father and mother, and cleave
to such a husband. I felt a greater pleasure too, from
being here, inasmuch as it was an estate belonging to
him. I know well, that the matter of fortune beyond what
is necessary for competence, makes nothing to either of
us. Still I felt a pleasure in showing him, that I had my
obligations to him on a score which the world thinks of
so much importance. After he had put every thing in
train for the restoration and improvement of this fine
place, we returned to the city, and leisurely visited all
its monuments, its natural and artificial curiosities. We
moralized over the ruins of Tenochtitlan and the fallen
empire of Montezuma. We reflected in sober sadness
how many lovers had waded through all their trials, as
we had done, before as yet the empire of this primitive
people had passed away. Their loves, their joys, the
houses, the city, the traces of their existence were all
past, and in future ages, others would come and
meditate upon the ruins of the present race, deeming as
little of us, as we did now of this extinct people. But, if
I gave a tear to the thought of this brief and frail tenure
of our present felicity, he kissed it away and bade me
hope the renewal of it in a region where there is no change,
and all evils was forgotten. We then visited that
prodigious
work the `
desagua
,' by which the city is
preserved
from inundation. We then visited San Puebla, and
Guanaxuato, and Queretaro, and in fact most of the
principal
towns of a country so delightful in climate, so
grand in scenery, so inexhaustible in resources, and yet,
as my husband says, abounding in misery, want, and
ignorance
,
swarming with beggars and
leperos
, famishing
amidst the exuberance of nature, merely from the
blighting influence of oppression. Who, said he, as he
expatiated on this theme, would not pour his best
blood to free such a great and beautiful country, to cause
her to rise in the strength of her resources, and burst the
chains of her oppressors and hurl them back in their
faces? In truth, the government of the Patriots is
constantly
acquiring strength. The peaceful labors of
agriculture
are resumed. The people look cheerful and full
of hope. The mines are beginning to be worked again.
My husband's estate, and my father's again begin to
yield us their accustomed revenues. My husband sees
in all this, the cheering and fostering influence of
Freedom
.
All that I can say is, that Freedom looks well to
me, and I very much fear slavery would seem the same.
I am happier than I can describe myself, and when one's
own heart dances with joy, we are apt to see things in a
favorable light all around us. I pity the poor beggars
and
leperos
that swarm round our carriage, and I give
them money, but I can hardly conceive that every body
is not happy. I well remember when I was almost as
strongly impressed, that every body was miserable. I
have read an amusing little book in English, entitled
Eyes and No Eyes, or the different manners in which
different people see the same things. Every journey,
every monument, every curiosity furnished us with a
theme of remark and investigation. We consulted the
books that treated the subject, and contained the thoughts
of those who had been there before us. I am
determined
to become an intellectual companion to my husband.
I will astonish him one day with the amount of my
acquisitions
.
My poor head aches with the efforts that I
make with this intent, during the few moments that I
have to myself.
Nothing could exceed the gaiety of all the persons of
our establishment, when it was announced to them that
we were ready to set out for Durango. We all equally
long for the repose of that place. The whole cavalcade
was composed of at least fifty persons. We were
escorted
on our way by a regiment of troops; altogether
we made a very respectable dust, and when we alighted
at a
hacienda
, like a swarm of locusts we devoured all
that was eatable about the establishment; but unlike
all that the people had been used to in the late times of
anarchy and trouble, we remembered to pay well. I am
surprised to see how soon, now that all impediments are
removed, my father has become deeply attached to his
son-in-law. While he imagines that he does every thing
of his own purpose and plan, in fact, he does every
thing from the counsels of this favored adviser. He
watches every movement of the dear man, and copies it.
He cannot endure to have him out of his sight; and the
time which my husband is obliged to spend away from me
in advising, and in arranging his affairs, is a great
annoyance
to me. Would you believe it? My father has
actually
got his grammar and dictionary, and is set down
to lessons from his son-in-law in English. I have to
endure
many a joke about the influence of this same
process
upon me. Oh! the blow was struck before he
began
to teach me English.
I cannot hope to interpret the charm of that welcome,
which my husband gave me to my own sweet and
secure
home in this place. It was here, away from that
great vortex of intrigue, wealth, and assassination at
Mexico, that I first felt that he was all to me. We have
wandered under these noble sycamores. We have been
to visit the poor English widow, under the shade of
whose trees he first confessed that he loved me. She
was happy, for her son was perfectly recovered, and we
gave them ample cause to remember us gratefully, for
we have put them in a way hereafter to be independent
on the score of fortune. My husband has inquired out
every person to whom he has heard that I have been
partial, and in some way, most consonant to their feelings
and interests, he has made them feel, that all, that were
once my friends, have now become his. We have
walked on the banks of the beautiful stream, now low
and brawling over pebbles, where he rescued me and
my mother from the torrent. I have seated myself in
the chair where he used to sit and read, and where
the blessed Virgin forgive meI have looked at him a
hundred times through the Venetian blinds, through
which I could see him unobserved.
We have had a visit to day from his former pupil and
admirer, Dorothea. She is somewhat untrained and wild
in the expression of her feelings, but is, after all, a very
good girl, and her unrequited affection for my husband,
and her tenderness and attention to him, when he was on
his way as a volunteer to Mexico, have very much
endeared
her to me. She congratulated me, in her rough
way, on my marriage; said she envied me, and had
loved
him sooner and more than I had. When my
husband
came in, a burning blush on her cheek gave
evidence
of her sincerity. She bent her head to receive
the salute, which the customs of our country require in
such cases. He was extremely polite to her and her
father, and gave strong demonstration, that he gratefully
remembered their former kindnesses. Dorothea has
wealth, and wishes to accompany us on our journey to
the United States. I find it would be sufficiently easy,
to enlist volunteers for that expedition. The only
difficulty
would be in making the proper selection. In
truth, I wish no one to accompany me, but my husband.
We expect to find out Wilhelmine Benvelt, and if I
should feel tempted to the slightest feeling of jealousy
towards any one, it would certainly be towards her. I
am sure that he was on the verge of loving her. Taken
all together, she is as unlike me, as possible, and yet
there are many points in which we agree, and those
the very points that would be likely to secure the
affections
of such a man as my husband. I know that he
thinks her the most interesting woman that he has seen,
one only excepted. Whenever he does not make that
exception, all peace will be at an end for me. Yet, if he
did not make that, the award of his judgment would be
given with so much equity and honor, that he would
leave me no ground to complain.
Here terminated the letters of Martha, and I repaired
to my fellow traveller, impatiently requesting him to
redeem
his promise that he would bring his adventures
from the point where his wife had left them, to the
present
time. I pressed him to be expeditious, for we were
drawing near the termination of our journey together,
and the mouth of Red river was already in view from
the Mississippi.
He resumed his details. `You see, sir,' said he,
`that in the eye of my wife I am a personage of no
small importance. I have nothing further to relate that
the most gross egotism could magnify to the shape of
adventure
.
In these days, a peaceable and well-bred man
may journey from Mexico to Boston without much
trouble, or any adventures, so that he has a good
carriage
and horses and plenty of money; and as we have
these, and make every previous arrangement that
experience
has admonished, or opulence can furnish, this
journey is only a long and tranquil migration from one
region to another. For the rest, we have been married
something more than three years, and we have a fine
boy, a happy union of Spanish and Yankee, with a very
fair complexion, and eyes and hair as black as a sloe,
and to my mind the exact image of my dear Martha.
The grand-parents dote on him, and will claim every
right to spoil him in their own way. The mother and
all the hangers-on say regularly, Dear boy, the exact
image of his papa. My wife spends no little time in
pointing out the traces of resemblance between us. I
have often smiled internally at the easy faith of other
parents in the unnatural precocity and smartness of their
first-born. But between us, I really think that our boy,
if he lives, will make an uncommon man. But little
more than two years old, he can already scold papa and
mamma in two languages, call himself `
bon garon
' in
French, and knock over the plates and cups, like a young
VOL. II. 23
lord. Indeed, Martha thinks him altogether the finest boy
within three leagues, and her countenance lowered, and
I discovered for the first time since we have been
married
,
that the serenity of her feelings was ruffled, just
before I left home, because a Creole lady from
Durango
,
who has read romances, and is something of a
Spanish
blue-stocking, observed, in reply to the customary
questions of Martha, as she was showing her the dear
boy, that she saw but very little difference in children
of two years old.
Of Martha I can say with entire truth, that I love her
now more heartily, than I did on the day when I led her
to the altar. We have distinguished no such period as
the honey-moon, and we have never had a word that
could properly be called dispute about religion, or in fact
about any thing else. Sir, I have been absent more than
five months, and have travelled more than a thousand
leagues. You can hardly imagine my impatience to be
at home. If I had wings, you would soon lose sight of
me in the air. I fancy that I can see my dear Martha
leading our boy under the noble sycamores, in front of our
mansion, her white robes fluttering in the wind, and she
looking impatiently in the direction of my return. May
she have been the charge of good Angels! Captain,
when shall we be at Alexandria? The answer was,
Perhaps in two days. Then in fourteen days
more, he impatiently added, if God will, I shall be at
home, and never, never will I leave it again without the
dear ones that I have left there. I too, said I, have
been absent from those, that I most love, seven long
months; and I left them a miserable invalid, expecting
never to return. I am, it may be, as impatient as you,
and the more so, as I am nearer home. Every traveller
in such a case has observed, that the attraction of affection,
like that of gravity, quadruples as it approaches the
centre of its desires. But your story yet runs in my
head. Your adventures have been quite out of the
common
way, and your present felicity seems to be still more
so. There is generally, so much grumbling among
married
people, that your case seems to be that of a black
swan. I should be glad to hear a little more about you.
I hope you will be good enough to tell me something
about your trip to our dear native New-England, that
we are so rapidly distancing every day. I will not
mind the excessive praises which you seem to levy as
a tax from all quarters. There are other good and
pretty fellows beside you, in the world. I, for instance,
am no small affair at my own home. I am very well
satisfied with my good old `lang syne' at home, but I am
absolutely in love with your wife. She seems beautiful,
without being vain, and affectionate to the last degree,
without being silky-milky. I only wonder, that you
whose means are so ample, did not take her with you.
She was anxious, he answered, to accompany me
as it was, and it was a business more painful, than I wish
to describe, that of parting with her. She will
accompany
me on this same trip next Spring. I understand
you, I answered, and I am told this thing, which
among agriculturists is rather coarsely expressed by
the technical phrase, `crossing the breed,' is
considered
a great improvement. I have seen it succeed
wonderfully
,
where an American has married a French
Creole wife. The children unite the desirable points of
character in both races. But to the point. I am
particularly
interested to hear something further about the
good Wilhelmine.
I am entirely willing, he rejoined, to inform you
what became of her. It is your own proper eulogy to
be interested in that charming girl, as good as she is
beautiful. But for me, most people consider the
interest
of such adventures as mine at an end the moment the
parties are fairly married; and ours is an old story of
that sort by three good long years. Yes, said I;
but there I have always differed from the rest. My
interest
is most intense at the point where that of others ends.
For example, I am more interested in your Martha and
you, under your sycamores at Durango, than in any
period
before you were married. If happiness on the earth
be not all a joke, a mere poet's reverie, it is only to be
found in the shades of domestic quiet and affection. I
have meditated, as a disinterested looker-on, all sides of
ambition, and distinction, and wealth, and pride,
and my feelings constantly return to the ark of
domestic affection, as the only place where happiness
can find rest for the sole of her foot.
To continue, then, said he; about the middle of
October, 1822, we escaped from the tears and embraces
of my wife's family, and started with Bryan and his wife
on horseback, and a female servant in the coach, for the
American frontier. It was during that charming season,
which we call Indian Summer. We had a prosperous
and delightful trip. We stopped to contemplate the
battle
field of Palos Blancos on our way to St. Antonio.
The
calabozo
where I was imprisoned, the terrible spot
where so many poor fellows underwent military
execution
,
and whither I was conducted expecting the same fate,
was contemplated with a solemn moral interest; and as I
related the sad story a couple of fine eyes glistened with
tears of sympathy.
Nothing happened worth mentioning, until we
arrived
at Natchitoches on Red river. It was the first
American town under an American government, that
Martha had ever seen: and although it is an odd mixture
itself of Spanish, French, and American, her black eyes
glistened with an intense curiosity, and she asked me a
thousand and one questions, and I felt a suitable pride
and interest as a kind of
cicerone
in letting her see that
I knew all about American men and things. She
already
admired the sample of these things which this town
offers, and reasoning from the less to the greater, I
enjoyed
in anticipation her delight when she should see the
fine towns as we ascended the rivers, and on the Atlantic
coast.
In this town I was recognised by many of my
compatriots
in our unfortunate attempt at revolutionizing
Texas. They received me with open arms. We told
over our old stories, and my classmate, to whom I was
much attached, who was now handsomely settled in this
place as a lawyer, and had been advanced to the
dignity
of judge, cracked some of our college jokes again.
We had some excellent Madeira, and we fought over
again the battle of Palos Blancos; and he related the
adventures
,
by which, from the very lowest part of
fortune's
wheel, where the issue of that battle had left him,
he had gradually risen to his present independence and
good fortune, and he cried as we arrived at the end of
the story and the wine
Forsan hc olim meminisse juvibit.
You may be sure we did not attribute the loss of that
battle to ourselves. In private he admired my wife
and her snug fortune, and seemed to be much of opinion
with Lord Byron in respect to the beauty of the finer
VOL II. 23*
Spanish ladies, and admitted, that one would be hardly
likely to meet a prettier woman on any May morning.
When we arrived on the Mississippi, she never ired
in admiring the beautiful and noble steam-boat that took
us in at the mouth of Red river. She was delighted
with the notion of so splendid and comfortable an hotel
floating so rapidly against the current of the Mississippi.
Then her curiosity started a thousand questions about
the machinery, and I answered them with much
seeming
understanding of the thing. I am her oracle, and I
wished to keep up the credit of the shrine; but the truth
is, in some of my positive answers about what I did not
understand, she actually caught me napping. But on
the whole, I had the pleasure of journeying with a
woman
,
to me at least, the prettiest in the world; fresh,
young, pleased with every thing, reared in a convent
of one of the most ancient nations in Europe, and here
examining the rising wonders of this new world, with the
eager curiosity of a child united with the intelligence of
one who had read much, and travelled extensively.
Natchez, Louisville, and still more Cincinnati, seemed to
her fine towns, and she could hardly comprehend that
they were little more that thirty years old. The number
of the river-craft and steam-boats, that were continually
passing us up and down, was a fresh source of
astonishment
.
You can imagine her surprise on entering the neat
and beautiful city of Baltimore with its noble public
edifices, and so totally unlike a Spanish town.
Philadelphia
and New-York increased this surprise, and more
than all, the multitudes of fine-looking and well-dressed
people of both sexes, that were threading the streets.
Accustomed as she had been to see such multitudes of
beggars and
leperos
, even in Mexico itself, she eagerly
inquired, where we contrived to dispose of the canaille
of our cities out of the way.
My own heart beat high when I entered my native
State, for we travelled from New-York to Boston by
land. We were constantly amused by the smartness
and the shrewdness of the answers to our questions by
the people at the toll gates and hotels, and as they were
collected indiscriminately, of all conditions, sexes, and
ages, Martha justly considered them as fair indexes of
the general distribution of intelligence and quickness
among the people. I was inwardly delighted and I
surmise
that she was not displeased, by a remark made
upon
her by a tall, awkward-looking fellow among the
hills on our road in the county of Worcester. He was
coming from his work at noon in his shirt sleeves, and
as he stood drinking at the pump, while our horses were
watering, he eyed Martha very attentively, and
observed
of her to his companion in an under tone, but
loud enough for us both to hear, By the blazes! John,
that gal's eyes would touch off gun-powder. Martha
remarked that a still finer compliment, of the same sort,
had been paid and with more justice to the bright eyes
of the Duchess of Devonshire, to which I answered, that
there was no probability that the Yankee had ever heard
of that, and that this remark must have been elicited by
the actual brightness which he saw.
At length from afar I pointed out to Martha the
spires of Boston, now considerably more numerous than
when I left it. As we were nearing this city, which
gives such magnificent promise from afar, I endeavoured
to prepare her for her reception at my father's, by
suitable
views of the plain and rustic, but plentiful and
independent
way of living in the family of a respectable
New-England farmer. To prepare for this visit
too, in another way, and to insure if possible my
welcome, I sent forward Bryan as a pioneer, with a good
round sum of dollars, and I had no fear that they would
be misspent; for the people every where within twenty
leagues of Boston, know wonderfully well, that there are
one hundred cents and no more in a dollar. The chief
object in this thing was, that, as we should make a good
round addition to my father's family, there might be
plenty of wine, turkies, and pies for a sociable visit of a
whole winter. I knew well too, that each one of my
brothers
would have a new suit in addition to his sunday
one. They are all, as my wife thinks me, good-looking
lads, as fresh and ruddy as full blown roses. I felt
anxious that my dear Martha should see my brothers
in their best, and my sisters in a full blaze of beauty.
My father had, as is the fashion in New-England, a fine
large shingle palace, painted white, and even the stone
wall I was aware when I came in sight of the house, would
be found white-washed. Bryan too, I had discovered,
knew how the land lay, and was disposed to give the
villagers a suitable idea of the dignity and importance
of my wife.
Meanwhile, to give time to this precursor to take
effect, we were enjoying for a couple of days the
hospitalities
of that charmingly hospitable place, Boston.
Democratic, however, as we are in New-England,
no little importance is attached, in that city, to
rank and family. My wife received every
attention
,
was caressed, admired, followed. It could
hardly be otherwise. But I could almost have
grieved
to discover that the points in her, which had
alone won my affection, had apparently stood her
in less stead than that she was the daughter of a
condesa
, and of the most ancient descent in Europe.
When we were entirely rested, and had made a
sufficient
number of purchases for presents for the old and
young children of my native village, we set out after
dinner
for that place. I really felt some singularly
refreshing
feelings, I think they must have been something of
what we call self-importance, as I started my fine
foreign
wife, and my grand equipage over Charlestown
bridge for my father's house. Thought I, How prettily
those good-natured soothsayers will be dumfounded,
who prophesied that I should come out at the little end
of the horn! How comfortably the young men will feel
who envied me the distinction of college-learning, and
who predicted that the pride of the lazy fellow would
have to come down after all! I might naturally
exercise
a little quiet and snug exultation in the faces of
those who foretold that I should lay my bones as a
beggar
in the forests of the West. These were but the
feelings
of a moment, the childish heritage of Adam. I
looked to the `pit from which I was dug, and the rock
from which I was hewn,' and I became humble. It is
hardly necessary to say, that Martha had found in
Boston
all her anticipations more than realized.
Describe the feelings if you can, of a man who has
been long and far away from such a home as mine, the
place of his birth; who has seen and suffered much, and
who returns to the view of the spires of his native
village
,
and the place `where heaves the turf in many a
mouldering heap,' in which his forefathers, his relatives,
and friends have found rest. Tears driven from their
deep fountains by confused and blended feelings filled
my eyes; and my dear Martha's eyes were filled from
sympathy. How far, I cried, I have wandered! How
much I have seen! How often I have been in danger!
More than once my grave seems to have been prepared
for me! And behold me here again, safe, sound, and
happy, with fortune beyond my most avaricious wish,
and the prettiest and best wife in the world. And yet,
in this peaceful and healthy place, where the greatest
exploit
has been a sleigh ride, and the farthest
peregrination
to Boston, how many in the full tide of youth and
promise have gone to their everlasting home; while I, from
the journeyings and dangers of so many thousand miles,
have returned to see the same sun-beams playing on the
gilded vane of yonder spire that did when I left it.
After
all, dear Martha, there is nothing permanent, nothing
important but religion, the grand point of relation
between
things changing and things perpetual, the grand
bond that unites this point of existence with eternity.
Let it be our grand aim, since God has given us such
ample means of enjoyment and of doing good, that our
happiness shall consist in rendering others happy.
Look, Martha, yonder are the pines whose moaning
tops, sounding with the east wind, first gave me the
mingled
feelings of awe, sublimity, and melancholy.
Yonder
is the sweet stream where in my boyhood I culled
flowers as I carelessly sauntered to church, and in which
I have bathed and angled a thousand times. I can now
distinguish the door of the church. Venerable old
pastor
!
Thy loud and earnest voice, which resounded
there for the sabbaths of more than half a century, is
still in death. Thy worn-out frame is removed from
the pulpit to the church-yard, and a young man, who
knows not Joseph, has arisen in his place. Feelings of
this sort, a thousand of which always rush upon a
traveller
on such a return, if he has a heart, continued to
crowd upon me, and I had more than once felt the
pressure
of Martha's lip on my cheek.
By this time I was recognised by my native
villagers
.
It was a perfect press. Nothing could equal
it,
parva componere magnis
, but the rush about La
Fayette
the past summer. In a few minutes I had the
satisfaction
of embracing my good father and mother, my
brothers and sisters, and finding all well. I paused
with astonishment in looking at my mother. I had been
gone nine years, and at the first look, she seemed nine
years younger than when I left her. On closer
inspection
I saw she wore false `everlastings,' false teeth,
every thing false but her maternal heart, and I felt in a
moment, that this was as true as the needle to the pole.
My father had attained the dizzy eminence of his
aspirations
.
He was a squire, a member of the General
Court, carried a large silver-headed cane, and wore a
long-tailed wig. My sisters, bless my heart, I should
not have known them! They had long Italian faces and
calash bonnets, and made my wife as pretty
dancing-school
bows as you could imagine. My brothers were
more unsophisticated, and received me with true Yankee
welcome. There was something of mincing and
restraint
for some time, and apparently a touch at
ceremony
.
But Martha, foreigner though she was, had
native
good sense and instinctive perception of what is right
every where. She soon put them all at their ease by a
joy so evidently sincere, by an affection for every thing
that appertained to me so manifest, that in half a day
she was a mother, sister, and daughter in the family.
There was the old sofa, the cat on one side and the dog
on the other, and my father in his corner and my mother in
hers, just as the thing used to be. What an air of
tranquillity
and repose prevailed in the old place! What a
train of recollections rushed upon me as the family came
in for evening prayer, and the magistrate laid aside his
dignity to fall on his knees before God!
I can hardly convey to you an image of our
happiness
.
As for Martha, they soon vibrated from the
extreme
of respect to the extreme of fondness! I had to
tell my story and my travels as often as poor Robinson
Crusoe and Friday. The people were willing to give
me a title, but they were not exactly agreed what it
should be. Some called me Don, some Duke, but the
greater part fairly dubbed me General. Then we had
invitations, and dinners, and parties without number.
All our relatives to the fifth degree hunted out the
pedigree
of our relationship. I pitied the poor generation of
turkies, for it was a hard business upon them. Mince
pies, and pumpkin pies were never seen in this village in
such abundance before. I heard Bryan telling a
brother
Irishman, that he had stuffed himself so long on
turkey
,
that he had often felt a strange inclination to
gobble
.
Ireland, honey, said he, may be a green
place, and a pleasant and good for parates, and New
Spain has plenty of lean beef and
mezcal
, but for cheap
rum and the vegetable called a turkey, there is no
country
,
honey, like yours.
The villagers, as might be expected, had soon
incredible
stories of my wealth and importance, and the
battles in which I had been engaged, and generally my
adventures and `hair-breadth 'scapes.' It was curious
to observe, according to the prevalent taste and feelings
of the manufacturer, according as his inventions were
the fruit of malignity or not, I had been a hero, a
redresser
of wrongs, and a deliverer of distressed damsels, or
a murderer, a buccaneer, a Robert Kidd, and all that.
There were some of the villagers and their daughters
who were not in habits of being familiarly admitted
among us, and who, of course, saw me through the least
favorable medium. They soon had a fine string of
teatable
stories, as how I had murdered, and split heads
asunder, and plundered peaceable Spanish families, and
carried off whole bars of gold. But I had the
satisfaction
which every honest man is sure to have in that
country soon or late, of being estimated somewhat
according
to my merits. The people there all possess, at
least, a most accurate sense of the real and practical
utility of dollars; and much as they look down upon all
assumption of every sort, they think none the less of a
man for being rich.
It was soon divulged that I purposed to spend part of
every year in the village, and that I intended to
purchase
me a handsome farm, and to build on it a first-rate
house of pure Chelmsford granitethat I meant to plant
fine orchards and woods, and drain meadows, and paint
my trees, and improve the breed of cattle, and rear
Merinos and Saxon sheep, and start a cotton factory,
and make a dyeing and bleaching establishment, and
build an Academy, and furnish a bell, and new dress
the pulpit, and give the militia company uniforms and
standards, and be put up for congress, &c. &c. For all
these expectations I received no little courtat least I
got as much as I wished.
Part of this homage to me was adventitious, I being
`a prophet in my own country.' But I had the
satisfaction
to see, that the respect for my dear Martha was sincere
VOL. II. 24
and real. The fresh air of the north freshened the tints
of the rose in her cheek and added new radience to the
brilliance of her eye. She was literally, a study among
my fellow town's-women. There was a visible
affectation
of Spanish costume and manner among them. The
young girls imitated her gowns and caps, and they even
tried to catch her air, walk, and manner. Ten times a day
she received billets, requesting the loan of some little
article
of dress, and then these billets were so respectful,
and expressed so much fear of being troublesome, that
there was no denying requests so sweetly urged.
She on her part, comprehended our manners at
once, and by a wise and regulated conformity won a
general tribute of good will. She regularly goes with
me to our worship and is solemn in her deportment
there. She is charmed with our singing and our young
minister, but returns to the religious strictness of
observance
in the forms of her own worship. By the
marriage
settlement, if we have sons, they are to be
educated
as protestants, and the daughters, more or less, as
catholics. The very strictness of her observance
shames me into something like a decent regard for my
own. With respect to our discipline and manners, she
has all the hearty admiration of an ancient Puritan. She
says, my dear Francis, I admire the cleverness and
industry of your young women. I reverence those
institutions
,
especially your free schools, which spread
intelligence
and emulation through the community. My
heart is affected with the kindness of your ordinances
in regard to the suffering and the poor, and with your
numerous and efficient charities. She was in raptures
at the first ball which she attended, and insisted that I
had brought her to a select community of beauties. She
reverences the unchanging order and peaceableness of
the people, and their aversion to revolution and blood.
We mean, as I said, to have a good house and
grounds at the north, and every season, when
circumstances
will permit, we propose to start in the Spring for
Natchitoches, and thence by the steam-boat to
Cincinnati
,
and as soon as the canal to the lakes is completed,
by that route to the lakes, and thence by the New-York
canal to Albany, and thence to Boston. I grant you it
is an immense journey. But we are very comfortable
on board the steam and canal boats, and we can read,
and write, and teach children, as well there, as
elsewhere
.
We generally have pleasant company, and, on
the whole, the time of this passage is not the most
unpleasant
of the year. In this way we mean to imitate
the birds of passage, and with them take our migrations
from the south to the north, and the reverse. We are
not so foolish as to expect no sorrow in our note,
though we mean to have no winter in our year.
Much as Martha is admired and beloved, and I could
not wish it more, yet we find human nature enough here
to take off the curse laid on those with whom there is no
fault found. We have for instance, in my father's
family
and she has been there as a kind of heir-loom ever
since I can remember, a maiden aunt, called Charity,
I suppose, `
ut lucus a non lucendo
.' She has striven
with time and against wearing spectacles, with a
womanly
fortitude, and has finally settled into a kind of
religious
blue-stocking. She reads all the religious
controversial
matter that is going, and discusses the subject
con amore
. She seems rather shy of Martha, and she,
discovering it, has redoubledher assiduities and attentions.
She gave her complete editions of Edwards, and
Hopkins
,
and Emmons, and the other divines of that school,
as a present, but all to no purpose. My aunt finally let
me into the causes of her coolness. Ah, nephew
Frank, said she, you have intermarried with the
Philistines, and I fear you will `eat of the fruit of your
own doings.' She is beautiful I grant you, and she looks
so winning and sweet upon me, that my sinful heart
tempts me to something of the same admiration that
others bestow upon her. But beauty, after all, is only
skin deep. Furthermore, it has been to many a trap
and a snare, and I doubt not, Frank, it was what carried
your carnal heart away. Beauty, like good works, is
but a filthy rag, unless it be sanctified. I asked her
the other day if she believed the `five points;' and
do you think that the poor thing did not admit that she
did not so much as know that there were `five points.' I
did hope that I might be the humble instrument of
opening
her eyes to the truth. But that is all gone by, and I
fear she will grope on in Popish darkness to the grave.
I discovered in the course of this conversation, too, that
she was little satisfied with our minister, who, she allows,
is a very exemplary man, but somewhat liberal in his
opinions.
The other rub was my own heritage, and from my
father, too. He was remonstrating with me on the folly
of ever returning to New Spain. He would have me sell
all there and fix myself permanently here; and he
expressed
so much reluctance at the idea of another
separation
,
that I invited him to share my journey with me,
and spend the next winter in Durango. Look you
here, son Frank, said he. I would not swap that
orchard
,
and the broad meadow, and the barn hill field for
all the lands in Mexico. As to your Dukes, and your
Condes, and all that stuff, see this long-tailed wig; I
would rather be a justice of the peace, and of the
sessions
,
in this town, and Massachusetts State, than to be
the first Lord in
Mahico
, as you call it.By the
way, I wonder if that's the pronunciation, that Morse
came to write it Mexico.No. No. Your wife is a
sweet woman, that's not to be disputed; and the Mahican
dollars are all very well in their place. But you will
never catch me beyond the great river Connecticut.
Although my father was not disposed to emigrate with
us, there were enough others, that were full willing; and
we could have carried back half the village, had we
chosen. I have a pretty sister called Temperance, who
did actually accompany us back, and Martha loves her
next after me, the boy, and her mother. It was a sad
day for the village when we returned. I would not
choose to tell how many tears were shed, and even
Martha's
bright eyes were red with weeping. Aunt Charity
herself yielded to the sinful motions of the flesh, and
kissed
her, and prayed for her conversion until we were out
of hearing.
One word about Wilhelmine to satisfy you on that
score, and this story is at an end. `
Sat prata biberunt
.'
I have now been at the north to see if our countryhouse
will be ready for us next Spring, and to attend to
Wilhelmine's
money affairs. I should have remarked to
you, but I did not wish to break the thread of discourse,
that on my trip with Martha to the north, we found
Wilhelmine
in the family of the Methodist minister. He
lived in a small village on the Mississippi, where he was
a local preacher. The steam-boat stopped there to
take in wood. I sent in my name and was instantly
admitted
.
At sight of me she sprang from her chair, and
VOL II. 24*
the transitions in her countenance from crimson to
deadly
pale, showed that she was deeply affected. She
heard that I was married, and her countenance soon
became
calm. There was the same lovely faceand there
sat on it a kind of pale, pensive, and indefinable
melancholy
.
As soon as I told her that Martha was on board
the boat and wished to see her, she instantly seized her
bonnet, and after the ordinary ceremonies of civility to
the family, she accompanied me on board the boat. I
felt happy to see these lovely women exchange all the
tokens of a most cordial regard, although cach knew
how I had stood in the affections of the other, and my
wife had been informed that Wilhelmine had had the
first offer of my hand. She related to us how she had
passed her time since she had left me. It was a scene
of sad and tiresome uniformity. Disappointed in the
warmest affections of the heart, and that heart peculiarly
constituted to receive the purest impressions of religion,
it was in a state exactly fitted for the moulding of such
a man as he was, with whom she sojourned. With
religion
always in his mouth, and enough of morals and
strictness to be always respectable; full of long and
reiterated observances, and apparently always having, as
his phrase was, the world under his feet; aiming always,
too, in his religious exercises at the feelings, placing
much dependence upon frames of mind, and considering
the exaltation or the depression of feeling, as the
graduated
marks of nearness to God, or distance from him, it
was no wonder that he gained an increased hold upon
the sensitive and thoughtful nature of his fair associate.
There was something imposing, too, in this assumed
austerity
of a young and handsome man, something sublime
in this apparent conquest of all earthly affections.
Wilhelmine
became a regular attendant upon their class
meetings. She made, indeed, she confessed, a poor hand
at relating her experiences. But some considerate
sister
in the meeting was always ready to eke it out with
something of her own. She discovered in the end, that
she had always been in training, always under an
invisible
and unobserved inspection. She admired, as
she said, the strictness of observance in his family.
But her native taste and tact always rose against all the
cant of their sect, the nasal twang, and the uproar, and
riot of their worship, and the outrage upon the king's
English, and taste, and common sense in many of their
performances. She thought their ardour, their
devotedness
to their cause, the tie of kind and fraternal feeling
towards each other, which binds them together with an
`
espril du corps
,' and which is so little like the cold
selfishness
of other denominations in their intercourse
together
,
worthy of all imitation, and all praise.
In this way, without any particular affection for this
man, she was in a fair train to become his wife. He had
offered himself, and in her lonely condition she painfully
felt the want of a protector,and in her state of mind she
probably
thought one good man would do as well as another.
Unhappily for him, a scheme of deep contrivance, and a
plot to bring this about, admirably sustained, was
defeated
by one of those accidents by which Heaven seems to
delight to frustrate the deepest laid plans of human
wisdom. A letter sent by the minister to his sister, who
was abroad on a visit, was lost by a little black boy
who did errands for the family. He was carrying this
letter and was overtaken by a thunder-storm. He was
frightened at the storm and lost the letter; and to avoid
the whipping generally consequent upon such an act,
he declared that he had put the letter in the post-office, as
he was charged. It was dropped, as it happened, in
a grove through which Wilhelmine was accustomed to
take a daily walk. She saw the letter lying on the
ground, and recognised the handwriting of her host and
admirer. It had been wet in the storm, and the wind
in driving it against the bushes had broken it open.
Wilhelmine took it up, and her name struck her as the
first word that she saw in it. Some vague suspicion that
she was practised upon, stimulated her curiosity to read,
and as it was from her future husband to her sister, she
felt justified in availing herself of this unsought
opportunity
of entering into their secret thoughts. Such a
disgusting scene of palpable contrivance between them
to bring about the union, disclosed itself, feelings so
basely
mercenary, such curious replies to the sister, who
seems in a letter to which this was an answer, to have
been stipulating, and rather disposed to complain about
her share of the dividend in the concern, that she tore
the letter in pieces and indignantly broke off the
negotiation
,
and told the gentleman she had changed her
mind. Nothing could exceed his disappointment and even
exasperation. From that time she had suffered every
thing, had been hinted at, and talked at, and had endured
every sort of persecution. They had even resorted to
the despicable revenge of defaming her with the villagers,
and she had been seeking for a change of place when
we arrived. Dear Martha, said she, I hope you
will allow me to accompany you? Martha told her
it was the very thing she intended to propose. We sent
for her trunks immediately. We called for her bill, and
when sent, we doubled the pay, but still they sent her
away with deep murmurs and denunciations of the wrath
of Heaven, which threw a gloom over her countenance
long after we were under way. I told her that it was
well for us all that there is a higher and more equitable
tribunal than mere human opinion.
She went on with us, loving and beloved; and
Martha
regards her as another sister. In my native village
I have observed the old minister was dead, and a young
one settled in his place. I considered him an exemplary,
amiable, and accomplished man. Wilhelmine was
received
in my father's family as a child. The minister
saw her there, and loved her at first sight. He made
his offer through me, and she in making her decision,
consulted my wife and me, acknowledging that she
hardly
thought that she should love him with that ardor
and romanticity, that some ladies consider necessary to
marriage; but that she thought him a serious man, and a
gentleman, and liked him very well, and would be
guided
in her answer exactly by our opinions. My wife
and I were unanimous for him. I waited on him with
the decision. Poor fellow! He is a nervous man, and
loves with all his might, and I could see that he thrilled
with the agony of apprehension and suspense to the
deepest nerve of his frame. I had once sat on that gridiron
myself, and had a suitable fellow feeling. He was not
long in suspense. His rapture of course, was
proportioned
to his doubts and fears. We saw them married, and
happy; and he has secured a most amiable wife and an
independent fortune, and we a most delightful appendage
to our society when we reside in the village.'
I have only to add, that when I parted from this
amiable man hurrying back to his Martha with the
eagerness and impatience of love, my fancy ran on to
sketching his meeting with his family in Durango. I
was verging towards something like envy at the idea of
the rare felicity that seemed to have fallen to his lot.
But on the whole, I remembered how soon the great
leveller, Death, will set all these things on a footing of
equality, and every emotion of that sort died away. I
returned to the retirement and obscurity of my own
family, blessing God, that he had once more restored
me to them in peace.
THE END.Sir
,
I have wept over the ruin of the amiable
family
,
with whom you fled to the mountains, victims of a
sympathy, for which the subjects of it do not thank you.
I have a kind of right in what remains of the family, for
Wilhelmine has been my companion, and my fixed friend, and
she was very amiable and good. Now, that her father and
sisters are dead, I feel it to be a duty due to her, to claim,
that you now either marry her, or send the poor forlorn
girl to me. However you may have thought before, you
must surely feel now, that she can no longer reside with
you, as formerly. I will receive, cherish, and comfort her,
will ask no questions, and will answer for her safety. You
cannot mistake your duty, nor my right to this kind of
interference. Present her my love and condolence, and
show her this.My Dearest Jacinta
,
Mexico
,
Feb.
1822.
I informed you in my last, of my arrival here from
Durango. My father was in a continual fret of
impatience
,
lest we should not arrive in season, to anticipate
the decree of confiscation. That terrible word
confiscation
!
There is nothing on earth I hate like Don Pedro,
and the worst name I can call him, is
Confiscation
. I am
wholly unable to conceive how, or why old men should
become so intensely fond of money, about the time that
they cease to be able to make any use of it. I believe,
he loves me, as the next best thing to money, and the
power he has lost, As to my dear, good mother, he may
have loved her once; but that is a thing quite gone by.
Do you begin to love your husband less, than you did at
first, Jacinta? More than once, on the way, he looked
sufficiently sternly upon me, reminding me frequently,
that if I had not been a perverse and disobedient child, I
should have been, at this time, lady of the minister of war,
and he, perhaps, prime minister! All would have been
safe, and I in a fair way to ascend the topmost round in the
ladder of eminence. I have found the advantage of
keeping up the fair ascendency that I have won, when
this hated subject is discussed. So I told him, that he
must have singular notions of the power of the said
minister
,
to communicate honor, for that he well knew, that he
was a coward, a liar, and an assassin; and I know not, if
I added other epithets; but I had plenty more in my
thoughts, and told him, that if it would comfort him to
have me die, I was ready to gratify him, but not in that
way. Upon the word, I had to encounter a long and
bitter
philippic, by way of comfortable even ng domestic
confabulation
.
He rung upon the old changes, the folly and
idle romanticity of foolish girls, and the absolute necessity
of wealth, to any thing like comfortable, or respectable
existence, and that one week's endurance of real poverty,
genuine love, and a cottage, would restore my brain to
VOL. II. 16
common sense, and bring me to beg, as a boon, the
favor
,
which I was now, in the wildness of folly, casting
from me. Then it was easy to digress to that dear
young man, and to say, that since that ruinous
acquaintance
,
all other men were liars, assassins, and all that
My mother, good woman, as the conversation grew
sometimes a little warm, put in a kind of neutral
interpolation
,
partaking equally of assent and dissent,
attempting
to smooth down my father's brow, and remind me of
the rights of paternity. Between apprehensions from
Indians, patriots, robbers and Royalists, for we seem to
be equally obnoxious to all, and this last and most
horrid evil of all, confiscation, I had but an
uncomfortable
time to the city. I had travelled the same journey
before, and had seen and felt the grand and beautiful
scenery. At this time, my heart was too heavy, and too
painfully occupied for me to have any eyes for nature.
Sometimes, a full sense of the claims of a father upon
his child came over me. I saw the real and corroding
gloom on his brow, the dejection of age, the sinking of
nature, the actual loss of place and power, and the
contemplated
loss of fortune all pressing upon him at the
same time. The silent paleness of his cheek upbraided
me, I said to myself, Why not conform to the wishes of
that dear and venerated being, thy father? Why not
marry this minister of war, and hate him afterwards,
as so many other wives are said to do? A husband is
but a husband, after all, and every one says, that in a
few months, it is all one thing. It would be so
delightful
to unbend that father's brow, remove these
terrors
of confiscation, and fill his aged heart with
grattude
and joy. Instantly as the thought arose, such
feelings
of repulsion and disgust on the one hand, and on the
other such a  Well, I found that I was not good girl
enough for the sacrifice, and I begged him to ask me to
swallow boiling water, or poison, and see if I was not an
obedient child. Swallow a fiddle! said he; you are
very ready to do any thing that I wish you to avoid
that I do not doubt. This little sample will give you
some idea of the standing of our thermometer of family
comfort, during this long journey.
We arrived safely at the imperial city, and I saw his
Excellency, my tormentor, the same tawny, grim figure,
more ugly and repulsive in his exaltation than ever, but
still rolling his dull, but terrible eyes of love at me, and
as full of the same nauseous protestations as ever. I had
promised my father, in good faith, to do every thing in
my power, in the way of civility to this man, that would
tend to ward off the terrible confiscation; so that he
would consent to my plan, to save time. So I threw into
my manner of receiving him as much civility as I could
command, as a sop to Cerberus. And then, how pleased
he was, even to childish delight! The vanity of any
other
woman would have been gratified, to see him, to whom
every body else cringed, as the Indians are said to do
to the Evil One himself, in return living only in my
smiles. I must believe, the odious being loves me. How
earnestly I looked round among the ten thousand new
faces, to see if my beloved was not among them. If
there be any thing like mutual feeling, he will be here,
and I shall see him. Wilhelmine was a sweet girl, and
she was always with him. And I can easily see, that the
present and visible face has the best chance. I wish he
had had my picture. But if he thinks no more of me,
why should I think of him?
We have, as you know, one of the noblest houses in
the city, und suitably furnished. I was presented to the
emperor, as the elected of the heart of his favorite. The
palace was rather gaudy than grand, and there were
such swarms of whiskered troops along the staircase
and the antechambers, and at the levee,and every where
so many hundreds of cringing expectants, with meanness,
submission, supplication, supplanting, ill-concealed
malice
,
treachery, and disappointment on their brow. And
what an emperor! With a person half German, half
Spanish, the everlasting grin of deceitful and simpering
apparent good nature on his face, where,not withstanding
all his efforts to counterfeit dignity, licentiousness and low
breeding are indelibly stamped, and with a head as well
moulded for intelligence as a negro's,such was the
emperor
.
The empress, the empress-mother, and all the
canaille of the imperial family, with their fine calico
mantillas, their pearls and diamonds, and sweetening
their imperial breaths with cigars, were all birds of the
same feather.
I was treated with great favor and distinction by this
emperor, who had really a bright complexion, almost
like that of my beloved. He condescended to tell me
that he took a double interest in me, the one on the
score of my personal merit and beauty, and the other,
because he knew me to be so dear to his friend, the
minister
of war. In the first ball, which I attended, I had
the superlative honour to lead down the dance with
majesty
itself, and for the remainder of the evening, I was
confined, by terms of treaty with my father, to the
detestable
Don Pedro. Such a show of fine things! Such
a glitter of jewels, and blaze of diamonds! I assure you,
that by candle light, and in the magnificent saloon of the
palace, it was a spectacle sufficiently imposing to turn a
young girl's head. It excelled the court of Ferdinand,
at least in point of glitter. There is a curious
sensation
,
in being associated with a man, to whom every body
does homage, and whose eye is the source of favor, of
life, and death, even if we know at the same time, that
this pageant, of such terrible energy from circumstances,
is intrinsically weak and worthless. There was a
thrilling
sensation from the
vivas
, when we had finished the
dance.
When you come to anaylze this pageant, and
contemplate
it a little nearer and more in detail, all the
splendor
vanishes, and you see the whole show in its intrinsic
meanness and deformity. The men were, for the most
part, swarthy, ugly, savage, and even ignorant looking
beings, and the women yellow, awkward, and less
informed
than the men. There were some brilliant
exceptions
(myself for instance) who seemed to have collected
these frights about them, only to show themselves to
more advantage by contrast. Among these was the
beautiful and accomplished Condesa de Serrea, fair,
fresh, and blooming, with content and satisfaction on her
polished brow. She is a Hebe, yet has six children, all
beautiful. Laura, the eldest, is no more than thirteen,
yet smart, accomplished, and piquant, though not highly
beautiful. In conversing with her, you have the
peculiar
interest of talking with one so
petite
and infantine,
that you feel the ease of conversing with a child.
Perhaps
at the moment, while you are indulging this
carelessness
,
she flashes upon you with the grace and wit of
an accomplished young lady, and the intelligence,
maturity
,
and seeming experience of age. She has one of
those heads, that, according to the hackneyed phrase, is
older than the body on which it is placed. I have
become
16*
much acquainted with her, and she would have my
secrets. She gave me much grave instruction in
relation
to my case, and she too, has discovered, that she
has a heart. She bids me be cautious, how I allow my
hero to appear on the Mexican theatre, for that I have
given her such an estimate of him, that she shall be
tempted to try a hand to supplant me. There is
something
in this gay, infantine, spirited old woman, in the
person of a child, that I cannot but love. Her family,
you know, is one of the most distinguished in the new
world. The Conde enjoys the highest possible
consideration
,
and in fact his immense influence turns the
balance
between the hundred contending factions here. He
is too simple in his manners, too much informed, too
intrinsically
noble, to be in favour with the emperor, and
Iturbide both dreads and hates him; and he owes his
safety only to the circumstance, that the emperor dares
not touch him. My tormentor, too, hates him with the
ancient grudge of bad to good, and, forsooth, stigmatizes
him with the name, republican. Would you believe it,
(but this in your earyou must not lisp it to your husband
for your life) I am something more than half a patriot
myself. Finding  a patriot, and the Conde de
Serrea
a patriot, and Iturbide and his minister of war
what they are, who would not be a patriot?
We have imperial presentations, fire works, shows,
gardens, promenades, drives, the theatre, the churches,
religious festivals, balls, fandangoes,
tertulias
, bull-fights
by the way I never see them,and a beau, and that
beau his Excellency, who hangs to me, like an evil
conscience
;
and we have what my dear Francis used so to
admire,the very writing of his name thrills my whole
frame,we have mountains, snowy mountains, and
sweet lakes, sleeping in their vallies, and we have San
Puebla cherishing, as I do, fires under his snows, a
beautiful
nature, a populous and splendid city, daily reviews
of troops, assemblies in the gardens and the alameda, and
an air so soft, so inspiring languishment and love,
and feeling as bland as cream. Yet I want
something
.
I want all. I need the presence of him, who
makes me feel that I have a heart; him, whose manner
of doing a good and a generous action makes me
perceive
that man can be noble, and like God; him, whose
glance upon these mountains caused my eye to kindle with
the contagious enthusiasm; him, whose voice and manner
inspired within me high, and I might almost dare to say,
holy, thoughts. In short, away from him, I drag to these
scenes of the amusement of others, a bodythey tell
me, it is well enough formed; but it wants a soul. I
feel the bland and delicious atmosphere. I look at the
mountains, pouring out columns of smoke, from under
their everlasting snows. I contemplate the most
beautiful
and rich valley in the world. I hear the foolish
people
,
who have nothing else to say, talk of all this, as they
do of the weather, and say How fine this is! I stupidly
echo the remark, How fine this is! In short, I have
little
reason to hope I shall ever see him again, and I am
equally incapable of enjoying nature or myself.Mexico
,
Feb.
1822.
DEAREST JACINTA,
Our Lady of the Pillar preserve us! I have seen him
again, and my heart beats even now so loud, that it
disturbs
my thoughts, and my pen. I never needed a
second
look to assure me that it was the very man. I had
been driven to the alameda, with our old duena, who
was ill, and in company with my daily tormentor. The
carriage windows were drawn up on account of the air.
He was walking in the streets, and an Irishman,
formerly
a servant of my father's, was walking behind him.
How well I remember the calm and lofty port, the
countenance so animated, benevolent, and mild! I gave
a half shriek, before I recollected myself; and then it
was too late, for my countenance told the tale of what I
had seen. His prying and malignant eye soon
discovered
in the group the person that had arrested mine.
He expressed ironical regret at the cause of my alarm,
and muttered something implying that he would
not have such terrible objects in the way, to annoy me.
I gave him a look that I trust he understood, and told
him that to filial regard to my father, he must be sensible
he owed all my endurance of his presence. I know, I
cried, that you are equally cowardly and vindictive.
But, venture to touch a hair of his head, and I will move
heaven and earth, until an avenger of his cause shall be
found. Not that I have or expect ever to have any
personal
interest in his preservation beyond the common
interest
,
which all ought to have in preserving the virtuous
and the good. In this country of distraction and crime,
we ought to preserve at least one good person. If you
really wish endurance from me, much more, if you
expect kindness, expect it only from using moderation
and forbearance towards him. Make no use of your bad
power towards him, and in the same proportion, you
will be sure of my taking a less active part in his favour.
If you would promise me with a pledge, on which I
might rely, that you would avail yourself of your
influence
to protect him, I should be willing to promise in my
turn, never to see him again.
He promised, (but there was a sneer on his
countenance
,)
that the intense interest, which I took in his
welfare
,
should be his pledge and his guaranty, and that
he would not molest him, or allow, as far as his influence
extended, that others should. He intimated, that if the
event so desired by my parents, the emperor, and
himself
,
could take place, he would not only protect, but
charge himself with the promotion of the young man. I
thanked him for his kind intentions towards him, and the
honor he intended me, but assured him, that if the
promotion
of the man in question depended upon that issue,
much as I wished it, it was likely to be slow in taking
place. The conversation here droppedbut I little
heeded the promise he made, not to molest him, although
in my eagerness to shield him from danger, I would have
made almost any engagement, to soothe this bad man.
Though I had little confidence in him, I felt somewhat
tranquillized by what he had said, and immediately put
every agent in my power in operation, to find where he
was. I soon discovered that he was at the Sociedad
Grande; and since then, what think you is my chief
amusement
?
He has an Irish servant, Bryan, who used
to live with my father, who is shrewd, faithful, and
devoted
to me, next to his master. This man finds some
moment every day, in which he visits our family. He
repeats to me all that his master says, does, and even
thinks. Bryan assumes, on oecasion, to divine his
master's
thoughts, when he is silent. You may be sure they
are all about me. I well know that all this is
moonshine
,
but I take the same kind of visionary satisfaction
in it, that people do in having their fortunes told.
Bryan
promises first by his guardian saint, never to disclose
a word of all this to his master. I meet him in
company
with our old duea, who has a fondness for the Irish
lad, and every day he opens a new budget for me. He
even shows me, and he has a most wonderful talent for
imitating countenance, how his master looks when he
thinks of me. He assures me, that in consequence of
my intimation of danger, his master always goes armed,
and takes him with him, and that he particularly avoids
evening walks, so that he can be in little danger from my
admirer, except he bring him to a mock trial and legal
assassination. My apprehensions for his safety are much
moderated. Meanwhile the Conde de Serrea, who is a
naturalist, a chymist, and a philosopher, and engaged in
extensive foreign and domestic correspondence, and is
moreover suspected of having a Patriot party in this
empire at his disposal, wants a private secretary. Mr.
Berrian, among his other qualifications, is a profound
scholar, to my taste a doctor of all sciences, acquainted
with many languages, in short, to me a great Apollo.
It occurred to me in a moment, that this was the very
man the Conde wanted. Under his protection, I should
feel perfectly secure about him. They dare not touch
either
the Conde or his friends. It is a family truly
noble
.
They have a splendid library, a gallery of
paintings
,
cabinets of natural curiosities, and all that; in fact
it is just the place that I could have wished for him. So I
introduced myself to the Condesa, his lady, and I told
her all about this wonderful young man. I am sure I
did not undervalue him, for she had all the while a
meaning
smile, and occasionally added, Really! surprising!
is it so! he is an astonishing man, sure enough! To be
perfectly frank, I let her into the whole secret. I was
deeply affected, as I did it. She kissed me, and gave a
tear to my feelings and my story, and promised me, that
she would speak of the matter to her husband. Laura,
the little which, had heard the whole. I was half
fearful
of her, for she looked wondrous knowing and
expressed
a great curiosity to see, as she said, this eighth
wonder
of the world. I hope, even if I dared flatter myself
that I shall ever have any nearer relations with him, that
I should not be so foolish and unjust, as to be jealous
He has a look that indicates him unshaken as the hills
But then, they say all men are vain. Laura has a
prodigious
name, and is more pretty and piquant than a
mere beauty. The man must be a Phnix, who could
stand her fascinations, if she chose to coquet with him.
I trust, however, to her pride; for, young as she is, that
feeling too has gained a full development. I trust to
the natural barriers and impossibilities of the case. I
trust to his steadiness,and I am sure he loves me. More
than all, I said, in this family he will be improving,
he will be safe and happy, and I will not be so selfish as
to have a thought beyond that. He was invited to
attend
this meeting of Patriots, over which the Conde and
Victoria preside, and had the good fortune greatly to
distinguish himself in the debates. In fact, if he took
any part, he would not do otherwise. The Conde
offered
him this place of secretary. He accepted the offer,
and has been in the discharge of its duties for some
days. The family judge of him, as I thought they
would. The Condesa, while pronouncing his eulogy,
sportively tells her husband, that it was a dangerous
experiment
,
to bring such a fascinating man into his family.
Laura puts up her pretty lip, and appears not to hear,
when in presence of her parents; but when she speaks
of him to me in private, she actually blushes, and
manifests
a sentiment in common with all that see him.
Where, and what is the charm? Surely, it is not
beauty
of person alone. For me, I think it a look of mind,
of kindness, of fearless steadiness in the truth and the
right, of that noble moral intrepidity, which shows that
he would do justice, if the heavens were falling over his
head. I know not, that I trace the feeling to right
causes. But that he produces feelings of this sort in
every one who comes in his way, that I feel to my cost.
In continuation
.
I have been with him. We took a walk in the
beautiful
garden of the Conde's with Laura. My heart was
beginning
to expand with the highest consciousness of joy,
and Laura was chattering away to him in her
customary
fashion, when what bird of evil omen should light
down upon us, but Don Pedro. Both the men started,
as though they had seen a serpent. Don Pedro affected
the Bashaw, the man in power, and talked to the other
in a style of menace. I wish I could describe the look
which he gave him in return. It said, however, plainly
enough, Your worthlessness and the presence of the
ladies
are your protection. Laura, the dear child, has
somehow contrived to anticipate the experience of years.
She put on her stately airs with Don Pedro, and actually
took on herself the endurance of his Excellency, and
sent us off together on a beautiful evening to walk alone
in a lovely garden. If this man has any fault, it is a
disposition towards taciturnity. But you are not now to
learn, that I can talk enough for both. But I assure
you, the man became talkative and eloquent. He held
such discourse with his eyes too, and was so modest and
grateful, and so ready to be guided by me! Oh! if
I could always be as happy as I was for that
half hour's walk! He is delighted with his place.
The family is delighted with him, and I am delighted
with him; and I am delighted with every body.
We have, in some sense, tied up his Excellency to him
good behaviour. I believe after all, he partakes of the
homage towards this extraordinary man, and is afraid of
him, obscure and humble as he is.
How are you, my dear Jacinta, in that cage of your
on the resounding sea? Is your husband as dear to
you as ever? I hope when I see him, fierce royalist as
he is, yet to make him a convert to the cause of the
Patriots
.
I lean that way sadly myself. The refreshmen
of a long, frank, and cordial letter from you is almost the
only thing necessary to complete the present sum of
my enjoyments. I am too happy. I tremble and look
up in fear of some concealed and suspended thunderbolt
Commend me I beseech you to the Holy Mother, and
believe me affectionately, &c.Mexico
,
March
, 1821.
Dearest Jacinta
,
The
standard of the Patriots is again unfurled, I am
told, and directly in view of your castle, in the city of
Vera Cruz. With how little ceremony they treat
emperors
,
and kings, and great men in these evil days, upon
which we are fallen. I suppose the royal cavalier, so
dear to you, sees with an equal eye the fighting of
Patriots
and Imperialists. Both are alike hostile to him
and when these parties have mutually worried and
weakened each other, he, the third person, can with so
much the more ease fall upon the victor and destroy him.
To him all this fighting may be matter of indifferent
regard
.
Not so to me. A man dearer to me than
liberty
,
or country, or home, or all the world, except my
dearer parents, and, the Virgin forgive me! except my
mother, dearer than even they, is going to join
himself
VOL. II. 17
to the Patriot standard. I sometimes flatter myself
that I am a Patriot by instinct. Since I have been
acquainted
with this man I have learned to read English;
I have been deeply engaged in the American history.
What a great country! What a noble people!
Compare
their faces and persons with those of the people
here, and what a difference! There is something
independent
and severe in the appearance and person of
these people. There is not a book in my father's
library
that treats of them, or their history, but what I have
thoroughly conned. But to my story; I am extremely
cautious how I indulge in the society of this man. If he
learned the half of my impatience to enjoy his society,
I fear he would hold me cheap. For they say, at least
my mother says, that men will not love too much love,
or value any thing that comes cheap. In fact I dare
not treat myself too much, or too often with that high
and intoxicating enjoyment, and I economize
every
moment of it, and feel as though I had
acquired
a title to enjoy it by forbearance before the
treat. I affect a distance and reserve in his presence,
that appears to give him pain, as I know it does me. It
is true, he has not complained in words. But there is
often a modest remonstrance in his manner which taxes
me with cruelty, more painfully than any words he
could utter. We had a long walk together yesterday.
To give us countenance, and to screen our purpose,
Laura
started with us, and as soon as we were beyond view,
she kindly left us to ourselves. How deeply this child
has read the chapter of the heart! And what was the
fruit of this solitary ramble? the very anticipation of
which was sufficient to rouse my pulses to fever
quickness
!
Why, we walked side by side most lovingly
indeed
,
but as silent as stock doves. He sighed, poor
fellow, and I sighed. He said Yeaand I said Amen.
He looked at San Puebla, which is now casting up
ruddy
flames amidst its pillars of smoke, and his eye
kindled
for a moment, but he soon returned to his sighs
again. Once he met me, as I well remember, with a kind
of saucy recklessness. But now, when he steals a
glance at me, his eye quails, and when to assist me in
passing, he takes my hand, his absolutely trembles.
My heart thanks him, for I feel that these are the
tremors
of a subdued heart. He came out at last with the
principal secret, and told me that he was about leaving
this city for Vera Cruz. It was now my turn to show
emotion; and it was at first too great for words. As soon
as I became collected from the first surprise, I told him
that those who wished him best, wished him nothing
better than to stay where he was, and that it was a
conduct
that militated against his professions to me, to leave
a place where he could visit me at his choice. He then
informed me, that the Patriot flag was unfurled at Vera
Cruz; that his principles, his predilections, and he
added
,
as his cheek reddened, his detestation of Iturbide
and his minions forbade him to remain in an inglorious
pursuit here, although he could at any moment look at
the town of the Mansion of Martha, where honorable
men his compatriots were rushing to the tented field.
He added, that his determination had been approved
by the Conde de Serrea; that he expected appointment
and rank in the Patriot army; that there was but one
vista through the darkness of his prospects to the only
hope of his heart, and that he saw no way for him, but
to cut his path through it with his good sword. I know
not if I give them rightly, but at the time I thought them
pretty words, and I understood the meaning to be that,
he had no hope of gaining me, but by gaining distinction
and power at the same time. I saw that his heart sunk
at the prospect of leaving me; and as he looked dejected
and on the minor key, I believe that I threw as much
encouragement as I well could into my manner. I am
afraid that he thought me too fond, for I think that I
pressed his hand and gave him well and fully to know
that, in me he had a tried and sure friend in the
garrison
.
Indeed more soft things were said than there is
any use in writing. I conjured him to take care of
himself
and not be rash. I cautioned him against the
assassin-dagger
of Don Pedro, who is to command the
imperial
forces against the Patriots; and then I placed
before
him the dangers of that sultry and sickly climate.
I conjured up so many horrors in prospect that my eyes
actually filled with tears, and I was obliged to turn
away to prevent his seeing them. He had harped on the
right string, and I became talkative. I said a thousand
things, and some of them I suppose more tender than
I should have said. I am sure that he discovered that
I was a traitor, for I expressed a decided wish that the
Patriots might prevail, and that he might acquire
consideration
and glory; and if they established a new
government
,
above all things, that he might acquire influence
enough to save my father's estate from confiscation.
He clearly understood me to mean that, whenever this
should be the case, he would be the favored man of
my father, as he was now of me. And here, the man
habitually so guarded in the expression of his feelings,
fell into a most amiable fit of raptures, and made a great
many protestations of love and respect and all that, and
he talked so fast, and so fervently, and withal managed
the thing so well, that I was obliged to let him run on.
At seven in the evening I was obliged to tear myself
away from him and see my persecutor. I told him so;
and told him moreover that when he saw with how
much patience I bore this torture, I wished him to
copy it.
I saw this hateful man. My parents have been
saying
every thing but just enough to break my heart, in
order to have me do, or at least say something decisive
before he sets out on this campaign. I have a firm
persuasion
,
that it will be a decisive one; and may God
grant that it may for ever take from him the power of
tormenting me, or any one else. He, too, made his
speech and fell on his knees. To get rid of him, I
assured
him that, if he would leave me free and unmolested
to the end of the campaign, I would give him a decisive
and final answer. He received it to be my intention
then to grant his request. How could I help it? I
wished to be sincere. It is for them who place these
temptations in my way, to answer for it if false hopes
are raised. At any rate, I am rid of him for the present,
and I breathe easier. I have gained time, and God, I
trust, will help the right cause. Don't you think that this
child Laura has threatened to like her father's
secretary
herself! Certainly, she said when she admitted
that she was pleased with him, You know it would only
be necessary to let him be informed of this liking; and
even if I am not as pretty as you, he would no longer
expose
himself to the danger of assassination and yellow
fever, for one fine girl, when he knows that he could
have another fine one gratis. And then your father
being old, stingy, and wilful, will never consent to this
thing, and it will be only necessary for me to affect a
little
VOL. II. 17*
fit of the agony of a broken heart, and my good
parents
would consent to any thing.
In continuation
.
Another proof of the villany of that villanous man,
his Excellency Don Pedro. Notwithstanding all his
protestations of burying the hatchet,and leaving this place
for the army in good will to my beloved, he went
directly
from these professions to plot his assassination. He
was returning, as I heard it, from the theatre to his
lodgings
through a dark alley, and he and his servant were
beset by assassins. Pistols were fired, and dirks drawn.
But Mr. Berrian and his servant played their parts so
manfully that they kept the villains at bay, until the
police
came up, and one of them was apprehended. He
admitted who was his employer, and such is the present
terror of the power of Don Pedro, that the murderer
was discharged at once. The wretch has now left the
city. Heaven grant it may be for ever! And my dear
preserver, too, is gone! I comfort myself that heaven
has preserved him for some great and good purpose, or
he would not have escaped so many perils, which make
it seem as if he bore a charmed life. I saw him a
moment
before his departure. I can never forget his
manner
of taking leave. There is a reality in deep and
genuine love. With him the uncertainty and suspense
of his case, for certainly he does not want
encouragement
,
has given an air of sacredness and purity to his
passion in perfect keeping with his character. He said
that the favoured warriors of other days in my country
had generally carried to the field some little token or
souvenir from the lady of their hopes, but that the most
he could hope even from a fortunate return, would be that
my family would not absolutely disavow his cause, and
that he should not find me another's, and that other his
bitterest enemy. I replied, that nothing justified this
desponding tone. You know my feelings full well. In
these degenerate days people are but too apt to
estimate
causes by their success. Return victorious, and
you may hope all that you wish. But when he grasped
my hand and said
A Dios
, I shed tears in abundance,
and said a number of foolish things, upon which the
wicked man actually pressed my cheek for the first time
with his lips. He is gone, and though for others a more
brilliant sun never shone, to me the blessed light of
heaven
is gloom. I am dispirited and in tears. Heaven
preserve him! The blessed Virgin watch over him! If
he should fall, notwithstanding all my folly, he will
neverknow, he will never dream, to what an extent I
have loved him.Mexico
,
April
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I envy you, for you are daily near him, who occupies
all my thoughts. And yet such are the horrible
barriers
of party and opinion, your noble minds must be at
variance, and you cannot meet him, for he is a Patriot
and you are a Royalist. So once was I, and I think fiercer
than you. See this man, and but for your husband you
would be a Patriot too. But you are married, and for
your loyalty to your husband and your king you had
best not see him. We have had a large pacquet from
the Patriots, that is, the Conde has had one, and they
have had a battle, the Patriots and Imperialists, and the
latter had the advantage. Heaven be praised, my
beloved
is safe, and Sant' Anna writes that, he behaved
gloriously. He was every where in the thickest of he
fight, hunting, I dare say, for his Excellency, my admirer.
They have appointed him a Colonel, and he has gained
influence and respect far beyond his nominal command.
Every despatch is full of his conduct and his praises.
I rejoice in his glory with trembling. Angels and the
blessed Virgin preserve him, and bring him back in
safety
with his glory! To be admired and promoted in a
cause which the Conde espouses, must be real glory.
Then I read his own letter to the Conde written in
Spanish
.
The purity of the language and style, would have
done credit to the Royal Academy. Of himself he writes
with the perfect modesty and simplicity of a great man.
There was a chasm in the letter, and there, thought I,
had he dared, would have been love for me. I kissed
the white interval at the thought. He says, that Sant'
Anna is full of courage, that the Patriots are no ways
disheartened, and that the people are every day
flocking
to their standard. Indeed the emperor himself looks
in doubt, and his eternal simper was this evening
exchanged
for a look of anxiety, and he appeared the better
for it. He had a great deal to say about his
Excellency
,
and his being the firmest prop of his throne, and how
impatient I must be to hear from the army, and how
anxious for his return! This man of the muddy head
has not yet been admitted to the secret of my likes and
dislikes; and he is too destitute of penetration to see
what is most palpably passing immediately under his
eye. And then, having praised his Excellency, thick
and three fold, he began to anoint me in the same way.
There are certain little liberties which he thinks it a
great honor to bestow upon his favorites. He seemed
disposed to take them with me. I repelled them, and
in a manner, which could not be mistaken. I will aver,
that the man is not wholly destitute of good feeling; for
he blushed even to his red whiskers.Mexico
,
May
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
You
have made my heart glad with your letter. You
say, that you espouse no cause, that blinds your
understanding
,
or takes away the power of discriminating
truth from error, pretension from reality. That is like
you. You have taken interest enough in him from his
being dear to me, to inquire him out. You delight me
by saying, that his deportment has won all praise,
triumphed
over envy, and even gained the applauses of
your husband. Every generous heart ought to feel the
difference between an unprincipled adventurer, and the
partizan, whose private life and deportment show, that
his heart and his principles are in the cause he espouses;
and who in private pities, relieves, and spares those
men for whose cause he professes to have taken up
arms. It is only necessary to look at him, to see that
the motives that have carried him to the field are
neither
interest nor to take side with the strongest. There
is something that speaks out when the heart is in
earnest
.
I have never seen a man whose manner so
strongly
evinces that every thing he does, is matter of
conscience
and principle.
In continuation
.
Heaven be praised! they have beaten the
Imperialists
,
and that too, when the tide seemed to have turned
against them. All admit that his intrepidity, coolness,
and conduct retrieved the fortunes of the day, and
turned
the tide back upon the foe. He was covered with
blood and with glory, and yet came off from the
conflict
unharmed. I have returned my
Te Deum
on my
bended knee. There are a thousand opinions here.
Even my father seemed to doubt the Imperial cause,
and to waver for a moment. He admitted that every
one allowed the palm of admirable conduct to his
schoolmaster! I told him, that the schoolmaster would
yet play an important part here, and have a hundred
times as much real and efficient influence as these
miserable
puppets that sustain and enact their parts in the
ludicrous
farce of Imperialism for a day. But he is old,
and, Heaven forgive me! he is obstinate and insists on the
miserable old saw, that a bird in the hand, &c. and
concludes with the prophecy, that Don Pedro will return
in triumph, and that if there should be any overturn as I
predict, it will be the putting down the present emperor,
to put up in his place his future son-in-law. Bryan's
favorite
saw two words to that bargain, came to my
memory in answer to my father's proverb. How I long
to see my hero!
In continuation
.
Another battle and he is wounded! Oh, why
cannot
I be there to nurse him, to read to him, and cheer him!
You have sent your surgeon to him, to dress his wound.
You would have won my everlasting love by that act,
if you had not ensured it before. Jacinta, if I have
any weight with the holy father, you shall be canonized.
How noble it is and how like you to do good to your
enemies
!
Enemies! There cannot be enmity between two
such minds as yours and his. I regret, for this turn, that
I am not a professor of the Order of Mercy. Then I
could go and nurse him without reproach. I have not a
doubt but I could help him more than your surgeon.
The report of the day is, that his Excellency is
retreating
upon Xalapa. Then he is so much nearer me, and
as soon as my hero is recovered, so will he be too.
They are marching strong detachments from this city
to the aid of the Imperialists, and the Patriot ranks are
filling up still faster. My heart exults in the glory
acquired
by my beloved. But it is too expensive and
purchased at too much hazard. I awake by night, and
think I hear the guns, they are firing upon him. In this
view I could almost rejoice that he has received a wound,
not dangerous, but sufficient to detain him awhile from
danger. You will congratulate me upon one point
gained
.
My mother has become a Patriot, and in the
presence
of my father, has expressed a decided opinion, that
their cause ought to prevail, and will prevail. She stated
at the same time that she was no longer and never would
be again opposed to my love, and that if I can gain my
father's consent she is perfectly willing, to break with
Don Pedro and give me to the other. I embraced her at
the moment and had almost stifled her with kisses. She
requested me not to caress her to death at that time, for
that she wished to live and see me happy. This full,
and decided expression of her feelings has not been made,
without raising a domestic storm. My father seems to
cling more resolutely to his ship now that it seems to be
sinking. But for me all my omens are of good. The
earth seems to have caught my delight! The city clocks
move faster! The birds have learned a new song, and the
very
leperos
seem good and handsome. At the
Tertulia
without being conscious of it, every one seems to enter
into my joy. I am sure he will yet be mine. I have
always had a presentiment of it. What a sober, quiet,
domestic, stay-at-home wife I should make. I could
knit or embroider a gear at a sitting, so that he were
with me. I would live with him on Crusoe's island
without
Friday. I fear that I am too happy, and dread a
reverse.Mexico
,
July
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I have this day received a package of your letters at
once. I do not wonder at your astonishment that you
have had no news of me for a long time. It is a miracle
that you should ever hear of me again as an inhabitant
of this earth. Oh! what have I not suffered? I have
lived fifty years in a month, and I have performed, Oh!
such a penance for my sins. Surely, I must have sinned
deeply. But I hope my trials have not been without
their use. I am sure that I am more sober; that I have
acquired some practical philosophy, and that my pulses
will never beat so tumultuously again. But you shall
have the sad story of my sufferings. The evening after
my mother had at last come out with that decided
preference
for Mr. Berrian, that I mentioned to you; too
happy to sit still, and in a frame of mind to muse in the
moon-light and inhale the delicious evening breeze, and
think upon that man, I bade the duea walk with me
and I took the direction of the lake, for we live near that
extremity of the city. It was very imprudent I grant
you, in these times of distraction and misrule. But I
felt so happy and in such a delightful frame of mind to
enjoy the evening! and I felt too as if I was strong in the
strength of his protecting arm. We had cleared the
city and were approaching the lake before we remarked
that a carriage with servants wearing the Imperial livery
followed us. An apprehensive suspicion flashed across
my mind, but was instantly driven out by a pleasanter
train of thought. We continued to walk on for nearly
half a league, and the duea remarked to me that the
carriage followed at the same pace and kept the same
distance. Ashivering terror of some unknown danger
pervaded
my mind, as I perceived that she remarked rightly.
We immediately turned on our steps for the city. The
carriage stopped in a notch of the causeway. Petrified
with terror, I stopped too; but not long, for a man
muffled
in a cloak and followed by two servants made
towards
me. I shrieked and ran as fast as the unwiedly
duea could follow me. I was overtaken in a moment.
The stranger grasped me in his arms, and the servants
at the same moment caught the screaming and struggling
duea Indignation and the spirit of my father
returned
upon me. I sternly asked him what he wanted, for
that if it was my money and jewels they were at his
service. He replied that he was aware that I had not
so mistaken his object; that I could not but have
conjectured
by whom, and for what purpose he was
employed
.
Lest I should still doubt, he told me that he was
ordered to convey me safely and respectfully, if I would
allow him, to Xalapa, there to meet my affianced
husband
;
that he was instructed to explain so much of his
object in order to allay any unfounded apprehensions,
and to set my mind at ease as to my destination. That
for the rest, he hoped I would enter the carriage that
waited for me, cheerfully, when I knew his purpose;
for in that case he was charged to use his best and most
respectful exertions to render the journey pleasant.
But that his commands were positive, and his business
urgent, admitting neither hesitation nor delay; and that
his instructions were to bring me to his Excellency at
Xalapa, respectfully, if I would, or forcibly if he must;
and he begged me to fix upon the alternative.
I put down the coward at my heart, and talked firmly
VOL. II. 18
and indignantly, and told him that none but a robber
would be employed in such a purpose, or would commit
such an outrage upon a man, much less upon a
defenceless
woman; that he might by brute force carry my
person to Xalapa, but that my mind was free, and I
spurned equally at his control and his master's; and that
I would prefer to yield a thousand lives in succession,
rather than put myself in his bad power. I cautioned
him that the times were dubious, and that his employer
might not always be, as now, in power, and that he might
one day be called to account for this evening's outrage.
More than all, I threatened him with the utmost
vengeance
of a powerful father, who had but me, and would
deeply avenge this detestable outrage. He replied with
ironical coolness, that he had no idea of engaging in a
war of reasonings, in which I was sure to have the
better
of the argument; and that he was happy to set my
mind at rest, as it regarded the interference of my
father
,
and that if I wished it, he would show me a letter
from him to his Excellency, the commander in chief, in
which the latter is authorized to take such measures with
me as he shall deem expedient, so that the result of
them be, that you are joined together in holy wedlock.
Having said this, he observed that he was in great
haste, and begged to know, whether he should have the
honor to escort, or to carry me to the carriage. It was
obvious that his purpose was fixed. Trusting to my
future chances, and judging that I should be able the
better
to avail myself of them if I preserved my coolness,
I told him that I was aware into what hands I had fallen;
that I did not doubt his ability or his will, in a trial of
brute strength with a defenceless woman; that I
preferred
settling the point with the master rather than the
man, and that if he would allow my woman to
accompany
me, I would trust to my chance to escape, or to awe
his master after I should arrive, and that I would go with
him; for that in the last resort of outraged liberty I had
resources
beyond his, or mortal control. Remember,
I cried, that I take this woman with me, and that you
pledge yourself not so much as to pollute me again with
the touch of your hand, and that I submit to this
indignity
to avoid the stillgreater one of compulsion. Much
obliged to you, madam, said he, with a air of grinning
irony. You speak like Cicero. Every article of the
treaty shall be religiously observed, and if you are not
the first to infringe that article which binds us to mutual
silence, you are no woman. He opened the carriage
door without offering me his arm, and I sprang into it
as though I were embarking on a party of pleasure.
He lifted the duea in after me, mounted himself, closed
the door, gave a signal, and we were whirled away.
Words would but weakly portray my thoughts and
feelings. We were hardly passed the causeway from
the city, before we were joined by a number of armed
persons on horseback, and among others, I recognised
my father's confidential servant, which circumstance
instantly enlightened me as to the truth of what had just
been told me, that my father was privy to this outrage,
and not only consenting to, but aiding it. This was the
unkindest cut of all. I was obliged to think that he was
seeking what was my happiness, according to his notion
of it, in order to avoid thinking of my father in a way
the very thought of which would be terrible to my heart.
We drove on in silence; for when the man made a
movement as if to speak, I insisted upon the terms of the
treaty. I heard the distant tones of the bells in the city
softening and diminishing in the distance. Finally, all
faded away but the rattling of the wheels and the
trample
of the horses. All hope of rescue or return was at
an end.
We stopped for a moment, and I called my father's
servant by name, and asked him the use of carrying me
so far from home to excite consternation and alarm at
least, with my mother, only to have the pleasure of
carrying
me back again? The man replied (with a
shortness
which evinced, that he had nothing to fear,) that he
would answer all this to my father, and to no one else.
I contented myself with hoping the pleasure of
being
one day able to punish his insolence, and I relapsed
into my former silence.
At three in the morning we came to the mountains.
The person who was with us in the coach descended,
and made a motion for me to follow him. I
perceived
that the whole escort amounted to twenty
persons
.
The master of the gang told me that he was
obliged
so far to infringe the treaty, as to inform me that we
were to tarry here until the rising of the sun, and that I
should be obliged to proceed the rest of the way on a
mule, and that he hoped I would devote the interval to
rest, for that the remainder of the journey would be
fatiguing
.
I went in to the
meson
, and was shown by the
servant to a bed, and my duea had one prepared
beside
me. I called up the recollections of Spanish
romances
I had read, in which, under the aforesaid
provisions
,
distressed damsels sat up all night. But in
disregard
to the precedent I reflected that I should need all
my strength and composure for the scenes that were
before
me, and that, to make the best of my present
situation
,
would be most likely to give me energy and
endurance
,
for whatever I might have to encounter.
Accordingly
,
I went to bed, and dreamed that Mr. Berrian
rode up, the handsomest officer I had ever seen, at the
head of a fine regiment, and that at the sight of him all
my persecutors shifted for themselves; and I was
dreaming
further, and would have dreamed on in this way
for ever, when I was awakened by the summons of my
conductor. I arose, was dressed, mounted my mule,
and requested them to lead on. In the multitude of my
sad thoughts within me, as we were slowly mounting one
hill after another, I reflected, that I was the first
distressed
damsel, so far as I had read, who accompanied
those who carried her off, so peaceably and voluntarily.
I quieted this uneasy reflection by considering again,
that distressed damsels, if they had good sense, were
as strongly called upon to use it, as others, and that it
was better to bear the yoke willingly, which I plainly
saw I must bear at some rate. Besides, I hoped that
an apparent submission to my fate might throw these
people off their guard, and allow me the only chance
which the case admitted of escape. So I made a grand
effort to exclude every object from my thoughts, but the
delightful one of my recent dream.
In this way we advanced constantly, but slowly,
avoiding, as I discovered, the great road, and following
for the most part mule-paths among the mountains, until
we arrived in view of the beautiful city of Xalapa. It
was a lovely view to me, even in the deplorable situation
in which I was placed. Cradled among mountains, its
air is balm, its scenery inspiring, and the blue of its
atmosphere
more soft than that of any place that I had
ever seen. At sight of the town my heart began to
palpitate
,
and I was alternately faint and then my face
VOL II. 18*
glowed. I faintly breathed the dear name instead of
that of the Virgin Mother, and as though there were
relief and protection in the name; the spirit of my
fathers
began to stir within me, and indignation began to
inspire
me with the requisite self-possession. It was just
bright morning, and the morning gun was fired in the
city, just as we halted. I was left under guard of the
rest, and my conductor went forward, as I suppose, to
report his progress and success to his employer. It was
nearly an hour before he returned, and I had a fine
opportunity
to meditate how I should conduct in the
approaching
emergency. I revolved every conceivable
plan of address and action, and ended by feeling the
impossibility of anticipating a conduct proper for every
supposable case, and determined simply to act
according
to circumstances.
My conductor returned, and the escort marched
through various streets in the city. It halted at last in
front of a spacious and splendid building, which they
called the palace. I was ordered to alight, and my
conductor led the way up a flight of marble stairs to a
piazza, from which a door opened into a spacious saloon.
A lady dressed gaily, and with rather a handsome
person
,
but of a bold and disagreeable manner, requested
me to be seated. She informed me that his Excellency
the commanding general, would have the honor to wait
upon me as soon as he had finished some important
business
that could not be deferred. I replied, that it was a
thing altogether undesired on my part to see his
Excellency
,
as she called him, at all; and that the longer his
important duties detained him, the better I should be
pleased. Indeed, madam, said she, that is
astonishing
!
I should have supposed that ladies were more
alike in their tastes. The bravery and gallantry of our
noble general has won every heart here. I am told,
madam, that he has done you the infinite honor to elect
you for his bride, and that with the consent of your
noble father he has brought you here to celebrate the
nuptials. You can scarcely imagine how much you will
be envied this distinguished honor. You have only
to fear that some jealous rival will mix poison with your
beverage before it reaches you. I found the drift of
her discourse, and simply replied, Madam, I have not
the honor of knowing you, nor the taste to like you,
and when you have said all that you have on your
mind, I hope you will have the goodness to relieve me of
the pleasure of your company. She made a low and
sweeping courtesy, and said that she felt very much
oppressed
at heart, that she had not the good fortune to
please me in the same degree as she had long had
my future husband; that, as to leaving the
elected
bride of his Excellency alone, just on her
introduction
to his palace, and on the eve of being united to him,
was a thing not to be thought of, and that the general
would never forgive her such rudeness. I smiled in her
face, threw as much contempt as I could into my
manner
,
and reclined on the sofa with the assumed ease and
insolence of a high-bred lady and made up my
countenance
for meeting his Excellency.
It was nearly noon when he came, and if I had not
had such just cause for indignation and terror, I should
have pitied the wretch, when he approached me. He
had tasked himself to the utmost, to assume the
nonchalance
and tooth-pick insolence of a hero, who visits a
subdued and imprisoned enemy. The moment he saw
my look of high defiance, his insolence forsook him
His cheek was blanched, and he began stammering
something
about love and promises, and the consent of my
father, and my recreant and degrading taste for the vile
traitor, the Yankee adventurer. I heard him calmly to
the end, and then I opened upon him. Our language
i rich in terms of
belittlement
, hatred, and contempt;
and I was fluent in the use of them. I told him that
if he had possessed at the first, a single rudiment of any
thing that was noble in man, his birth, fortune, and
equality of condition, together with the wishes of my
parents, would, undoubtedly, have gained my consent to
a union with him, before I had ever seen any thing
better
.
But, that the moment he persevered in his suit,
propped by his interest with my parents, after he was
assured he never could have mine, he became to me, not
simply an object of dislike, but of loathing; for that a
man who would in any way impose himself on a woman
as a husband, after he knew she disliked and wished to
avoid him, must be a tyrant and a coward, unworthy of
a generous thought. I admitted that I did indeed love
the American adventurer, as he had called him, with my
whole heart, and I had thought, since I had known him,
that my aversion to his Excellency had indeed
increased
by contrasting characters so very opposite. I
hinted
at his having fished him from the water. Not to be
outdone in this strain, he reminded me, that much as
that adventurer wanted birth and condition, he had
invited
him to decide their mutual pretensions in single combat,
which he had declined. I replied by reminding him
that the opportunity, so sought, did afterwards occur;
and I remember, I continued, that there were two
accounts
of that affair, the one by him, and the other by
yourself, and they materially differed; I presume you
understand which I believed. This allusion transported
him beyond all forbearance. He reddened with rage,
turned on his heel, traversed the room twice or thrice
with rapid strides, and then placing himself full before
me, and summoning all his coolness, he said, Madam,
I see it is useless to contend with you in the war of
words. I shall not condescend to any farther
discussion
.
You are mine, because I have power, and love
you. You are mine, because I entertain a deadly
hatred towards the man you love. In the double game,
which you have played between him and me, you are
mine by implied engagement. You are mine by your
father's consent, and even assistance, as you discover.
All these indignant airs only give my pretty caged bird
a more engaging appearance to me. Make yourself
comfortable and at home here. You are mistress of the
palace and of its master. To-morrow perhaps,or the next
day, or at my convenience and leisure, you will
accompany
me to a
hacienda
in the mountains. Father
Josephus
and your father's servant will be in waiting, and
your duea on your part, to witness to earth and
Heaven
,
that you are my lawful wedded wife. You will
hardly
attempt to show any more of these airs, when you
discover that they only render you more piquant, and to
my taste. He could not however resist the cool smile
of contempt that I gave him, and grinding his teeth, and
half drawing his sword, he uttered a horrid curse, that I
should then be his, alive or dead.
His countenance while he uttered these words was
horrible, and I felt a sinking faintness at heart which I
disguised by turning away from him apparently in
contempt
.
I only added, You may, perhaps, carry me
there, and my poor father may have abetted this horrid
purpose. I will promise nothing beforehand. The same
Providence which has so mercifully interposed for me
before
,
will not forsake me now in this my hour of extreme
need. When it comes to the worst I can only die, and
the thought that I was your wife would blast me as
surely
as a thunder-stroke. You have taught me, what I
thought was impossible, to abhor you more than ever.
I hope that, until this dreadful hour of removal, I am at
least to have the relief of being left alone to think on
him who has so often delivered us both, and who little
thought, when he last spared you in battle, that he
spared
a viper to sting him, and all that was dear to him, to
death. He replied, that if it would comfort me, to have
one more solitary night for such pleasing
remembrances
,
he had promised my father that, up to the time
when he should have the claims of a husband, I should
be left to myself. Saying this, he withdrew.
The remainder of the day and the ensuing night
passed
,
as before, except that the lady, of whom I spoke,
showed herself only at supper. Early the next
morning
I made my way into the street, and attempted to get
out of the town and escape. At first, I was exposed to
the insults of the soldiery, of which the town was full.
But it was soon discovered who I was. The commander
was sent for, and he met me in the street, half a mile
from his residence. I was wearied, and frightened, and
subdued, and I wept like a child. I fell on my knees
before him in the street, and in presence of his brutal
soldiers, and implored him by his mother, his sisters, and
the blessed Virgin, to let me travel on foot and alone to
Vera Cruz. You need not go there, said he, to
see the adventurer. He is expected here every hour at
the head of the rebel troops to besiege me, and my
sweet bride in the palace. What a charming solace we
shall have for passing the dull days of the siege! It
was in vain that I wept and implored the officers,
soldiers
,
and passengers. The soldiers were ordered to
take me by force and carry me home; and I was
conveyed
there as if I had been a corse.
The dreadful hour was approaching; and I was but
too well apprized of the lengths, to which he was
prepared
to go. I had reserved a knife which I used for
preparing
pens and pairing my nails, for an emergency. I
had always believed him the kind of person that men
call a coward, and I had determined when we should be
alone to operate upon his fears, by a show of assault.
I dared hardly think of using it for another purpose, for
I had religious scruples in regard to suicide. I
searched
,
and found that it was gone. He was now with me
alone, assuring me that he should not leave me again
until the coach came to convey us to the
hacienda
. I had
read of fictitious personages in such cases acting in
heroics. For me, I felt that I was but a feeble,
trembling
woman. I again fell on my knees before him. I
folded my hands in the attitude of the most earnest
supplication
.
I said, Forgive me, Don Pedro. I will use
words of harshness to you no more. I will strive to
love you, and obey you, and become whatever you
wish. I cannot pass at once from hatred to love.
Allow
me but four days, and at the end of that timeand
I hesitated. And what at the end of four days,
asked
he. At the end of four days, I answered, I will
either consent to marry you, or die. Grant me this, I
beseech you, by the many days which we have spent
together
when I did not hate you, when I believed that I
one day might love you. That, madam, said he,
will never do. You have fooled me long enough, and
I see your only object is to gain time, until the Yankee
can come to your relief. `The present time,' the
proverb
says, `is the only time.' I must avail myself of it.
While this was passing, the carriage, that was to convey
us away, drove to the door. The hateful woman
appeared
to accompany me. I remember nothing farther,
except a certain swimming in my head, and that the
room and every object was inverted, and whirled round.
I did not awake to consciousness, until after midnight.
The faithful duea was weeping by my side. A
physician
and a priest were in the apartment. Don Pedro
came to my bedside, and they came with him. I felt
tranquil, but so extremely weak, as hardly to be able to
articulate. I heard the physician inform him, that in
my present situation, the least motion or alarm would
be fatal to me. I felt my strength and my powers
returning
with my consciousness, and was sensible that my
faintness had been that of extreme terror. But I
carefully
imitated, as well, and as closely as I could, the
symptoms which had been so recently real. I had the
inexpressible satisfaction to find that the physician was
deceived by this counterfeiting, and advised him to
leave me to repose, of which I feebly expressed my
need. Two servants were left with candles in the
remote
part of the room, and the faithful duea sat
by my side. You may be sure I had no thoughts of
repose
.
Not many minutes after the wretch left me, I saw
through the blinds the flash, and instantly afterwards
heard the report of a cannon, and a continued and
terrific
shouting of voices. Shortly after a person came
into the room and uttered something in a whisper. The
attendant women cried out Jesu Maria! and began to
wring their hands. We are besieged, they cried. The
North American general besieges us. Oh! the horrid
creature! He spares neither aged nor infants, lay
women
,
nor professed; and they crossed themselves and
comforted themselves with a prayer, that the general
might beat them off. How tumultuously my bosom
throbbed! The cannon pealed again and again,
and every discharge seemed in my ear the noble
voice of my deliverer announcing to me, that relief was
at hand.
In continuation
.
My tormentor came and went, and deep anxiety sat
upon his countenance. I made it a point to lie perfectly
still in bed, and my entire abstinence from all
refreshment
for some time, had given me the paleness and
languor
of real disease. The second day of my
confinement
in this way, I heard a louder and more continued
cannonade, the crash of small arms in the intervals, and
then the infuriated shouts of the assailants, and
sometimes
the shrieks of the besieged. The attendants came
into the room on tip-toe and in a whisper, but their
countenances evinced, that their terrors were real, not
the offspring of idle speculation. I made the best
interpretation
I could, of the broken exclamations and
whispers, and I inferred that Don Pedro had made a
sortie
from the town; that it had been routed and driven
back, and that there was hourly danger, that the town
would be taken.
I feigned sleep, and the anxiety and terror of my
attendants
were so great, that they left me alone with the
duea. My pocket-book had not been taken from me.
In it was paper and a pencil. I traced on a slip of
paper
these words: I am here under the control of
VOL. II. 19
Don Pedro. Save me from a destiny worse than
death....
I gave this scrawl to the duena. I was aware of her
extreme simplicity, and I gave every caution to enable
her to convey it safely to Mr. Berrian. I furnished her
with money, and told her that my life depended upon
that billet's finding its way to him. She promised her
best, and retired; and after a sufficient time, came back
with a satisfied countenance, informing that she had
hired
an Indian with five doubloons, who had promised, on
the sign of the cross, to have it conveyed to the Patriot
general.
At night Don Pedro returned, and I discovered by his
countenance, in extreme anger. The duena had
learned
that the garrison had been severely beaten, and that
it was the general impression, that the town could hold
out but a few days. I might have attributed his
anger
to this source, but he soon undeceived me. So,
said he, all this sinking faintness is a mere
ruse de
guerre
. I am astonished, that such a beautiful and
innocent
face can conceal so much intrigue and deception.
See, traitress, that there are others as wise as yourself.
That infernal rebel may learn that you are here, and be
urged to save you from an event so much more terrible
than death. But the information, you discover, has to
pass through my hands, and I must immediately possess
the rights of a husband, to enable me rightly to dispose
of your billet. There is some probability, that the rebel
may render it expedient for us to evacuate the town,
and retreat to a place more central to our resources.
But we must be wedded before we leave this place.
You will prepare yourself in a couple of hours for a visit
from the father confessor. He has resided long, in that
capacity, in your father's family, and you must feel it a
great privilege, to have him solemnize the marriage. It
is a fortunate contingency that he arrived yesterday with
despatches from the emperor, and has consented to
perform
this service for us. I recommend to you the same
wisdom which you showed in your journey hither. You
will have to submit, and I could wish it were cheerfully,
to the unavoidable necessity of your condition. Trick,
feint, deception will neither create surprise, inspire pity,
nor obtain delay. The thing may be worse than death
now; but, as one of your cursed English poets has said,
you will first `loathe, endure, and then embrace.'
Saying this he put the billet, which I had sent Mr.
Berrian
,
before me, and retired.
My resolution was formed the moment he was gone.
I threw my arms round the neck of my only friend and
adviser, the simple and faithful duena, and was
relieved
by a burst of tears. My heart would else have
broken. The long and tried affection of this kind
servant
manifested itself in earnest prayers for me to the
blessed Virgin, and she made a vow, which she never
made, except in extreme trials, and which, she assured
me, had never failed but in one instance, to obtain an
answer. She assisted me to throw on my dress. I
arose and summoned to my aid the whole energy of my
nature, resolving to keep myself as cool, and my eye as
steady as possible, to seize the proper moment and
course of action. One thing was determined, that Don
Pedro should never be able to call me his wife. The
duena's vow seemed to be answered, for I felt nerved
to any point of daring. Nevertheless, when I heard the
ascending footsteps of the expected party, my heart
began
to palpitate, my respiration became laborious,
and the apartment, as before, began to whirl round. I
was again unconscious for some time. The terror of the
parties when I began to recover, evinced that they were
aware there had been no deception in this fainting.
There were in the apartment the woman whom I first
saw on entering the house, some other women dressed in
tawdry finery, that might be servants, my father's head
servant, the father Josephus, and Don Pedro. The
duena hung over me sobbing and holding volatile salts,for
me to smell, and rubbing my temples with the same.
Don Pedro approached me and essayed to take my
hand. The touch instantly thrilled through my frame,
and restored to me all my native energy. I arose, put by
his hand, and passed him towards the father.
Father
,
said I, I have not thought well of you for a long
time. You have now a chance to redeem my good
opinion, and for ever ensure my gratitude. You have
seen how suddenly things change here. To serve me
now, may be one day of service to you. What is this
horrible farce that you are about to enact? You, a
minister of the altar, and abet this horrible business?
Marriage is a sacrament. There is no union unless both
parties consent. Could you conjure a fiend here from
his infernal abode, I would wed him as soon as that
man. I might at least respect the intellectual powers of
the horrible being. Think you, that Heaven will permit
such horrible sacrilege as you appear to meditate, to
pass unpunished? Why kill the child of your
benefactor
,
that never did you harm? You cannot doubt, after
what you have seen, that such an union would kill me at
once. I conjure you by your mother, your sister, the
blessed Virgin, Jesus who hung on the tree, by the God
of whose mysteries you were the minister, let alone this
impious mockery. Refuse to have part or lot in it.
Interpose
your high authority as the minister of God to
reprove and disappoint this wretch.
I pronounced these words in the tone of the most
impassioned
supplication, and held fast to his pontifical
robe. He turned deadly pale, and evidently faltered in
his purpose. The greater spirit was evidently
subservient
to the less, for Don Pedro, in a tone of authority,
informed him that all was ready; and bade him proceed
in the ceremony. He reminded him of his given word,
the consent of my father, and intimated surprise, that so
wise a man could hesitate in so just a resolution from the
tragic rant of a girl, whose head had been turned, and
whose heart had been polluted and rendered
disobedient
,
by heresy. This was touching the key,note, and
instantly restored to him his inflexibility of purpose.
He began in that deep and awful tone of voice, in which I
had so often heard him celebrate the mysteries of our
religion
in my father's house. His eye was cast up to
heaven
,
and his words seemed to come from the bottom of his
breast. Yea, said he, it is a sacrament, and one
that has been too long deferred. I plead guilty before
God and the saints, that when in former time I have
been urged by your father to this same course, I have
yielded to the motions of a weak and sinful compassion.
Hc mea culpa
. It is easy to see how deep and
fatally
that arch heretic has exerted his influence upon you.
In solemnizing this marriage, I unite you to your equal in
birth and fortune, a husband, destined for you from
your earliest years,and with whom you played as such in
the innocent days of your childhood. I unite you to a
true and faithful son of the church, the first subject of
your emperor, a man, who has a right to award the
honor
VOL. II. 19*
of his hand where he pleases. In doing it, I secure
your temporal happiness against your own perverted
heart and judgment. I secure your temporal happiness
and honor, and more than all, it is to purify your soul
from the taint of heresy, and to secure your eternal
salvation
,
that I commence these holy mysteries.
Saying
this, he began the usual services of the church,
commanding
me the while, in the name of God and the
church, to take Don Pedro by the right hand. I
indignantly
pushed aside the offered hand, and continued in a
tone of remonstrance, and in a voice so frantic and loud,
that it prevailed over the deep voice of the father's
services
.
These opposing efforts were making at the same
moment, and I could hardly make out that he had
proceeded
to that point of the ceremony, where our mutual
responses would have been necessary to its proper
validity
,
when I sprang by a strong effort from the two
women who, under the semblance of bride-maids,
actually
held me in my position, and in struggling to open the
door and escape I fainted and fell to the floor. My
agony
of head and heart was too intense, long to allow me
the repose of fainting, and I quickly recovered
consciousness
.
A burst of cannon and small arms was heard,
followed by shouts and shrieks, and all the wild outcry
of a captured city. Father Josephus fled in one
direction
,
and my infamous persecutor in another, and in the
next moment I was in the arms of Mr. Berrian! My
appearance was a sufficient comment on the duena's
narrative. I was pale as death, and my hair was
disheveled
.
He hung over me with the tenderness of a
mother, who watches the return of a child from a
fainting
fit. His countenance had hardly relaxed from the
sternness of recent slaughter, and his clothes and sword
were stained with blood. My visible agony, the
dreadful
extremity in which he found me, and the tale of my
sufferings melted the young warrior to tears, which I for
my part could have kissed away as they formed in his
eye. Dearest Martha, said he, let me wash away
these stains. You see I am polluted with blood. But
it was no time for scruples and feminine terrors. I
clung to him as if the horrors, from which I had
just escaped, were still impending. Officers were every
moment calling upon him for orders, and every thing
abroad was in the confusion of a city recently captured.
I saw that he wished to be abroad and with me, at the
same moment. O! leave me not, said I, for you
cannot imagine the misery from which you have saved
me. Was ever deliverance so great and opportune?
The victim you have so often rescued from destruction
is now yours, and yours forever.
While I was thus clinging to him, and weeping on his
bosom for joy, and the duena devouring his disengaged
hand with kisses, the shrieks and exclamations in our
vicinity gave a terrible evidence of the lawless outrages
of an infuriated soldiery in a captured city. He made
a great effort of self-conquest, placed a guard of his
countrymen about me, and tore himself from my grasp,
saying, that delightful as it was, to spend these
moments
of deliverance and joy with me, the highest of all
duties called him away from selfish enjoyment, and that
he must prevent the indiscriminate massacre of the
citizens
.
Dear Martha, said he, compose and assure
yourself. You have nothing to fear. I will restore
order
and stay the fury of the soldiers, and then return
on the wings of love and impatience. Yes,
answered
I, in the foolish transports of the moment; but
you cannot escape me so easily. I have suffered the
terror of distraction too long to forego the assurance of
your protection for a moment. Where you go, I will
go. Another general burst of shrieks came upon our
ears. I looked in his face, and my own sense of duty
returned. I relinquished his arm. Go, said I,
restrain
those wretches. Be to others what you have
been to me. God forbid that I should turn the current
of your humanity and protection from other
unfortunates
.
The moment he left me a shiver of terror ran through
my frame, as though the recent horrors, from which he
had delivered me, were about to press on me again. My
guard was commanded by a young American officer of
noble appearance, who did every thing to restore my
courage, assuring me that my persecutor was gone with
all his train, and that I was in no danger while his
strength and his good sword lasted. Notwithstanding
these assurances, the hour of his absence seemed to me
an age. In an hour he returned in a superb uniform.
All stains of blood had disappeared, and he had the
firm and tranquil port of command, and the eye and
manner of one, who had so lately guided the storm in
mercy, had restored tranquillity and confidence to
the trembling citizens, and had tied up the
unbridled
fury of his soldiers. Order and quiet, said he,
are now re-established, and the two coming hours, my
dear Martha, are wholly to you. The Imperialists have
left us in quiet possession of the city, and we shall
remain
here for the present. How little did I expect this
excess of joy! All that were present, except the duena
and Bryan, whose fresh Irish face sparkled with joy,
saw that we should prefer to be alone. I could not find
it in my heart to banish these persons, who participated
so keenly in the joy of my deliverance.
When all had retired but those before whom I felt no
restraint, after the thousand earnest and broken
exclamations
natural to our case, after the numerous
questions
,
that received no answers, had passed, and we had
become sufficiently calm to listen to narrative, Mr.
Berrian
informed me, that Bryan, who acted as a kind of aid,
and was always by his side during the siege, brought
him intelligence only this morning, how I was situated.
We had determined on the assault of this place
to-morrow
,
said he. This information anticipated the fate
of the place one day. I gave instant orders for the
assault
.
It was a fierce and bloody struggle. But the
Imperialists fought without a commander, and of course
much of their effort was wasted, because directed to no
given object. I arrived here, it appears, at the fortunate
moment. For, though such a constrained and
abominable
union ought never to have bound your duty or
conscience
for a moment, I am perfectly sensible, that I have
delivered you from painful scruples, and I am most
happy in thinking, that Don Pedro has not the miserable
satisfaction of saying, that the forms of this outrage were
consummated. He gave me various other details of
his short campaign, and taking my hand, which perhaps
I should have withdrawn, but did not, and looking timidly
in my face, he asked, Dearest Martha, what now? I
am made a kind of fair-weather and Guerilla general.
The short-lived Imperial pageant is crumbling to ruins.
Don Pedro will fall with his master. I cannot but
flatter
myself, that whatever order of things shall arise upon
these ruins, I shall have enough influence and
consideration
to secure your father's estate from confiscation.
What shall I say further, Martha? You know my heart
too well, to need any declarations more. I am
perfectly
sensible of the inequality between us in many points.
But I feel as if I had claims. Should you be disposed
to try me farther, or refer me to new contingencies in a
country so distracted, I fear I should turn tyrant in my
turn. I am a general, dear Martha, at your service,
and just at this moment am in great authority. Are you
disposed for ever to renounce Don Pedro, and titles and
hereditary honors, and become the wife of a simple
citizen of the United States? If not, I give you sufficient
warning, that I shall carry you off by a dark lanthorn,
to a distant and haunted castle, or a den, or cavern, or
something of that sort, and compel you amidst the
howling
of wolves, and by the terrors of a platoon of soldiers,
to say, `Yea, and Amen.' Indeed,general, said I,
doing
homage by a sufficient bow to his epaulets, you
need not use compulsion with a willing subject.
Provided
only, that the solemnity be consecrated with the
rites of my mother-church, and in presence of my
dearest
mother, who has given her full and unqualified
consent
,
you can take the Dona Miguela Martha de Alvaro
for your true and wedded wife, whenever you choose.
To be the wife of the general, here I bowed as in duty,
and a citizeness of the United States, fills all my present
desires. I mean not to infringe decorum or self-respect.
But to put the risk of being separated from my dear
deliverer, and falling once more into the base hands of
Don Pedro as much as possible out of the question, I
shall not, except by compulsion allow myself to be
separated from the escort of the general again, until he
shall deliver me over to the protection of my dear
mother.
You may suppose that he said kind things back again,
and he did so; and it was a kind of contest, which should
say the most civil and affectionate things. He is one of
those men, who show to most advantage when
contemplated
nearest at hand. It is true, he looked none
the worse for his epaulets, and for having fought like a
hero. I hope you will do me the justice to believe, that
though a woman, I am not precisely the person to
admire
a mere pageant, or to allow my eyes to be caught
with a fine person, a sword, and lace. How simple, and
yet how dignified is this man in private! Even after
this unequivocal giving myself up to him,remember the
situation in which I was placed,the same man who had
just driven the legions of the enemy before him, and
who came to me fresh from the slaughter of an assaulted
city, took the hands of a simple girl who threw herself
into his arms, with trembling. I shall never love or
respect
him less for intimate acquaintance. I have
always
doubted the man-hating maxims of Rochefoucauld,
and I am convinced of the falsity of one of his opinions
most frequently quoted, which implies, that no one is
great to those who see him in private.
The duena is confirmed in her persuasion of the
efficacy
of her vow, and I have promised her a husband,
as soon as a good one can be obtained, and she is
happy
.
Bryan talks Irish, and capers for pure joy, for I
have told him, that we, neither of us, are ever to leave his
master; and I have promised him, that he shall have a
shanty
built to his own notion, either at Durango, or in
the States. For we have already agreed,after the event,
(this dear man blushes even now at the word marriage,
so we call it
event
, as the Romans through delicacy,
softened
the term
death
, to the word
decease
,) after the
event, we are to live half the year in his country, and
and half the year in mine. We are thus to migrate with
the autumnal birds and the swans. In the autumn we
fly to the south, and in the spring return to the north.Mexico
,
August
, 1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I am too happy to write to any being but you, and I
begin to credit the old saw, which asserts that happiness
makes us selfish. I left myself at the close of my last,
along with my general, at Xalapa. Instead of two
hours which he promised me, he staid until late at night.
Before he left me, he arranged the terms by a message,
on which I might stay at the Carmelite convent in that
city, as long as he occupied it with his troops.
Protestant
and heretic as they held him, he has present power,
and, I fear me, that is the divinity most devoutly
worshipped
here, as elsewhere. He promises the sisterhood
protection. He stations a guard without the walls, and
is to be admitted within them at any hour that he
chooses. They are to afford the shelter of their
sanctuary
to me, until he carries me back in triumph to
Mexico
.
The convent is a sweet place, the exact
retirement
for a mind and a heart like mine. It is in valley,
like a sweet isle sheltered in a sea of mountains. Here
are fine oaks, the sure indications of health. It has
orange groves, and the delicious fruits and flowers of
every clime. Amidst its bowers run a number of
beautiful
and limpid brooks, chafing over pebbles. Hither I
was removed, escorted by the youthful general and a
select body of troops. At midnight he retired and left
me to the notes of the pealing organ, the midnight
prayers of the sisters, and to communion with my own
thoughts.
In the morning he informed me that volunteer
Patriot
detachments were crowding to his standard, and that
three thousand have already joined him here. He tells
me, that he is impatient to see my mother, and that he
intends
leaving a garrison, commanded by an officer upon
whom he can depend, in this city, and pursuing Don
Pedro to Mexico, whither he is retreating. I
replied
that I was happy here, and begged him to allow my
heart a little repose, assuring him, that if he had the
regard
,
which he pretended for me, he would not leave a
place where I was so delightfully situated, and where he
could see me without molestation or suspicion. I
reminded
him how different all this might be elsewhere.
Not at all, he replied. They never shall take you
from me again, Martha. Besides, this is a cause in which
every consideration must yield to the requirements of
its interests. And I have a confident hope, when I
have seen your mother, that we shall find a place there,
that will content you as well as this. I could not but
admire the patriotism and self-control that led him to
pursue his duty against his inclination. I have not a
doubt, that he prefers the conversation and society of
Martha, to all the pomp and circumstance of war and
glory. I told him to do as his sense of duty dictated,
for that I was too good a Patriot, to wish to have him
sacrifice the interests of the country for love, and that I
had enjoyed one day and night beyond the reach of
fortune.
He had this day to make a march with a select body
of troops to a village, which will require his absence,
until
to-morrow morning. I shed childish tears at this
information
,
and held his arm, until he gently
disengaged
himself. To excuse me, remember what I have
VOL II. 20
recently suffered. I followed him as he rode slowly
away, until his figure, the waving plumes of his cap, and
the troop were lost in the distance. Then I had need
of the consolations of religion, the quiet of the sanctuary,
the pealing organ, the fragrance of the burning incense,
the deep responses of the prayers, to turn my thoughts
from idolatry towards a better country. What a
dreadful
thought, that we must be separated from those we
love, not by such absences, terrible as they are, which
leave us the confident hope of a return; but to be
separated
by the grave, and have the impervious veil of
eternity
interpose between us and them! Oh! to be
separated
from him forever! The thought is chilling. I am
in thought, weaving the ties of a relation with the earth,
too tender. Why was the heart formed capable of such
intense attachments, and yet to moulder in the dust?
And then what say the rigid of my Mother Church about
the soul him, I so dearly love? They term him heretic.
Francis Berrian, my beloved, whose every thought is
noble, whose impulses are all mercy and kindness, and
whose heart is consecrated to purity and virtue, a
heretic
!
And the sly, cruel, selfish, intriguing father
Josephus
,
one of the faithful, and a minister of our mysteries!
Jacinta, I remember, that you were formerly more
liberal
than myself, and that you used to say, that a good
heretic was better than a bad catholic. If he is a
heretic
,
I am in a fair way to become one too. Holy Virgin
defend him! Keep him from the dagger of the assassin,
and the sword of the enemy, and until he returns to
these walls, may no image of earth, but that of Martha,
mingle with his pure dreams.Mexico
,
August
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
He returned next day in safety to Xalapa. Don
Pedro was too far in advance of him, to be overtaken.
He immediately selected a garrison and appointed a
commander for this city. He has had news from Sant'
Anna, who has captured Queretaro. Having settled his
arrangements for leaving this city, he spent the greater
part of the day alone with me, in the charming
gardens
and groves of the convent, and such a day! A
year of such days would be too much for a state of
trial
.
The next morning he started with his whole force,
except the garrison, for Mexico. It was a cheering, and
heart-stirring sight, the ceremonial of our leaving,
and I think, intended as a kind of
fte
for me. The troops
appeared to be in their gayest attire and in high spirits
They filed off in front of the convent gate. The piazza
of the convent was filled with all the gaiety and beauty
of the city. My general rode a spirited white charger,
and many an encomium did the ladies pass upon him
little knowing how my heart concurred in all their
praises. They all admitted he was the finest looking
man they had ever seen. This with ladies is no small
praise. As he came up in front and doffed his military
cap and waved his plumes, there was a corresponding
waving of handkerchiefs, and fair hands, and a general
shout of
Viva la Republica
, and
Viva el Capitan
Liberador
.
He dismounted and came up to the gate, which
was thrown open for the occasion, kissed the hand of
the prioress and other religious sisters, and asked their
prayers for the success of his cause. The prioress
presented
him with a consecrated handkerchief. which
received with a respectful address, and what surpris
them most, was not his uncommon beauty of form and
person, nor his gallant and dignified bearing as an
officer
,
but that he bowed like a king, spoke the true
Castilian
,
and kissed the hand of the prioress, like a devout
catholic. I confess, that a little pride mixed with the
love in my heart, when he came to me in the presence
of such a concourse, and begged the honor of escorting
me to Mexico, and to my mother.
To this request, most gracefully and gallantly made, I
bowed like an awkward country girl,and could not find a
word of reply. My heart said, Yea and Amen! To
Mexico and as much farther as you choose. Ten of the
first officers and select troops formed double parallel
lines. He led me through them, his cap in hand; and
theirs were instantly doffed as he passed, and they drew
their swords in sign, as they explained it to me, of
offering
me protection. The moment we were beyond the
gate, a beautiful horse, appearently matched to that of
the general, was brought me, and another for the
due
a.
He gracefully assisted me into the saddle. The
moment I was seated, the cannons fired. There was
what they called a
feu de joie
. The bells struck, and
the colors were displayed on the towers in the city.
Peal after peal responded from the town. The drums
rolled. The piercing notes of the fife were heard.
The shouts were re-echoed from the hills. Then there
was a momentary interval of silence again. It was
broken by renewed peals of cannon, and the army, the
citizens, the surrounding multitude, and the spectators
on the towers and roofs of the city, rent the air with
Viva el Capitan Liberador
. This was repeated a
number of times. Instantly all was still. The hats
were replaced. The general uttered the word March!
in a clear and strong voice, and a full band struck up its
slow and plaintive national air, in a note, which seemed
in my ear a wail for the dead, exciting in me a thrill of
feeling a thousand times more deep, than all that had
preceded. Our horses moved off at a slow and
measured pace, apparently the result of concert, that
every rank might settle into its proper place. We were
all mounted, and the trampling of so many thousand
horses, produced a sound so grand, and so unlike all
that had preceded, that nothing else could convey
any similitude of it. How delightful was this
journey
!
How different from the sullen and desponding
train of thoughts in which I came here! Jacinta, you
came over the sea with the beloved of your heart, and
had that long and intimate sojourn with your husband,
too. But it seems to me, that I cannot be happier, than
I am. I would be content, at any rate, to compound
with destiny, and remain always as I am I can pretend
to convey no idea of his assiduity, tenderness, and
gallantry
.
Not a word, not a look, apparently not a
thought escapes him, but what unites the expression of
devoted affection with that of vestal purity. He seems
to regard me as a kind of hallowed and consecrated
thing. Indeed, the second night of our journey, as he
led me to my apartment, in a sweet and romantic
cottage
,
which opened into a pretty garden, as we inhaled
through the lattice the fragrance of the jessamine and
the
multiflora
rose, when he wished me the usual
bon
soir
, he drew a deep sigh, which said, as plainly as sigh
could say it, that the separation was painful, and that
he should have preferred to watch with me all
night.
Every hour and every day of this charming journey
VOL II. 20*
was a succession of new enjoyments. It appeared to
me, as if the soldiers, the travellers, the earth, and skies,
did and looked their best, and were robed in their
gayest, to please me. I trembled even at this
excess
of enjoyment, and I expressed my feelings to
my beloved. This same deep capacity of the heart,
said I, for exquisite enjoyment, when the fountains
become troubled, will furnish a proportionate energy
for suffering. Let us hope, he replied, that these
hearts which can suffer and enjoy in such an exquisite
degree, will finally be rendered permanent in happiness
in a better country. Meanwhile, let us take the good
without any of these disquieting apprehensions.
Sufficient
unto the day is its own evil.
Jacinta, I recollect your remark, that what is said of
the history of nations, is equally true of the history of
the heart. The happiest periods are those, in which
there is least to say about them. Every moment of my
time until I arrived in view of the glorious valley of
Mexico, was a moment of tranquil and exquisite
satisfaction
.
My cavalier was always riding by me by day,
surrounded by his officers, bearing the port of command,
and each imitating his gallantry to me. By night even,
I well knew that he was watching near me. I heard
every hour his voice of music in reply to the sentinel,
echoing the words All is well.
The first view of this valley, which unites every thing
that is grand, or rich, or beautiful in nature and in art,
awoke me from my long trance of enjoyment. I
remembered
that this great city, so difficult to approach,
and so hard to attack with any prospect of success, was
in possession of the emperor and his troops,
commanded
by a wretch, whose hatred towards the chosen of my
heart, would be now tenfold more rancorous and
vindictive
,
than ever. My father, what would he say to the
present order of things? Of my mother I had no doubt.
But there was enough of doubt and uncertainty in the
prospect before me, to fill my mind with anxiety and
suspense. Mr. Berrian approached me. Yonder,
said he, are the towers of Mexico. My heart swells
at the sight, for I have a presentiment, that I shall soon
call you mine, and that the Patriot flag shall soom wave
from their pinnacles. And then, dearest Martha
And then, said I, my dear friend, you will be again
in danger. I will not advance a step, until you promise
me, that you will strive to avoid exposure, if not for
your own sake, at least for mine. You have already
won enough of glory. He assured me, that for the
cause, for his own sake, and a thousand times more for
mine, he would be cautious and not expose himself to
unnecessary danger. I have, he said, at this time,
motives to attach me to life, too powerful, and the only
fear is, that these selfish considerations will inspire me
with too much caution and fear of exposing myself; and
Martha surely would not wish that.
Arrived at the city, Mr. Berrian joined his troops to
those of Sant' Anna and Eschaverri. There was in the
united
army a party, and not a weak one, disposed to assign the
chief command to the American chief. He was so kind
as to consult me respecting the expedient course for him.
He told me at the same time, that such was the influence
of envy and national jealousy, that he thought he could
be more likely to the cause, and more likely to acquire
an influence that might be salutary to my father, in a
subordinate command. His views of course were mine.
There was an immediate canvass upon this point, and
conceded the propriety of his withdrawing his name,
as a candidate for the supreme command. There was
some question between Eschaverri and Sant' Anna. It
was peaceably settled, that the latter should have the
supreme command, and the two others coordinate
authority
.
When I saw them running to my beloved in every
difficulty, I thought with pride of the story of honest
Sancho
,
that settled the point of precedence at the Duke's
table. I saw that he who originated all the measures,
was the chief commander, whatever name he bore. In
the hour of perplexity and danger, the weak and
inefficient
commander in chief, naturally yielded to him,
whose appointment was under the sign-manual of nature.
And Mr. Berrian without the envy or responsibility of
the chief command, really originated every measure, and
his counsels eventually prevailed upon every point in
question.
If I were a man, and wore a sword and epaulets, I
should now have a glorious chance for describing the
ceremonial of the junction of these three chiefs on the
plains of Mexico. It was a proud and glorious sight,
and every measure was taken with the most perfect
union of feeling. The artillery pealed. The drums
rolled. The banners waved. The troops displayed,
and the cries of
Viva la Republica
, arose to the sky.
Even the horses, that bore this pageant of war, caught
the pride and enthusiasm of the moment. There is
something thrilling and awful, as I have felt, in the
acclamations
of the thousands of an army, when one
impulse
of feeling animates the whole mass. I felt the
truth of the adage, The voice of the people is the voice
of God! I admit, that as a woman, my heart beat
highest on seeing my beloved moving so gracefully on
his proud steed amidst waving plumes, fluttering
banners
,
presented swords, and all the pomp and
circumstance
of war, heightened by the inspiring notes of a
full band.
In continuation
.
Jesu Maria! I have been an hour on my knees in
thanksgivings, and yet I have not returned adequate
thanks. All doubt is over. They have passed the
dreaded act of confiscation. What care I. I should be
as happy as mortal can be, had I henceforward to earn
my bread by daily toil. I have not the folly to attempt
to paint the scene that I have just witnessed. What a
scene! My father and mother have arrived in camp.
My father was no longer the proud noble, the governor,
the heir of a descent of thirty generations. It was a
proscribed
father, stripped of all his honors, and of all his
immense possessions, his house converted into quarters
for soldiers, and himself and my mother obliged to fly
for their lives without a servant. It was so much the
more bitter, that all this cruelty was inflicted by one,
for whom my father would have sacrificed me and
every
thing. The order of nature was reversed, and
instead
of allowing me to fall on my knees, as I would, to
supplicate his pardon for my disobedience, he would
have humbled himself before me, and begged forgiveness
of me with the subdued humiliation of one, whose pride
and whose heart had both been broken. God, said
he, has punished me just in the point where I had
offended
.
He has made the Moloch, to whom I would
have offered up my dear and only daughter, the
instrument
of my correction. Old, infirm, a beggar, I would
demand pardon of Mr. Berrian on my knees. I threw
myself into his aged arms, and wept on his bosom.
My dear and venerated father, cried I, do I not
well know that mistaken love for me dictated all that
you have done? I never doubted for a moment that all
was done for love, and all is forgiven and forgotten. I
can now show you the extent of my love and duty. I
will make you feel and acknowledge, that wealth is not
necessary to happiness. What do I say? He will
overthrow their acts of iniquity, and restore you to your
wealth and honours. That cannot be, dear daughter,
he mournfully replied. I have committed myself with
all parties; and whichever of them ultimately prevails,
the insolence of success, and the rancor of triumphant
party, will effectually bar me from my possessions. I
shall never dare to look Mr. Berrian in the face. My
mother embraced me in her turn, and in our tears there
was no bitterness; for we had always had but one
mind upon these subjects.
As soon as we had gained calmness enough to enter
into these details, my father said, Don Pedro and
the father confessor returning in disgrace and
chagrin
to the city, related their reverses to the
Emperor
,
but never came near me. He redoubled his
follies
and cruelties, and his blind confidence in them.
Don Pedro avenging my misjudging partiality for him
on myself, and daspairing of ever gaining possession of
you, my daughter, to repay me for that guilty devotion
to him, which had gone such lengths to gratify his
wishes, procured an immediate decree of confiscation
against me, which was no sooner passed, than put in
execution
.
I had scarcely sufficient notice given me to
allow
me time to fly, and I was proscribed as a traitor. A
despatch of confiscation was sent to Durango. Your
mother
fled with me, and we have remained concealed
among the adherents of our house. As soon as we
heard of your arrival, we have come to implore
protection
of our enemies.
I might have observed that on my arrival here, I was
placed with the wife of one of the chiefs in a beautiful
tent, and in this I received my father and mother;
who here embraced the duea, the only one of their
numerous establishment, that now remained to them.
I left them with her, and went for my general, who was
engaged in another part of the camp in reading
overtures
from the Emperor. Bryan, who was prodigal of
the most respectful kindness to them, kept guard
before
the tent, until my return. I sent in a message to
the general. He came out. I put my arm
within
his, and in leading him to my quarters, prepared him
for the scene that was to follow. He was himself in this
scene, as in every other. He soon put my father at his
ease by a deportment just such as I could have wished
from him. His manner showed that he had estimated
my mother differently from my father, but that he now
saw nothing in him but the fallen noble, and the father
of Martha. He begged him to believe that the future
should evidence an entire oblivion of the past. He
pressed the offered cheek of my mother with his lips,
and she received his embrace as that of a child. You
have always been to me as a son, said she,  and if
you still wish it, you shall now be really so. To this
my father added, that matters were now so entirely
reversed, that Mr. Berrian could hardly be expected
now to desire an union with a poor unfortunate girl, who
had nothing to bring him but herself, and her helpless
parents. That, said he, is all I ever sought.
Present the next woman on the earth with one of the
Indies in each hand for a dower, and your daughter
portionless, and I would not hesitate a moment. That
was handsome in him, was it not? But why, he
continued
,
suppose she will be so? Not for my sake, or
hers, but for yours, and the comfort of your age, we
will have all these puppet arts of confiscation reversed.
We do not mean to sheathe the sword of patriotism and
justice, until you are reinstated in every tittle of your
possessions and honours, which have been so unjustly
wrested from you. I yielded to the exigencies of the
cause in every thing else, but for this, my heart tells
me that I ought to stand; and were there but my single
sword, I would not sheathe it, until that was obtained!
My father embraced him with tears in his eyes, and
answered with something of his former spirit; Why
have cruel circumstances ever estranged me from this
noble young man, whose title is worth a thousand times
all those that are written on parchment, and taken from
the office of the herald? I recognise, in all this, the
same man who has returned contumely by saving us,
who has been hitherto the prop of my family! Success
is in your eye, and follows your steps! I am cheered
with the hope that you will yet restore all! Forgive
the ingratitude of a doting old man, and take, if you
desire
it, all that I have now to give, my daughter! We
both fell on our knees before him. He joined our
hands. I see, said he, that you love each other.
I know that he is the soul of honor, and will be kind to
you when I am gone. I give up ambition, and only
hope to spend my old days peacefully with you, and to
expire in your arms. The angel of the convenant bless
you! Our mother likewise took our united hands, and
the tears trickled down her dear and venerable face,
as, in a voice scarcely articulate from excess of emotion,
she too, gave us a full consent, and implored blessings on
our heads.
How often have I said and thought, that my
happiness
could receive no addition, since I had been rescued
from the hands of Don Pedro. But, when I saw Mr.
Berrian my acknowledged and betrothed future husband
in my tent, my mother casting on him looks of affection,
and undoubting confidence, and my father, with
changed
and better estimate, looking to him as the future prop
of the family, and I pondering in my heart the kind
words, that he would prefer me to the fairest with India
in either hand, I felt that I could be happier than I had
ever yet been.
In the course of the conversation, it somehow came in
discussion, when I should really become the wife of the
Yankee general, and my father said the sooner the more
agreeable to him, and my mother consented in the same
way; and they looked to me to fix the time, and I said
from the Bible, that the general had fairly and twice
won me, such prize as I was, with his sword and his
bow, and that I might as well allow him the right of war
and conquest, as not. Then we all looked to him to
appoint
the day. And what do you think the cruel man
said? Why,  that he was probably the most impatient
of the three for the time, but that he was not now for the
first time, to learn how to control his wishes; and that
he had made a kind of vow or mental reservation, that
he would not ask so great an honor, until he could
render himself in some measure worthy of it, by
procuring
a reversal of the decree of confiscation, and a
restoration
of my father to his home and his honors. My
father and mother exchanged looks, as much as to say
Such is our son-in-law! I had a feeling on the subject
VOL. II. 21
too; but you know, I could not complain in words I
was obliged to admit even, that there was an honest
pride after what he knew had formerly been said on the
subject, in deferring to connect himself with the family,
until he had won the honor, by conferring benefits.
Besides I had told him that I neither expected, nor
wished
to be happier than I had been. There was one
comfort
too, in the new order of things. My father and
mother
were in perfect accordance with me, and agreed
that the name of Don Pedro, was as hateful to them as it
was to me. Moreover, there was no need of much of
the reserve of our former intercourse. We could see
each other without witnesses. He could spend every
moment with me, except those of sleep and occupation
with his duties. In fact, he lives almost in my tent.
He spends the greater part of the day with me, and in
the night he is constantly present in my dreams.
In continuation
.Dearest Jacinta
,
Some in my case, and feeling as I do, would odiously
affect indifference and tranquillity and all that. But I
confess I am impatient with the tedious progress of these
miserable negotiations. The cities and the provinces
are all leaving the standard of the Emperor, and my
father's countenance brightens daily, for he too, has
become
a Patriot; and it is quite amusing to hear one of
the most ancient grandees of the Spanish monarchy,
talking about liberty and the rights of man, as if a thing
of very recent discovery. The Emperor has made the
Patriot general proposals, and the papers are all brought
to my future husband. I tremble even now, as I read
the hated name of the minister of war, signed at the
bottom
.
How everlastingly tedious are these miserable
politicians; and they will spin out the simplest trifle to a
volume. I have the satisfaction, however, to perceive
that the good man is as impatient and as much vexed at
this delay, as I am. He says nothing about it, and
sturdily
continues the air of self-control and the affectation
of philosophy. But I see by his manner that he will be
glad when all this business is settled. I am glad that it
vexes him. We love to see that others have no more
philosophy than ourselves. Why should I complain
we constantly pass the day together, and we chat like
old acquaintances. Instead of fighting the enemy with
guns and swords, we fight with proclamations and long
speeches. It is a hard thing to keep these stupid gen
erals from quarrelling among themselves. My general
is constantly throwing water on their fire. Sant' Ann
confessed to my father to-day, that but for the North
American general, they would all fall together by the
ears, and the cause would fail.
In continuation
.
Blessed be the Holy Virgin! Mexico is ours. I am
under my father's roof. The confiscation is reversed.
Mr. Berrian this morning brought my father a decree
of the National Cortes, assembled in Congress, which
reverses
all the late decrees of Iturbide, and restores my
father to all his fortunes, to his recent command at
durango
,
and to the presidency of that honorable body
He, Victoria, and the Conde de Serra may now be
considered
as at the head of affairs. Laura wishes me joy
with the best possible grace; but I clearly see a little
spice of envy. The day of days is fixed. My father
throws me gold by handfuls, and my poor head swims
with joy. When it was again put to me to name the
day, I almost found it in my heart to be revenged upon
him for deferring our marriage when he might have
named the day. But no. I respect the motive of his
forbearance, and I will play off none of these childish
airs.
I ought to go back and inform you in a word, how
these great events came about. Day before yesterday,
Iturbide sent out to the chiefs a full abdication of his
assumed
power, and immediately retired to his
country-house
.
Don Pedro and the father confessor wished to
fly with him. But some of the adherents of our house
collected a band of my father's friends and servants, and
had both the traitors arrested; and they are in the
calabozo
,
and their fate will probably depend on my father's
will. I have as little the inclination, as the necessary
information
and powers, to go into a history of intrigues, and
parties, and divisions, and scramble for places, in
pulling
down one order of things, and putting up another.
There are, no doubt, among the people some real
Patriots
.
But with the thousand scrambles, the only motive
for overturning and ejecting the present occupants of
place, is to fill the vacated places themselves.
Immediately
upon the abdication, a junta formed a provisional
government, and convoked a National Cortes. They
are ready to wink at one great deficiency in Mr.
Berrian
,
his not being a catholic. They offered him a
command
only subordinate to the commander in chief. But
equally in compliance with his own feelings and my
wishes, and those of his future father-in-law, he declined
it. He said that he had taken up arms not for himself,
but for the cause of man, and that having seen the
nation
restored to the full possession of its liberties, and
not having the honor to be a native of the country, he
wished to tender his resignation.
I was in the gallery with a crowd of the citizens when
he made this speech of resignation to the junta. It was
delivered with that noble simplicity that characterizes
every thing he does. My father presided at this
meeting
.
A majority of the members were his partizans,
and this speech, of course, was received with the loudest
plaudits and
vivas
, every one extolling the rare
example
of a victorious general, resigning his command to
the peaceful representatives of the people. A pension
for life and an extensive and beautiful estate in the
valley
of Mexico were voted him, and he retired amidst the
acclamations and waving of handkerchiefs, from the
galleries. Laura was differently affected, and I mistake
if her eyes were not filled with tears. The day of days
is the day after to-morrow. We are all sick of
revolutions
,
war, and shedding of blood. As soon as I am his
wife, we are to start for my father's government, and for
the shade of those venerable trees, and the shelter of
that noble mansion which I love so much better than
any other place. As soon as the Spring opens, we
journey
together to the United States, and he revisits the
place of his birth. I have studied no people or manners
but Spanish. He considers himself and me as citizens of
that country. No matter, to be sincere about it, even if
he were to visit the Hottentots; wherever he went, in
the language of the poet, eternal Eden would bloom
around. Independent, however, of that society which
would render me contented amidst the ice of Lapland;
I long to see and study that great, peaceful, and
flourishing
country, which gave him birth.
In continuation
.
Don Pedro and the father confessor were this day
brought from prison and placed before the junta. They
VOL. II. 21*
had the meanness most earnestly to supplicate the
interference
of Mr. Berrian, and attempted to cajole him with
eulogies upon his magnanimity. My father said that
the junta, in disposing of them, would be guided simply
by his wishes. He instantly expressed a wish that they
might be liberated, on the express condition that he
might never see them again. They were set at large.
Unhappy men! Retributive justice overtook them.
This capital is in a state of the most terrible anarchy.
Fifty thousand of the miserable populace have, in too
many instances, taken justice into their own hands.
Sometimes, it is true, they let fall the thunderbolt of their
wrath on the right heads; and sometimes they exercise
the indiscriminate destruction of wild beasts. These
bad men had, in some way, become peculiarly obnoxious
to the populace, and as they were liberated at the gate
of the palace where the junta were in session, some
factionist
gave the signal of marking them out for the fury
of the populace. They were literally torn in pieces. I
tremble even yet, and I pity them, much as they
deserved
their fate.Mexico
,
Sept
. 1821.
Dearest Jacinta
,
This evening is to see me no longer Doa de Alvaro.
My hand trembles, and if the characters which I trace
are a little flurried, I hope you will pardon me, for you
have passed through the same ordeal. Let me tell you
something about these important arrangements. I well
remember and can produce your account of this same
business to me in three whole sheets. I will have more
conscience with you. First then, the Bishop of Mexico
is to solemnize the wedding. He is a venerable man,
dignified and unblameable in the discharge of his holy
functions, and has retained the confidence and respect
of all parties. He could never be prevailed on to take
any part in the usurpation of the Emperor. He has
always
been a friend of my father's, and is known to
incline
in his feelings towards the Patriots. Secondly, we
are to be publicly married in the church of `Nuestra
Senora de Guadaloupe,' my patroness, and Laura is to
be bridemaid. Poor little thing, her bosom beats almost
as mine! The day, too, is my birth-day! What a
singular
coincidence! Thirdly, my father being president
of the provincial junta, there is to be a general
illumination
.
Fourthly, immediately after my return to my
father's
house, Bryan is to be married to a pretty Irish
girl, whom he has found here in the city. Lastly, the
first and last wish of my duena's heart is to be gratified
in her being immediately after married to Matteo
Tonato, the stoutest man in my father's establishment,
and the bridegroom and the bride have charged
themselves with the expense of a
shanty
for the one
and a
casa
for the other. The whole is to conclude
with a splendid
tertulia
and
fandango
. I shall wish
all this matter in the Red sea.
I had almost forgotten the most important article yet,
my dress. The good man has been a little prying in
this article, and I have answered, You shall see, sir
all in good time, and I shall not look ugly neither. To
tell you the truth, he is not fond of jewels, or I would
blaze like the meridian sun. I have had a hundred and
fifty counsels upon this subject. My mother advised
gorgeous, flowered, and stiff silks, and Laura would have
me flash his eyes to blindness with diamonds. I will
smite him deeper than that. It is a plain, rich muslim
dress from the United States, and made by an
accomplished
mantuamaker after the best fashion of that
country
.
The compliment will be so much the more
delicate
,
as he supposes that I am to appear in a rich
Spanish
costume studded with jewels. He wears his
uniform
as a Patriot general. I have been looking in my
glass and trying to moderate the exultation and joy in
my countenance, to the shrinking timidity in which all
the romances tell us, the young bride goes to the altar.
Of one thing I am certain. No damsel in romance ever
suffered more from palpitation, be it terror, be it joy.
The very dressing maid perceived it. Jesu Maria,
said she, how your heart beats! Are you frightened?
I should not be in the least.
In continuation
.Dearest Jacinta
,
It is all over. I will give you the details in their
order
.
Just as the sun was setting, my mother and
Laura
,
and two other distinguished young ladies of the city,
were assisted by the bridegroom into the state coach.
Thirty coaches of invited guests followed. The whole
was escorted by a select body of troops, lately under
the command of my husband. At the head of the
procession
was my father accompanied by the Conde de
Serra and the first officers of the Junta. Military
music, firing of cannon, and ringing of bells marked the
commencement of the procession. At the door of the
magnificent church we were received by the Bishop
and the priesthood of the city, all in their most solemn
robes of office. The church, was full to overflowing,
and adorned with evergreens, and covered quite to the
centre of its vaulted dome with that profusion of
splendid
flowers in which our city abounds. We walked on
flowers up to the altar. The bridegroom conducted
himself
with his usual dignity and calmness, and, after all, the
ceremony was so imposing, and the duties assumed of a
character so formidable, that I felt myself trembling and
faint, and should have conducted myself foolishly but for
the sustaining manner and countenance of my husband.
Amidst clouds of incense, the pious minister, dressed in
robes of the purest white, performed the solemn services
of this Sacrament, and we both pronounced our vows in
a firm and decided voice, after the manner of those who
had meditated the duties of this relation, and resolved to
be faithful to them. The moment the vows were
pronounced
,
we were literally covered with flowers, and
saluted with
vivas
from every quarter of the church.
My mother and father embraced and kissed me; and
my husband, you know, had now acquired the right to do
so. Laura too, kissed me, and whispered me, when
returned from the States, to bring her just such a
husband
,
as mine. The Bishop led me back through the
aisle of the church, and gave me his benediction at the
door. The organ was pealing its grand symphonies, a
I was assisted into my carriage. The city, as we drove
back, was one dazzling mass of illumination. On all
sides was the gaiety of fte, and I much fear of drunk
enness.
Every tree in my father's garden was hung with
variegated
lamps. A hogshead of
vino mezcal
was opened
for the Spanish populace, and a hogshead of
agua
ardiente
for the Irish, of whom there are multitudes in the
city; and Bryan, as my husband's favorite servant
was to have his way for this night; for he said, it was
but raisonable for him to be free, and to use his phrase
dead out for this night, if he was to be the slave of his
wife forever after. The parish priest solemnize
the united marriages of Bryan and his pretty Irish girl,
and the duena with her Herculean spouse. No people
that ever I have seen, enter into a festivity with such
entire
abandonment of joyousness, that excludes all thought
of the past and the future, as the populace of this city.
There were hundreds of them dancing by the light of
the illumination among the trees on the green turf. The
evening concluded with a splendid ball, at which were
present all the beauty and fashion of the city. It was
arranged by my parents and the Conde de Serra,
contrary
to all reason and rule, I am sure, and I believe
contrary to custom, that my husband should have the
first dance with Laura. My husband admits, that our
dances are infinitely more graceful than his; that ours is
the music of motion and expression, consisting rather in
beautiful movement, than in practised steps. I was
tormented
with downright jealousy, for the little Circe
seemed
to have condensed the sun-beams in her eyes, and her
movements were so graceful, buoyant, and joyous, that
the whole garden rung with acclamations; and as she
passed me in the dance, there was such roguish triumph
in her eyes, that I could almost have felt it in my heart
to put them out. The good man too, is one of those
who cannot move other than nobly and gracefully, and
when he passed me in the dance, I saw that he would
have chosen that I should have been the partner, and I
was satisfied. Before they retired, each one of the
company came up and wished me joy, and when Laura
left me, there was such a sweet and tender air of
sincerity
in her congratulations, that I really felt it in my heart
to wish her as good a husband.
You know all about our customs on such occasions.
My father is scrupulously observant of all the Spanish
rules of the olden time. I have only to say, that every
punctilio was observed on this occasion. The company
retired about midnight. Bryan was deputed on the part
of the Irish, to tender the civilities of the evening after
the Irish fashion. It is not necessary that I should
relate
exactly all that he said. He was evidently a little
mellow, and this, of course, created some little reserve
on my part. His perfect tact enlightened him in a
moment
into the cause of my reserve. The honest fellow
was affected to tears, partly, I suppose, of the bottle.
God Almighty bless your Ladyship, and his Honor,
said he, and be sure, I should have been drunk with
the pure joy, if I had not tasted a drop of the mountain
dew. Don't you forgive me now, honies, for being a
little
too glad? We both joined to quiet him, and stop
the sources of his tears, and to wish him joy of his
pretty
wife. The clouds not only passed, but he was
immediately
in high glee again. Now arn't you the
jewels? said he, as he turned with a caper to go away
It is said, that Bryan was king of the wake for that
night, that he sung gramachree and paddy whack,
and all his popular and national songs, until the morning
dawned in the east. The pleasantest circumstance
yet to be recorded. The Gazette, in detailing the
festivities
of the night, remarked that not a single accident
had occurred.
In continuation
.Dearest Jacinta
,
To my great relief after a night of so much
fte
and
gaiety, we were entirely
en famille
in the morning. I
dreaded to see company, and could have chosen to spend
the day alone with my husband. But immediately
after
breakfast drove up the Conde's coach. A card was
handed me from Laura, requesting the pleasure of a
drive with me. I sent her for word, that, unless she was
disposed to give a place to my husband, she must
positively
excuse me. The message back was, that if he
chose to accompany me back, so much the better. He
consented to accompany me, and the drive was a
pleasant
one, except that occasionally when my husband
looked another way, Laura gave me looks so wickedly
and impertinently inquisitive, that I was obliged to
assume
matronly airs, look grave, and show her all the
difference in deportment, between a wife and a spinster.
But she is really a most forward child, and answered me
by looks of such merry defiance back again, that I see
nothing will cure her but to be able to put on the same
official dignity herself.
In the course of the drive she asked my husband if he
had ever visited the churches of the city? To which
he answered, that he had only seen the outside of them,
save one; and that was certainly the most beautiful
church I ever saw, and he gave me a look of gallant
kindness, which gave the remark a delightful
application
to me. She coloured a little at the reply, and
continued
,
that one, I must suppose, was the church of Our
Lady of Gaudaloupe. You would feel unplesantly to
confess, after you shall have left the city, that you had
not visited its churches, as they contain the chief display
of our city, both in architecture and painting. I will
have the pleasure of showing them to you. But, as
there are nearly sixty important ones, besides a greater
number of inferior ones, I begged her not to satiate him
with too great a feast, but only to show him the finest of
them. Accordingly, we drove to the rich and noble
church of La Incarnacion. From that, we inspected
one after another, the most noted churches of the city.
The church of San Domingo struck my husband very
much. I saw while he was viewing it, precisely the
same expression come over his countenance as I have
seen upon it, while he was looking upon San Puebla, and
the other sublime points of our scenery. I caught
myself
the thrill of feeling,which I knew was passing through
his frame. The interior of this church is imposing, and
inspires awe. In the different churches there are some
handsome paintings; and to me it appears, although I
am an European, that by far the handsomest are the
production
of native artists. There is certainly, as I have
seen among my father's tenants, a strong natural aptitude
to painting among the creoles of this country.
In the convent, attached to the church of
La Professa
we were shown the series of paintings which represent
the heart of man as possessed of the devil, and the seven
deadly sins. There is the usual form given to the devil,
and the mortal sins are represented by various ugly
animals
.
In the first painting they have full possession,
and occupy the centre of the heart. In the second the
devil and the animals appear to be losing ground, and
are crowded a little towards one extremity of the heart.
In the same proportion as they retire, a dove is seen
entering
.
In the next painting the empire of the heart is
shared between the dove, the devil and his animals, and
so on, until they are completely expelled, and the dove
has entire possession. This painting is celebrated in
this city as a model of taste and ingenuity in the science
of symbols: I looked at my husband as the fascinating
little Laura was playing the connoisseur, and admiring
it prodigiously, and expecting a corresponding
admiration
on his part. I saw a slight shrug, a
well-remembered
VOL. II. 22
mark of indifference, as dissatisfaction. She seemed
disappointed at his silence and asked him again, why he
did not admire a painting that every body considered as
a
chef-d'uvre
in its kind? He gaily answered, that
the animated paintings before him were too beautiful
and attractive to leave him taste or feeling to admire
any thing else. No, she replied, you do not put
me off with a compliment. I see, that you are not
pleased
with this painting, that every body admires. I am
told that your taste is very exact and severe. For my
part, I love to be pleased, and I never stop to inquire
why?
We had now finished the inspection of the churches,
and we went to sit in a pavilion in a garden, from which
was a most imposing view of the whole chain of
mountains
in the distance. In one of the churches, which
we had visited, we had waited during a most imposing
celebration of high mass, in which the rites of our
church had appeared in all their grandeur and
attraction
.
We are now seated, said Laura, in the cool
shade, and in view of San Puebla. There is here
before
us one of the sublimest objects in nature, after we
have seen all that our city has to boast of art,
consecrated
to the worship of the Divinity. I now wish to ask
your opinion. If I did not respect that opinion, I would
not ask it. You have been reared, and, I can discover,
religiously, as a protestant, or as we say, as a heretic.
You are married to the most amiable and lovely woman
in Mexico.(Why could the little witch wish to flatter
me?)You have seen all that is noble and imposing in
our worship and your union with this lady must dispose
you to think favorably of it. I am deemed in this
country
a free-thinker myself. Which worship do you
prefer
,
this, or your own? I grant you, I felt
unpleasantly
,
that she should have asked him this question at this
time and place, and in such a way, that he could not
wave it. This was his answer. I can hardly reply to
you, without making a speech, and I am too entirely
happy
to punish you, or myself, by such an infliction. The
whole taken together, if I must be frank, I much prefer
my own. Could I have done it without a compromise
of either principle or conscience, my interest and
inclination
would have led me to assume your profession.
I have felt the full force of a motive, a thousand times
more powerful in swaying the springs of action, a
motive
of such influence, when I have seen Martha raising
her eyes and folding her hands with such an expression
of celestial ardor and purity in her prayers and
observances
.
I have painfully regretted, that we were not
exactly
one in faith, as I trust we are indissoluble in
affection
.
It is my opinion that religion is the most solemn
of all realities, not at all dependent upon forms or shades
of opinion. I deem good people to be all of one
religion. I have seen enough of dispute about difference
of opinion, I have seen enough of pretension and
reliance
upon form, to be thoroughly disgusted with both.
There is enough that is common to every form of
Christian
faith and profession, to unite us in deeds of
beneficence
and feelings of charity. I admire, as I said to the
unfortunate father Josephus, I admire most of the
prayers and many of the forms of your worship. I have
seen and have admired the fidelity, and the exact and
impartial observance with which the minor priests of
your church administer the rites of your worship to
slaves, the ignorant and miserable
leperos
, the very
remnants
of humanity. I am well convinced, that the
ignorant
multitude of such a country as this, can have no
faith but an implicit one. Were it not for a few points
to which the more strenuous of your priests hold with
such perseverance, I could be a conscientious Catholic.
I have no hesitation in stating my precise objections.
Some of the dogmas of your church are not only
incredible
and impossible, but just as revolting to common
feeling
and sense, as to assert that twice two are five; not only
above reason, but absolutely contrary to it. Your
reading
on these points, I am aware, is so exact and
extensive
,
that you cannot but know the points to which I
refer
.
Neither, I admit, do my feelings go with the
multitude
of bowings, genuflections, shiftings of dress, the
gaudiness and finery of the sacerdotal costume, in short
a great part of the parade and pageantry of your church.
Simplicity, according to my notion, enters into every
kind of greatness and sublimity. How simple are all
the grand operations of the Divinity! By means how
admirably simple, are brought about the changes in the
visible universe! Can the Being who reared yonder
piles, and kindled the eternal fires under their snows,
who hears the music of the spheres, inaudible by any
other being, and who melts the snows of half the world
by an influence so silent and unostentatious, as the
gentle
actings of the suncan that Being, whose object it
seems to be, to achieve the greatest results with the least
ostentation, can He be pleased with a pageant so shifting
and tinselled? I do not avail myself of the thoughts or
similitudes that offer themselves to me, and you will
excuse
me for talking so plainly. I am aware how
respectful
and sacred all your associations may be, even with
this parade of rites and costume. Our worship is simple
and intellectual, and, as I think, nearer to these gran d
and simple actings of the Divinity as we see them in the
phenomena of nature. But I have seen so much of
profession
without reality in all forms, that I deem very
little
of the externals of any religion. It is the substance
of the thing and the being in earnest, that I respect. Of
the place where Martha shall worship, I shall always
think, in the phrase of the Bible, `Put off the shoe from
thy foot, for the place where she standeth is holy
ground.' Far from loving her the less, for this
difference
of opinion between us, the honor of our different
faiths, I trust, will operate upon us both, to strive to
evince which faith will inspire most tenderness,
forbearance
,
and fidelity. All the hope I entertain of
converting
her, and all the arts I mean to try, will be founded on
the purpose to show her what a kind, correct, and
undeviating
husband a protestant can be. What say you,
Jacinta? If the respective excellence of our faiths be
put upon this criterion, I am fully aware that his will
vanquish mine, and that I shall end by becoming a
heretic
.
But no. I have even heard him speak doubtfully
of sudden changes in these great and vital matters. I am
sure, that if I affected compliance from any other
motive than deep conviction, he would at once
detect
the hollowness of the motive, and respect me the
less. The Virgin preserve me from losing one tittle of
his respect.Mexico,
Sept.
1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I have received your kind letter and the beautiful
rosary accompanying it. I thank you a thousand times
for your kind wishes. I have no apprehension on the
score on which you warn me. I have no terrors of the
weather getting duller after honey moon, as you call it,
VOL. II. 22 *
I only fear that this more intimate view of things will
inspire an idolatry too blind, and that I shall only be
too much tempted to surrender my judgment and my
reason
to the keeping of another. When I loved him at a
distance, I knew but the half of his deserts. You must
see the manner, and the motive, that he carries with him
to the sanctuary of our privacy; you must walk and
ride with him, as I do; you must catch his eye as we
scramble together up the mountains, or listen to his
conversation
as we sail together on these sweet lakes; in
short you must find him, as I do most full, and rich, and
delightful in that dear spot, our home, to do full
justice
to his character. Let the Stoics preach that this
life never does, or can yield any thing, but satiety and
disappointment. I know better on experience. I could
live happily on the treasured recollection of the few days
we have had together, for a whole year. If I ever hear
foolish girls affecting to be witty again, as I have so
often
heard them before, in declaiming against the wedded
lifeby the way, you and I know, with how much
sincerity they do itI will say to them, Foolish girls, this
talk is all stuff. Be married to worthy men as soon as
possible. I have experienced more enjoyment in a day
since marriage, than in a year before. Indeed my
duena seems another sort of person, she is so happy; and
Bryan too, in his strange way, eulogizes matrimony,
and his red-cheeked and yellow-haired spouse blushes
her consent.
The only news of any importance, you have
undoubted
heard, that the Ex-Emperor has sailed with his whole
family for Italy, or, as is more generally believed, for
England. We have made most of our arrangements,
and shall start in a few days for Durango. We all are
impatient to be more private than we can be here.
Ftes
, balls,
tertulias
, and visiting occupy too much of
our time. I want the shade of those venerable
sycamores
,
and
catalpas
. I know of no one that I shall very
much regret leaving, but the Conde's family,
particularly
his daughter. Indeed, she talks of accompanying
us, and I am sure she would, if she could gain the
consent
of her father. Some of the ladies here have made
efforts, quite conspicuous, to intrigue with my husband.
Pretty things indeed! If my husband were not
invincibly
sober, I cannot but think, that, putting every thing
but appearance out of comparison, I should carry it
over these dizzened forms and swarthy faces.Durango
,
Oct
. 1822.
Dearest Jacinta
,
I am so much the more delighted with the regularity
of your correspondence, as I know you have so many
important occupations. You still express curiosity to
hear from me, though I have passed that dread bourne
where all curiosity and interest generally cease. But I
feel that the energies of my affections, so far from having
become paralyzed by having passed this bourne, have
become more unchanging and more powerful. My
conscience
tells me it is a duty to write to you so long as
you feel any desire to hear from me.
Before we left the city, as it was very uncertain when
we should return to it, we went first to visit the estate, in
the valley acquired to my husband by the grant of the
junta. We found it to be a fine estate though it had
gone to waste from the troubles of the times. It was in
a sweet and retired place, and it was the first night I had
spent with him away from my father's house. Oh! a
woman well may leave father and mother, and cleave
to such a husband. I felt a greater pleasure too, from
being here, inasmuch as it was an estate belonging to
him. I know well, that the matter of fortune beyond what
is necessary for competence, makes nothing to either of
us. Still I felt a pleasure in showing him, that I had my
obligations to him on a score which the world thinks of
so much importance. After he had put every thing in
train for the restoration and improvement of this fine
place, we returned to the city, and leisurely visited all
its monuments, its natural and artificial curiosities. We
moralized over the ruins of Tenochtitlan and the fallen
empire of Montezuma. We reflected in sober sadness
how many lovers had waded through all their trials, as
we had done, before as yet the empire of this primitive
people had passed away. Their loves, their joys, the
houses, the city, the traces of their existence were all
past, and in future ages, others would come and
meditate upon the ruins of the present race, deeming as
little of us, as we did now of this extinct people. But, if
I gave a tear to the thought of this brief and frail tenure
of our present felicity, he kissed it away and bade me
hope the renewal of it in a region where there is no change,
and all evils was forgotten. We then visited that
prodigious
work the `
desagua
,' by which the city is
preserved
from inundation. We then visited San Puebla, and
Guanaxuato, and Queretaro, and in fact most of the
principal
towns of a country so delightful in climate, so
grand in scenery, so inexhaustible in resources, and yet,
as my husband says, abounding in misery, want, and
ignorance
,
swarming with beggars and
leperos
, famishing
amidst the exuberance of nature, merely from the
blighting influence of oppression. Who, said he, as he
expatiated on this theme, would not pour his best
blood to free such a great and beautiful country, to cause
her to rise in the strength of her resources, and burst the
chains of her oppressors and hurl them back in their
faces? In truth, the government of the Patriots is
constantly
acquiring strength. The peaceful labors of
agriculture
are resumed. The people look cheerful and full
of hope. The mines are beginning to be worked again.
My husband's estate, and my father's again begin to
yield us their accustomed revenues. My husband sees
in all this, the cheering and fostering influence of
Freedom
.
All that I can say is, that Freedom looks well to
me, and I very much fear slavery would seem the same.
I am happier than I can describe myself, and when one's
own heart dances with joy, we are apt to see things in a
favorable light all around us. I pity the poor beggars
and
leperos
that swarm round our carriage, and I give
them money, but I can hardly conceive that every body
is not happy. I well remember when I was almost as
strongly impressed, that every body was miserable. I
have read an amusing little book in English, entitled
Eyes and No Eyes, or the different manners in which
different people see the same things. Every journey,
every monument, every curiosity furnished us with a
theme of remark and investigation. We consulted the
books that treated the subject, and contained the thoughts
of those who had been there before us. I am
determined
to become an intellectual companion to my husband.
I will astonish him one day with the amount of my
acquisitions
.
My poor head aches with the efforts that I
make with this intent, during the few moments that I
have to myself.
Nothing could exceed the gaiety of all the persons of
our establishment, when it was announced to them that
we were ready to set out for Durango. We all equally
long for the repose of that place. The whole cavalcade
was composed of at least fifty persons. We were
escorted
on our way by a regiment of troops; altogether
we made a very respectable dust, and when we alighted
at a
hacienda
, like a swarm of locusts we devoured all
that was eatable about the establishment; but unlike
all that the people had been used to in the late times of
anarchy and trouble, we remembered to pay well. I am
surprised to see how soon, now that all impediments are
removed, my father has become deeply attached to his
son-in-law. While he imagines that he does every thing
of his own purpose and plan, in fact, he does every
thing from the counsels of this favored adviser. He
watches every movement of the dear man, and copies it.
He cannot endure to have him out of his sight; and the
time which my husband is obliged to spend away from me
in advising, and in arranging his affairs, is a great
annoyance
to me. Would you believe it? My father has
actually
got his grammar and dictionary, and is set down
to lessons from his son-in-law in English. I have to
endure
many a joke about the influence of this same
process
upon me. Oh! the blow was struck before he
began
to teach me English.
I cannot hope to interpret the charm of that welcome,
which my husband gave me to my own sweet and
secure
home in this place. It was here, away from that
great vortex of intrigue, wealth, and assassination at
Mexico, that I first felt that he was all to me. We have
wandered under these noble sycamores. We have been
to visit the poor English widow, under the shade of
whose trees he first confessed that he loved me. She
was happy, for her son was perfectly recovered, and we
gave them ample cause to remember us gratefully, for
we have put them in a way hereafter to be independent
on the score of fortune. My husband has inquired out
every person to whom he has heard that I have been
partial, and in some way, most consonant to their feelings
and interests, he has made them feel, that all, that were
once my friends, have now become his. We have
walked on the banks of the beautiful stream, now low
and brawling over pebbles, where he rescued me and
my mother from the torrent. I have seated myself in
the chair where he used to sit and read, and where
the blessed Virgin forgive meI have looked at him a
hundred times through the Venetian blinds, through
which I could see him unobserved.
We have had a visit to day from his former pupil and
admirer, Dorothea. She is somewhat untrained and wild
in the expression of her feelings, but is, after all, a very
good girl, and her unrequited affection for my husband,
and her tenderness and attention to him, when he was on
his way as a volunteer to Mexico, have very much
endeared
her to me. She congratulated me, in her rough
way, on my marriage; said she envied me, and had
loved
him sooner and more than I had. When my
husband
came in, a burning blush on her cheek gave
evidence
of her sincerity. She bent her head to receive
the salute, which the customs of our country require in
such cases. He was extremely polite to her and her
father, and gave strong demonstration, that he gratefully
remembered their former kindnesses. Dorothea has
wealth, and wishes to accompany us on our journey to
the United States. I find it would be sufficiently easy,
to enlist volunteers for that expedition. The only
difficulty
would be in making the proper selection. In
truth, I wish no one to accompany me, but my husband.
We expect to find out Wilhelmine Benvelt, and if I
should feel tempted to the slightest feeling of jealousy
towards any one, it would certainly be towards her. I
am sure that he was on the verge of loving her. Taken
all together, she is as unlike me, as possible, and yet
there are many points in which we agree, and those
the very points that would be likely to secure the
affections
of such a man as my husband. I know that he
thinks her the most interesting woman that he has seen,
one only excepted. Whenever he does not make that
exception, all peace will be at an end for me. Yet, if he
did not make that, the award of his judgment would be
given with so much equity and honor, that he would
leave me no ground to complain.